
Leon Trotsky



WHITHER FRANCE?


(1934-1936)

------------------------------------------------------------------------

WRITTEN: 1934-36.
ORIGINALLY PUBLISHED: as _OÙ VA LA FRANCE?_ by Librairie du Travail,
Paris.
PUBLISHER: New Park, London, 1974, ISBN 0902030-53-1.
TRANSLATED: Brian Pearce.
ONLINE VERSION: Marxists Internet Archive, 2002.
TRANSCRIBED: Robert Barrois.
HTML MARKUP: David Walters.
EBOOK FORMAT: Kollektiv Yakov Perelman, from the version available at
Trotsky Internet Archive in October 2014.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

  Preface to 1936 French Edition (_June 10, 1936_)

  Whither France? (_November 9, 1934_)

  Once Again Whither France? (_March 28, 1935_)

  Committees of Action – Not People’s Front (_November 26, 1935_)

  France at the Turning Point (_March 26, 1936_)

  The Decisive Stage (_June 5, 1936_)

  The French Revolution Has Begun (_June 9, 1936_)

  Revolutionary Interlude in France (_July 9, 1936_)


Leon Trotsky

Whither France?

------------------------------------------------------------------------



PREFACE TO THE 1936 FRENCH EDITION


(June 10, 1936)

 

This pamphlet contains several articles written at different times
during the past two and a half years; or to put it more accurately, from
the emergence of the Fascist-Bonapartist-Royalist bloc on February 6,
1934 to the great mass strike of May-June, 1936. What a vast swing of
the political pendulum! The leaders of the People’s Front are of course
inclined to credit the foresight and wisdom of their policies for the
swing to the left that has taken place. But that is not the case. The
three-party cartel proved to be a third-rate factor in the development
of the political crisis. The Communists, Socialists and Radicals foresaw
nothing and directed nothing. Events broke over their heads. The
unexpected (for them) blow of February 6, 1934 compelled them to ditch
yesterday’s slogans and ideas and to seek salvation in an alliance with
each other. Equally unexpected, the strike of May-June 1936 has dealt
this parliamentary bloc a blow from which it cannot recover. That which
superficially might seem to be the apogee of the People’s Front is in
reality its dying agony.

In view of the fact that the various sections of this pamphlet appeared
separately, reflecting the different stages of the crisis through which
France was passing, the reader will find unavoidable repetitions in
these pages. To eliminate them would mean to dislocate the structure of
each section and, what is more important, would strip the work of its
dynamic character, which reflects the dynamics of the events themselves.
The author has chosen to retain these repetitions. They may even prove
not entirely without use for the reader. We live in an epoch of the
universal liquidation of Marxism in the ruling summits of the labour
movement. The most vulgar prejudices now serve as the official doctrines
for the political and trade-union leaders of the French working class.
Contrariwise, the voice of revolutionary realism rings against this
artificial sounding board like the voice of “sectarianism”. It is all
the more insistently necessary _to repeat over and over again_ the
fundamental truths of Marxist policies before audiences of advanced
workers.

Here, or in other occasional statements of the author, the reader may
perhaps find isolated contradictions. We do not eliminate these either.
In fact, these supposed “contradictions” reflect only the emphasis
placed on different stages of the process. On the whole, we think this
pamphlet has passed the test of events and, it may be, will prove
capable of making them more readily understood.

The days of the great strike will undoubtedly also have the merit of
airing out the musty, still atmosphere of the workers’ organizations,
clearing it of the miasmas of reformism and patriotism, of the
“Socialist”, “Communist” and “trade-union” varieties. Assuredly, this
will not take place at once, nor by itself. Ahead lies a stubborn
ideological struggle on the basis of harsh class struggle. But the
subsequent course of the crisis will show that only Marxism provides a
timely analysis of the interlocking of events and a timely forecast of
their further development.

The February days of 1934 marked the first serious offensive of the
united counter-revolution. The May-June days of 1936 herald the first
mighty wave of proletarian revolution. These two milestones show the way
in advance to two possible roads: the Italian or the Russian.
Parliamentary democracy, in whose name the Blum government now
functions, will be crushed into powder between these two great
milestones. Whatever the specific stages to come, the transitional
combinations and groupings, the partial attacks and retreats, the
tactical episodes, there henceforth remains the choice only between
Fascism and the proletarian revolution. That is the meaning of this
book.

Leon Trotsky


Leon Trotsky

Whither France?

------------------------------------------------------------------------



WHITHER FRANCE?


(November 9, 1934)

 

In these pages we wish to explain to the advanced workers the fate of
France in the years to come. For us, France is neither the Bourse, nor
the banks, nor the trusts, nor the government, nor the state, nor the
church – all these are the oppressors of France – it is the working
class and the exploited peasantry.
 

The Collapse of Bourgeois Democracy

After the war a series of brilliantly victorious revolutions occurred in
Russia, Germany, Austria-Hungary and later in Spain. But it was only in
Russia that the proletariat took full power into its hands, expropriated
its exploiters, and knew how to create and maintain a workers’ state.
Everywhere else the proletariat, despite its victory, stopped half way
because of the mistakes of its leadership. As a result, power slipped
from its hands, shifted from left to right and fell prey to Fascism. In
a series of other countries power passed into the hands of a military
dictatorship. Nowhere were the parliaments capable of reconciling class
contradictions and assuring the peaceful development of events.
Conflicts were solved arms in hand.

The French people for a long time thought that Fascism had nothing
whatever to do with them. They had a republic in which all questions
were dealt with by the sovereign people through the exercise of
universal suffrage. But on February 6, 1934, several thousand Fascists
and royalists, armed with revolvers, clubs and razors, imposed upon the
country the reactionary government of Doumergue, under whose protection
the Fascist bands continue to grow and arm themselves. What does
tomorrow hold?

Of course in France, as in certain other European countries (England,
Belgium, Holland, Switzerland, the Scandinavian countries), there still
exist parliaments, elections, democratic liberties, or their remnants.
But in all these countries the class struggle is sharpening, just as it
did previously in Italy and Germany. Whoever consoles himself with the
phrase, “France is not Germany”, is hopeless. In all countries the same
historic laws operate, the laws of capitalist decline. If the means of
production remain in the hands of a small number of capitalists, there
is no way out for society. It is condemned to go from crisis to crisis,
from need to misery, from bad to worse. In the various countries the
decrepitude and disintegration of capitalism are expressed in diverse
forms and at unequal rhythms. But the basic features of the process are
the same everywhere. _The bourgeoisie is leading its society to complete
bankruptcy_. It is capable of assuring the people neither bread nor
peace. _This is precisely why it cannot any longer tolerate the
democratic order_. It is forced to smash the workers by the use of
physical violence. The discontent of the workers and peasants, however,
cannot be brought to an end by the police alone. Moreover, it is often
impossible to make the army march against the people. It begins by
disintegrating and ends with the passage of a large section of the
soldiers over to the people’s side. That is why finance capital is
obliged to create special armed bands, trained to fight the workers just
as certain breeds of dog are trained to hunt game. The historic function
of Fascism is to smash the working class, destroy its organizations, and
stifle political liberties when the capitalists find themselves unable
to govern and dominate with the help of democratic machinery.

The Fascists find their human material mainly in the petty bourgeoisie.
The latter has been entirely ruined by big capital. There is no way out
for it in the present social order, but it knows of no other. Its
dissatisfaction, indignation and despair are diverted by the Fascists
away from big capital and against the workers. It may be said that
Fascism is the act of placing the petty bourgeoisie at the disposal of
its most bitter enemies. In this way big capital ruins the middle
classes and then with the help of hired Fascist demagogues incites the
despairing petty bourgeois against the worker. The bourgeois régime can
be preserved only by such murderous means as these. For how long? Until
it is overthrown by proletarian revolution.
 

The Beginning of Bonapartism in France

In France the movement from democracy toward Fascism is only in its
first stage. Parliament exists, but it no longer has the powers it once
had and it will never retrieve them. The parliamentary majority,
mortally frightened after February 6, called to power Doumergue, the
saviour, the arbiter. His government holds itself above parliament. It
bases itself not on the “democratically” elected majority but directly
and immediately upon the bureaucratic apparatus, the police and the
army. This is precisely why Doumergue can permit no liberty for the
civil servants or in general for employees of the state. He needs a
docile and disciplined bureaucratic apparatus on whose summit he can
maintain himself without danger of falling. The parliamentary majority,
scared of the Fascists and the “common front”, is forced to bow before
Doumergue.

At the present time much is being written about the forthcoming “reform”
of the constitution, on the right to dissolve the Chamber of Deputies,
etc. All these questions have only a juridical interest. In the
political sense, the question is already solved. Reform has been
accomplished without the trip to Versailles. The appearance on the arena
of armed Fascist bands has enabled finance capital to raise itself above
parliament. In this consists now the essence of the French constitution.
All else is illusion, phraseology or conscious dupery.

The present role of Doumergue (like that of his possible successors, of
the type of Tardieu) is nothing new. It is a role analogous to that
played, in different circumstances, by Napoléon I and Napoléon III. The
essence of Bonapartism consists in this: basing itself on the struggle
of two camps, it “saves” the “nation” with the help of a
bureaucratic-military dictatorship. Napoléon I represented the
Bonapartism of the bourgeoisie’s impetuous youth. The Bonapartism of
Napoléon III developed when the bourgeoisie was already slightly bald.
In the person of Doumergue we meet the senile Bonapartism of capitalist
decline.

The Doumergue government represents the first step of the passage from
parliamentarianism to Bonapartism. To keep his balance, Doumergue needs
at his right hand the Fascist and other bands which brought him to
power. To demand of him that he dissolve the Patriotic Youth, the Croix
de Feu, the Camelots du Roi, etc. – not on paper but in reality – is to
demand that he cut off the branch upon which he rests.

Temporary oscillations to one side or the other are, of course,
possible. Thus, a premature Fascist offensive might provoke a certain
shift to the “left” at the top of the government. Doumergue would
temporarily give way not to Tardieu but to Herriot. But in the first
place, no one has ever said that the Fascists would attempt a premature
_coup d’état_. Secondly, a temporary shift to the left at the top would
not change the general course of development. It would only postpone the
showdown.

There is no longer any path back to a peaceful democracy. Events are
leading inevitably and irresistibly to a conflict between the
proletariat and Fascism.
 

Will Bonapartism Last Long?

How long can the present transitional Bonapartist régime stand? Or in
other words: how much time has the proletariat to prepare itself for the
decisive battle? To this question it is impossible, naturally, to give
an exact reply. But certain factors can be established for the purposes
of evaluating the tempo at which the whole process is developing. For
this the foremost element is the question of the immediate fate of the
_Radical Party_.

The very appearance of the present Bonapartist régime links it, as we
have said, to the beginning of a civil war between the extreme political
camps. It finds its principal material support in the police and the
army. But it also has a political support on the left – the Radical
Socialist Party. The base of this mass party is in the petty bourgeoisie
of town and country. Its summit is occupied by “democratic” agents of
the big bourgeoisie of town and country who have given the people
occasional small reforms and, more often, democratic phrases, who have
saved it daily (in words) from reaction and clericalism, but who, in all
important questions, have carried out the policy of big capital.

Under the threat of Fascism, and still more under the threat of the
proletariat, the Radical Socialists have found themselves obliged to
pass from the camp of Bonapartism. Like the camel under its driver’s
whip, Radicalism gets down on its four knees to let capitalist reaction
sit between its humps. Without the political support of the Radicals,
the Doumergue government would at the present moment be impossible.

If the political evolution of France is compared with that of Germany,
the Doumergue government and its possible successors correspond to the
Brüning, Papen and Schleicher governments which filled in the gap
between Weimar and Hitler. There is, however, a difference which,
politically, _can_ assume enormous importance. German Bonapartism came
upon the scene when the democratic parties had collapsed and the Nazis
were growing at a prodigious rate. The three Bonapartist governments in
Germany, having a very feeble base of their own, were balanced on the
tight rope stretched across the abyss between two hostile camps – _the
proletariat and Fascism_. All three of these governments fell quickly.
The camp of the proletariat was split and unprepared for the struggle,
disoriented, duped and betrayed by its leaders. The Nazis were able to
take power almost without a struggle.

French Fascism does not yet represent a mass force. On the other hand,
Bonapartism finds support, neither sure nor very stable but nevertheless
a mass support, in the Radicals. Between these two facts there is an
inner link. By the social character of its base, Radicalism is the party
of the petty bourgeoisie. Fascism can only become a mass force by
conquering the petty bourgeoisie. In other words, _Fascism can develop
in France above all at the expense of the Radicals_. This process is
already under way, although still in its early stages.
 

The Role of the Radical Party

The last district elections gave results which could and should have
been anticipated. The flanks, i.e., the reactionaries and the workers’
bloc, gained and the centre, i.e., the Radicals, lost. But gains and
losses are still negligible. If it were a question of parliamentary
elections, these phenomena would have undoubtedly taken on much more
considerable dimensions. The displacements which have been noted have
for us an importance not in themselves but only as symptoms of changes
in the consciousness of the masses.

They show that the petty-bourgeois centre has already begun to give way
to the two extreme camps. That means that the remnants of the
parliamentary régime are going to be increasingly eaten away. The
extreme camps are going to grow. Clashes between them are approaching.
It is not difficult to understand that this process is absolutely
inescapable.

The Radical Party is the party with whose aid the big bourgeoisie
preserves the hopes of the petty bourgeoisie in a progressive and
peaceful improvement of its situation. This role of the Radicals was
possible only so long as the economic situation of the petty bourgeoisie
remained supportable and tolerable, so long as mass ruin was averted, so
long as the petty bourgeoisie retained its hope in the future. To be
sure, the program of the Radicals has always remained on paper. They
have brought about no serious social reform on behalf of the toilers nor
could they have done so. It was not permitted by the big bourgeoisie
which holds on to all the real levers of power, the banks and the
Bourse, the press, the higher officials, key diplomats and the general
staff.

From time to time the Radicals handed out petty alms to their clientele,
especially on a provincial scale, and, with the help of these handouts,
preserved the illusions of the popular masses. Thus it went until the
last crisis. It has now become clear to the most backward peasant that
it is not a matter of an ordinary, passing crisis, of which there were
not a few before the war, but of a crisis of the whole social system. It
calls for bold, decisive measures. What ones? The peasant does not know.
No one has told him what he should have been told.

Capitalism has brought the means of production to such a level that they
are paralysed by the misery of the popular masses, ruined by the
self-same capitalism. The whole system has thereby begun to decline,
decompose, and rot. Capitalism not only cannot give the toilers new
social reforms, nor even petty alms. It is forced to take back what it
once gave. All of Europe has entered an era of economic and political
counter-reforms. The policy of despoiling and suffocating the masses
stems not from the caprices of the reaction but from the decomposition
of the capitalist system. That is the fundamental fact which must be
assimilated by every worker if he is not to be duped by hollow phrases.

That is precisely why the democratic reformist parties are
disintegrating and losing their forces one after another throughout
Europe. The same fate also awaits the French Radicals. Only fools can
think that the capitulation of Daladier or the treason of Herriot in the
face of the worst reaction results from fortuitous, temporary causes or
from the lack of character in these two lamentable leaders. No! Great
political phenomena always have profound social causes. The decline of
the democratic parties is a universal phenomenon whose causes rest in
the disintegration of capitalism itself. The big bourgeoisie says to the
Radicals: “Now is no time for joking. If you do not stop flirting with
the socialists and coyly promising the people mountains and miracles, I
will call in the Fascists. Understand that February 6 was only a first
warning!” After which the Radical camel gets down on his four knees.
There is nothing else he can do.

But Radicalism will not find its salvation along that road. Linking its
fate in the eyes of the people to the fate of the reaction, it
inevitably hastens its own end. The loss of votes and mandates in the
district elections is only a beginning. The process of the collapse of
the Radical Party will unfold with increasing speed. The whole question
is to know in whose favour this inevitable and irresistible collapse
will take place – in favour of the proletarian revolution or Fascism.

Will it be revolutionary socialism or Fascist reaction which will first
offer the middle classes, boldly and broadly, the most convincing
program and, what is the most important, win their confidence by
demonstrating in words and deeds its ability to smash every obstacle on
the road to a better future?

On this question depends the fate of France for many years to come. Not
only of France, but of all Europe. Not only of Europe, but of the entire
world.
 

The “Middle Classes”, the Radical Party and Fascism

Since the victory of the Nazis in Germany there has been much talk in
the parties and groups of the French “left” of the necessity for staying
close to the “middle classes” to bar the road to Fascism. The fraction
of Renaudel and Co. split from the Socialist Party for the particular
purpose of drawing near to the Radicals. But at the moment that
Renaudel, who lives on the ideas of 1848, extended both hands to
Herriot, the latter had both his engaged, the one by Tardieu, the other
by Louis Marin.

From this, however, it does not at all follow that the working class can
turn its back on the petty bourgeoisie, leaving it to its fate. Oh, no!
To approach the peasants and the petty bourgeoisie of the cities, to
draw them to our side, is the necessary condition of the success of the
struggle against Fascism, not to speak of the conquest of power. Only
the problem must be correctly posed, and for that it is necessary to
understand clearly the nature of the “middle classes”. Nothing is more
dangerous in politics, especially in a critical period, than to repeat
general formulas without examining their social content.

Contemporary society is composed of three classes: the big bourgeoisie,
the proletariat and the “middle classes”, or the petty bourgeoisie. The
relations among these three classes determine in the final analysis the
political situation in the country. The fundamental classes of society
are the big bourgeoisie and the proletariat. Only these two classes can
have a clear, consistent, independent policy of their own. The petty
bourgeoisie is distinguished by its economic dependence and its social
heterogeneity. Its upper stratum is linked directly to the big
bourgeoisie. Its lower stratum merges with the proletariat and even
falls to the status of lumpen proletariat. In accordance with its
economic situation, the petty bourgeoisie can have no policy of its own.
It always oscillates between the capitalists and the workers. Its own
upper stratum pushes it to the right; its lower strata, oppressed and
exploited, are capable in certain conditions of turning sharply to the
left. These contradictory relations among the different strata of the
“middle classes” always determine the confused and thoroughly bankrupt
policy of the Radicals, their vacillations between the cartel with the
Socialists to calm the base, and the national bloc with the capitalist
reaction to save the bourgeoisie. _The final decomposition of Radicalism
begins when the big bourgeoisie, itself in an impasse, permits it to
vacillate no longer_.

The petty bourgeoisie, the ruined masses of city and country, begins to
lose patience. It assumes an attitude more and more hostile towards its
own upper stratum. It becomes convinced of the bankruptcy and the
perfidy of its political leadership. The poor peasant, the artisan, the
petty merchant become convinced that an abyss separates them from all
these mayors, all these lawyers and political businessmen of the type of
Herriot, Daladier, Chautemps and Co., who by their mode of life and
their conceptions are big bourgeois. It is precisely this
disillusionment of the petty bourgeoisie, its impatience, its despair,
that Fascism exploits. Its agitators stigmatize and execrate the
parliamentary democracy which supports careerists and grafters but gives
nothing to the toilers. These demagogues shake their fists at the
bankers, the big merchants and the capitalists. Their words and gestures
correspond to the feelings of the small proprietors bogged up a blind
alley. The Fascists show boldness, go out into the streets, attack the
police, and attempt to drive out parliament by force. That makes an
impression on the despairing petty bourgeois. He says to himself: “The
Radicals, among whom there are too many swindlers, have definitely sold
themselves to the bankers; the Socialists have promised for a long time
to abolish exploitation but they never pass from words to deeds, the
Communists one cannot understand at all – today it is one thing tomorrow
another; let’s see if the Fascists cannot save us.”
 

Must the “Middle Classes” Inevitably Go Over to Fascism?

Renaudel, Frossard and their similars imagine that the petty bourgeoisie
is attached above all to democracy, wherefore it is necessary to hang on
to the coat tails of the Radicals. What monstrous confusion! Democracy
is only a political form. The petty bourgeoisie is not concerned with
the shell but with the kernel. It wants to save itself from misery and
ruin. If democracy proves impotent – then to the devil with democracy!
Every petty bourgeois reasons or feels this way.

The principal social and political source of Fascism is in the growing
revolt of the lower petty bourgeoisie against its own, “educated” upper
layers in the municipalities, the districts and in parliament. To this
must be added the hatred of the crisis-shattered intellectual youth for
the lawyers, the deputies and the _parvenu_ ministers. Here also the
lower petty-bourgeois intellectuals rebel against those above them.

Does this mean that the passage of the petty bourgeoisie to Fascism is
inevitable and inescapable? No, such a conclusion would be shameful
fatalism.

What is really inevitable and inescapable is the doom of Radicalism and
all the political groupings which link themselves to its fate.

Under conditions of capitalist decline there is no longer any place for
a party of democratic reforms and “peaceful” progress. Whatever path
events take in France, Radicalism will disappear from the scene,
rejected and dishonoured by the petty bourgeoisie which it has
definitely betrayed.

Every conscious worker will become convinced by the experience of every
passing day that our prediction corresponds to reality. New elections
will bring defeats for the Radicals. Whole sections will cut away one
after another, the popular masses below and groups of frightened
careerists above. Departures, splits, betrayals will follow
uninterruptedly. No manoeuvre nor any bloc will save the Radical Party.
It will draw into the abyss with it the “party” of Renaudel-Deat & Co.
The end of the Radical Party is the inevitable result of the fact that
bourgeois society can no longer overcome its difficulties with the help
of so-called democratic methods. The split between the base of the petty
bourgeoisie and its summit is inevitable.

But that does not at all mean that the masses who follow Radicalism must
_infallibly_ place their hopes in Fascism. Certainly the most
demoralized section, the most declassed and the most avid of the youth
of the middle classes have already made their choice in that direction.
It is out of this reservoir particularly that the Fascist bands are
taking form. But the basic masses of city and country have not yet made
their choice. They hesitate before a great decision. It is precisely
because they are hesitating that they still continue, although already
without confidence, to vote for the Radicals. This situation of
hesitation, of irresolution, will not, however, last for years, but for
months.

Political developments in the coming period will move at a febrile
rhythm. The petty bourgeoisie will reject the demagogy of Fascism only
if it puts its faith in the reality of another road. That other road is
the road of proletarian revolution.
 

Is it True That the Petty Bourgeoisie Fears Revolution?

Parliamentary cretins who consider themselves connoisseurs of the people
like to repeat: “One must not frighten the middle classes with
revolution. They do not like extremes”. In this general form this
affirmation is absolutely false. Naturally, the petty proprietor prefers
order so long as business is going well and so long as he hopes that
tomorrow it will go better.

But when this hope is lost, he is easily enraged and is ready to give
himself over to the most extreme measures. Otherwise, how could he have
overthrown the democratic state and brought Fascism to power in Italy
and Germany? The despairing petty bourgeois sees in Fascism, above all,
a fighting force against big capital, and believes that, unlike the
working-class parties which deal only in words, Fascism will use force
to establish more “justice”. They understand that one cannot forgo the
use of force.

It is false, thrice false, to affirm that the present petty bourgeoisie
is not going to the working-class parties because it fears “extreme
measures”. Quite the contrary. The lower petty bourgeoisie, its great
masses, only see in the working-class parties parliamentary machines.
They do not believe in their strength, nor in their capacity to
struggle, nor in their readiness this time to conduct the struggle to
the end.

And if this is so, is it worth the trouble to replace Radicalism by its
parliamentary confrères on the left? That is how the semi-expropriated,
ruined and discontented proprietor reasons or feels. Without an
understanding of this psychology of the peasants, the artisans, the
employees, the petty functionaries, etc., – a psychology which flows
from the social crisis – it is impossible to elaborate a correct policy.
The petty bourgeoisie is economically dependent and politically
atomized. That is why it cannot conduct an independent policy. It needs
a “leader” who inspires it with confidence. This individual or
collective leadership, i.e., a personage or party, can be given to it by
one or the other of the fundamental classes – either the big bourgeoisie
or the proletariat. Fascism unites and arms the scattered masses. Out of
human dust it organizes combat detachments. It thus gives the petty
bourgeoisie the illusion of being an independent force. It begins to
imagine that it will really command the state. It is not surprising that
these illusions and hopes turn the head of the petty bourgeoisie!

But the petty bourgeoisie can also find a leader in the proletariat.
This was demonstrated in Russia and partially in Spain. In Italy, in
Germany and in Austria the petty bourgeoisie gravitated in this
direction. But the parties of the proletariat did not rise to their
historic task.

To bring the petty bourgeoisie to its side, the proletariat must win its
confidence. And for that it must have confidence in its own strength.

It must have a clear program of action and must be ready to struggle for
power by all possible means. Tempered by its revolutionary party for a
decisive and pitiless struggle, the proletariat says to the peasants and
petty bourgeoisie of the cities: “We are struggling for power. Here is
our program. We are ready to discuss with you changes in this program.
We will employ violence only against big capital and its lackeys, but
with you toilers, we desire to conclude an alliance on the basis of a
given program.” The peasants will understand such language. Only, they
must have faith in the capacity of the proletariat to seize power.

But for that it is necessary to purge the united front of all
equivocation, of all indecision, of all hollow phrases. It is necessary
to understand the situation and to place oneself seriously on the
revolutionary road.
 

An Alliance with the Radicals Would be an Alliance Against the Middle Class

Renaudel, Frossard and their similars seriously imagine that an alliance
with the Radicals is an alliance with the “middle classes” and
consequently a barrier against Fascism. These men see nothing but
parliamentary shadows. They ignore the real evolution of the masses and
chase after the “Radical Party” which has outlived itself and which in
the meantime turns its back on them. They think that in an era of great
social crisis an alliance of classes set in motion can be replaced by a
bloc with a parliamentary clique that is compromised and doomed to
extinction. A real alliance of the proletariat and the middle classes is
not a question of parliamentary statistics but of revolutionary
dynamics.

This alliance must be created and forged in the struggle. The whole
meaning of the present political situation resides in the fact that the
despairing petty bourgeoisie is beginning to break from the yoke of
parliamentary discipline and from the tutelage of the conservative
“radical” clique which has always fooled the people, and which has now
definitely betrayed it. To join in this situation with the Radicals
means to condemn oneself to the scorn of the masses, and to push the
petty bourgeoisie into the embrace of Fascism as the sole saviour.

The working-class party must occupy itself not with a hopeless effort to
save the party of the bankrupts. It must, on the contrary, with all its
strength, accelerate the process of liberation of the masses from
Radical influence. The more zeal and the more boldness it applies to
this task, the more surely and rapidly will it prepare a real alliance
of the working class with the petty bourgeoisie. It is necessary to
place oneself at their head and not at their tail. History is working
quickly. Woe to him who lags behind!

When Frossard denies the right of the Socialist Party to expose, weaken
and speed the disintegration of the Radical Party, he comes forward not
as a socialist but as a conservative radical. Only that party has the
right to historical existence which believes in its own program and
strives to rally the whole people to its banner. Otherwise it is not a
party but a parliamentary coterie, a clique of careerists. It is not
only the right but the elementary duty of the proletarian party to free
the toiling masses from the fatal influence of the bourgeoisie. This
historic task takes on a particular sharpness at the present time, for
the Radicals are more than ever striving to cover up the reaction, to
lull and dupe the people and in this way prepare for the victory of
Fascism. And the left Radicals? They capitulate to Herriot, just as
Herriot capitulates to Tardieu.

Frossard would have the alliance of the Socialists and the Radicals end
in a government of the “left” which will dissolve the Fascist
organizations and save the republic. It is difficult to imagine a more
monstrous amalgam of democratic illusions and police cynicism. When we
say – we speak of this in more detail below – that _what is needed is a
workers’ militia_, Frossard and his satellites object: “Against Fascism
one must fight not with physical but with ideological means”. When we
say only a bold mobilization of the masses, which is only possible in a
struggle against Radicalism, is capable of mining the ground under
Fascism, the same gentlemen reply to us: “No, only the police government
of Daladier-Frossard can save us.”

What pitiful prattle! For the Radicals have held the power, and if they
voluntarily ceded it to Doumergue, it was not because they lacked the
aid of Frossard but because they feared Fascism, because they feared the
big bourgeoisie which threatened it with royalist razors, and because
they feared still more the proletariat which was beginning to marshal
itself against Fascism. To cap it all, Frossard himself, taking fright
at the alarm of the Radicals, advised Daladier to capitulate.

If one supposes for an instant – an obviously unlikely hypothesis – that
the Radicals had consented to break the alliance with Doumergue for the
alliance with Frossard, the Fascist bands, this time with the direct
collaboration of the police, would have come into the streets trebly
numerous, and the Radicals, together with Frossard, would have
immediately crawled under the tables or hidden themselves in their
ministerial toilets.

But let us make one more fantastic hypothesis: the police of
Daladier-Frossard “disarm the Fascists”. Does that settle the question?
And who will disarm the same police, who with the right hand will give
back to the Fascists what they will have taken from them with the left?
The comedy of disarmament by the police will only have caused the
authority of the Fascists to increase as fighters against the capitalist
state. Blows against the Fascist gangs can prove effective only to the
extent that these gangs are at the same time politically isolated.

Meanwhile, the hypothetical government of Daladier-Frossard would give
nothing either to the workers or to the petty-bourgeois masses because
it would be unable to attack the foundations of private property, and
without expropriation of the banks, the great commercial enterprises,
the key branches of industry and transport, without foreign trade
monopoly, and without a series of other profound measures, there is no
possible way of coming to the aid of the peasant, the artisan, the petty
merchant. By its passivity, its impotence, its lies, the government of
Daladier-Frossard would provoke a tempest of revolt in the petty
bourgeoisie, and would push it definitely on the road to Fascism, if .
if this government were possible. It is necessary to recognize, however,
that Frossard is not alone. The same day (October 24) on which the
moderate Zyromsky came out in LE POPULAIRE against the attempt of
Frossard to revive the cartel, Cachin spoke up in L’HUMANITÉ to defend
the idea of a bloc with the Radical Socialists. He, Cachin, greeted with
enthusiasm the fact that the Radicals had declared for the “disarmament
of the Fascists”.

Certainly, the Radicals declared themselves for the disarmament of
everyone – workers’ organizations included. Certainly, in the hands of a
Bonapartist state, such a measure would be directed especially against
the workers. Certainly, the “disarmed” Fascists would receive on the
morrow double their arms, not without the aid of the police. But why
trouble with sombre reflections? Every man needs to hope. So there is
Cachin travelling in the footsteps of Wels and Otto Bauer who also in
their time sought salvation in the disarmament to be effected by the
police of Brüning and Dollfuss.

Executing the latest turn of 180 degrees, Cachin identifies the Radicals
with the middle classes. He sees oppressed peasants only through the
prism of Radicalism. The alliance with the petty toiling proprietors is
represented by him only in the form of a bloc with the parliamentary
careerists who are at last beginning to lose the confidence of the petty
proprietors.

Instead of nourishing and fanning the nascent revolt of the peasant and
the artisan against the “democratic” exploiters and guiding this revolt
in the direction of an alliance with the proletariat, Cachin is
preparing to support the bankrupt Radicals with the authority of the
“common front”, and thus to drive the revolt of the most exploited petty
bourgeoisie along the road of Fascism.

Theoretical sloppiness always takes cruel vengeance in revolutionary
politics. “Anti-Fascism”, like Fascism, are for the Stalinists not
concrete conceptions but two great empty sacks into which they stuff
anything that comes into their hands. For them Doumergue is a Fascist
just as before that Daladier was also for them a Fascist. In point of
fact, Doumergue is a capitalist exploiter of the Fascist wing of the
petty bourgeoisie just as Herriot is an exploiter of the radical petty
bourgeoisie. At the present time these two systems combine in the
Bonapartist régime. Doumergue is also, after his fashion, an
“anti-Fascist”, since he prefers a military and police dictatorship of
big capital to a civil war whose issue is always uncertain. For fear of
Fascism and still more for fear of the proletariat, the “anti-Fascist”
Daladier joins with Doumergue. But the régime of Doumergue is
inconceivable without the existence of the Fascist gangs. An elementary
Marxian analysis thus shows the utter futility of the idea of an
alliance with the Radicals against Fascism!

The Radicals themselves will take pains to show in action how fantastic
and reactionary are the political day dreams of Frossard and Cachin.
 

The Workers’ Militia and its Opponents

To struggle, it is necessary to conserve and strengthen the instrument
and the means of struggle – organizations, the press, meetings, etc.
Fascism threatens all of that directly and immediately. It is still too
weak for the direct struggle for power but it is strong enough to
attempt to beat down the working-class organizations bit by bit, to
temper its bands in its attacks, and to spread dismay and lack of
confidence in their forces in the ranks of the workers.

Fascism finds unconscious helpers in all those who say that the
“physical struggle” is impermissible or hopeless, and demand of
Doumergue the disarmament of his Fascist guard. Nothing is so dangerous
for the proletariat, especially in the present situation, than the
sugared poison of false hopes. Nothing increases the insolence of the
Fascists so much as “flabby pacifism” on the part of the workers’
organizations. Nothing destroys the confidence of the middle classes in
the working class as temporizing, passivity, and the absence of the will
to struggle.

LE POPULAIRE and especially L’HUMANITÉ write every day: “The united
front is a barrier against Fascism”; “the united front will not permit
“; “the Fascists will not dare”; etc. These are phrases. It is necessary
to say squarely to the workers, Socialists, and Communists: do not allow
yourselves to be lulled by the phrases of superficial and irresponsible
journalists and orators. It is a question of our heads and the future of
socialism. It is not that we deny the importance of the united front. We
demanded it when the leaders of both parties were against it. The united
front opens up numerous possibilities but nothing more. In itself, the
united front decides nothing. Only the struggle of the masses decides.
The united front will reveal its value when Communist detachments will
come to the help of Socialist detachments and vice versa in the case of
an attack by the Fascist bands against LE POPULAIRE or L’HUMANITÉ. But
for that, proletarian combat detachments must exist and be educated,
trained and armed. And if there is not an organization of defence, i.e.,
a workers’ militia, LE POPULAIRE and L’HUMANITÉ will be able to write as
many articles as they like on the omnipotence of the united front but
the two papers will find themselves defenceless before the first
well-prepared attack of the Fascists.

We propose to make a critical study of the “arguments” and the
“theories” of the opponents of the workers’ militia who are very
numerous and influential in the two working-class parties.

“We need mass self-defence and not the militia”, we are often told. But
what is this “mass self-defence” without combat organizations, without
specialized cadres, without arms? To give over the defence against
Fascism to unorganized and unprepared masses left to themselves would be
to play a role incomparably lower than the role of Pontius Pilate. To
deny the role of the militia is to deny the role of the vanguard. Then
why a party? Without the support of the masses, the militia is nothing.
But without organized combat detachments, the most heroic masses will be
smashed bit by bit by the Fascist gangs. It is nonsense to counterpose
the militia to self-defence. The militia is an organ of self-defence.

“To call for the organization of a militia”, say some opponents who, to
be sure, are the least serious and honest, “is to engage in
provocation.” This is not an argument but an insult. If the necessity
for the defence of the workers’ organizations flows from the whole
situation, how then can one not call for the creation of the militia?
Perhaps they mean to say that the creation of a militia “provokes”
Fascist attacks and government repression. In that case this is an
absolutely reactionary argument. Liberalism has always said to the
workers that by their class struggle they “provoke” the reaction.

The reformists repeated this accusation against the Marxists, the
Mensheviks against the Bolsheviks. These accusations reduced themselves,
in the final analysis, to the profound thought that if the oppressed do
not baulk, the oppressors will not be obliged to beat them. This is the
philosophy of Tolstoy and Gandhi but never that of Marx and Lenin. If
L’HUMANITÉ wants hereafter to develop the doctrine of “non-resistance to
evil by violence”, it should take for its symbol not the hammer and
sickle, emblem of the October revolution, but the pious goat which
provides Gandhi with his milk.

“But the arming of the workers is only opportune in a revolutionary
situation, which does not yet exist.” This profound argument means that
the workers must permit themselves to be slaughtered until the situation
becomes revolutionary. Those who yesterday preached the “third period”
do not want to see what is going on before their eyes. The question of
arms itself has only come forward because the “peaceful”, “normal”,
“democratic” situation has given way to a stormy, critical and unstable
situation which can transform itself into a revolutionary as well as a
counter-revolutionary situation.

This alternative depends above all on whether the advanced workers will
allow themselves to be attacked with impunity and defeated bit by bit or
will reply to every blow by two of their own, arousing the courage of
the oppressed and uniting them around their banner. A revolutionary
situation does not fall from the skies. It takes form with the active
participation of the revolutionary class and its party.

The French Stalinists now argue that the militia did not safeguard the
German proletariat from defeat. Only yesterday they completely denied
any defeat in Germany and asserted that the policy of the German
Stalinists was correct from beginning to end. Today they see the entire
evil in the German workers’ militia (ROTE FRONT). Thus from one error
they fall into a diametrically opposite one no less monstrous. The
militia in itself does not settle the question. _A correct policy is
necessary_. Meanwhile the policy of Stalinism in Germany (“social
fascism is the chief enemy”, the split of the trade unions, the
flirtation with nationalism, putschism) fatally led to the isolation of
the proletarian vanguard and to its shipwreck. With an utterly worthless
strategy no militia could have saved the situation.

It is nonsense to say that in itself the organization of the militia
leads to adventures, provokes the enemy, replaces the political struggle
by physical struggle, etc. In all these phrases there is nothing but
political cowardice.

The militia, as the strong organization of the vanguard, is in fact the
surest defence against adventures, against individual terrorism, against
bloody spontaneous explosions.

The militia is at the same time the only serious way of reducing to a
minimum the civil war which Fascism imposes upon the proletariat. Let
the workers, despite the absence of a “revolutionary situation”,
occasionally correct the “papa’s son” patriots in their own way and the
recruitment of new Fascist bands will become incomparably more
difficult.

But here the strategists, tangled in their own reasoning, bring forward
against us still more stupefying arguments. We quote textually: “If we
reply to the revolver shots of the Fascists with other revolver shots”,
writes L’HUMANITÉ of October 23 (1934), “we lose sight of the fact that
Fascism is the product of the capitalist régime and that in fighting
against Fascism it is the entire system which we face”. It is difficult
to accumulate in a few lines greater confusion of more errors. It is
impossible to defend oneself against the Fascists because they are “a
product of the capitalist régime”. That means we have to renounce the
whole struggle, for all contemporary social evils are “products of the
capitalist system”.

When the Fascists kill a revolutionist or burn down the building of a
proletarian newspaper, the workers’ are to sigh philosophically: “Alas!
Murders and arson are products of the capitalist system”, and go home
with easy consciences. Fatalist prostration is substituted for the
militant theory of Marx, to the sole advantage of the class enemy. The
ruin of the petty bourgeoisie is, of course, the product of capitalism.
The growth of the Fascist bands is, in turn, a product of the ruin of
the petty bourgeoisie. But on the other hand, the increase in the misery
and the revolt of the proletariat are also products of the sharpening of
the class struggle. Why, then, for the “Marxists” of L’HUMANITÉ are the
Fascist bands the legitimate product of capitalism and the workers’
militia the illegitimate product of the Trotskyists? It is impossible to
make head or tail of this.

“We have to deal with the whole system”, we are told. How? Over the
heads of human beings? The Fascists in the different countries began
with their revolvers and ended by destroying the whole “system” of
workers’ organizations. How else to check the armed offensive of the
enemy if not by an armed defence in order, in our turn, to go over to
the offensive?

L’HUMANITÉ now admits defence in words, but only in the form of “mass
self-defence”. The militia is harmful because, you see, it divides the
combat detachments from the masses. But why then are there independent
armed detachments among the Fascists who are not cut off from the
reactionary masses but who, on the contrary, arouse the courage and
embolden the masses by their well-organized attacks? Or perhaps the
proletarian mass is inferior in combative quality to the declassed petty
bourgeoisie?

Hopelessly tangled, L’HUMANITÉ finally begins to hesitate: it appears
that mass self-defence requires the creation of special “self-defence
groups”. In the place of the rejected militia special groups or
detachments are proposed. It would seem at first sight that there is a
difference only in the name. Certainly the name proposed by L’HUMANITÉ
means nothing. One can speak of “mass self-defence” but it is impossible
to speak of “self-defence groups” since the purpose of the groups is not
to defend themselves but the workers’ organizations. However, it is of
course not a question of the name. The “self-defence groups”, according
to L’HUMANITÉ, must renounce the use of arms in order not to fall into
“putschism”. These sages treat the working class like an infant who must
not be allowed to hold a razor in his hands. Razors, moreover, are the
monopoly, as we know, of the Camelots du Roi, who are a legitimate
“product of capitalism” and who with the aid of razors have overthrown
the “system” of democracy. In any case, how are the “self-defence
groups” going to defend themselves against the Fascist revolvers?
“Ideologically”, of course. In other words: they can only hide
themselves. Not having what they require in their hands, they will have
to seek “self-defence” in their feet. And the Fascists will in the
meanwhile sack the workers’ organizations with impunity. But if the
proletariat suffers a terrible defeat, it will at any rate not have been
guilty of “putschism”. This fraudulent chatter, parading under the
banner of “Bolshevism” arouses only disgust and loathing.

During the “third period” of happy memory, when the strategists of
L’HUMANITÉ were afflicted with barricade delirium, “conquered” the
streets every day and stamped as “social fascist” everyone who did not
share their extravagances, we predicted: “The moment these gentlemen
burn the tips of their fingers, they will become the worst
opportunists.” That prediction has now been completely confirmed. At a
time when within the Socialist Party the movement in favour of the
militia is growing and strengthening, the leaders of the so-called
Communist Party run for the hose to cool down the desire of the advanced
workers to organize themselves in fighting columns. Could one imagine a
more demoralizing or more damning work than this?
 

A Workers’ Militia Must Be Built

In the ranks of the Socialist Party sometimes this objection is heard:
“A militia must be formed but there is no need of shouting about it.”
One can only congratulate comrades who wish to protect the practical
side of the business from inquisitive eyes and ears. But it would be
much too naïve to think that a militia could be created unseen and
secretly within four walls. We need tens and later hundreds of thousands
of fighters. They will come only if millions of men and women workers,
and behind them the peasants, understand the necessity for the militia
and create around the volunteers an atmosphere of ardent sympathy and
active support. Conspiratorial care can and must envelop only the
_technical_ aspect of the matter. The _political_ campaign must be
openly developed, in meetings, factories, in the streets and on the
public squares.

The fundamental cadres of the militia must be the factory workers
grouped according to their place of work, known to each other and able
to protect their combat detachments against the provocations of enemy
agents far more easily and more surely than the most elevated
bureaucrats. Conspirative general staffs without an open mobilization of
the masses will at the moment of danger remain impotently suspended in
mid-air. Every working-class organization has to plunge into the job. In
this question there can be no line of demarcation between the
working-class parties and the trade unions. Hand in hand they must
mobilize the masses. The success of the people’s militia will then be
fully assured.

“But where are the workers going to get arms?” object the sober
“realists”, – that is to say, frightened philistines – “the enemy has
rifles, cannon, tanks, gas and aircraft. The workers have a few hundred
revolvers and pocket knives.”

In this objection everything is piled up to frighten the workers. On the
one hand, our sages identify the arms of the Fascists with the armament
of the state. On the other, they turn towards the state and demand that
it disarm the Fascists. Remarkable logic! In fact their position is
false in both cases. In France the Fascists are still far from
controlling the state. On February 6 they entered into armed conflict
with the state police. That is why it is false to speak of cannon and
tanks when it is a matter of the _immediate_ armed struggle against the
Fascists. The Fascists, of course, are richer than we. It is easier for
them to buy arms. But the workers are more numerous, more determined,
more devoted, when they are conscious of a firm revolutionary
leadership.

In addition to other sources, the workers can arm themselves at the
expense of the Fascists by systematically disarming them.

This is now one of the most serious forms of the struggle against
Fascism. When workers’ arsenals will begin to stock up at the expense of
the Fascist arms depots, the banks and trusts will be more prudent in
financing the armament of their murderous guards. It would even be
possible in this case – _but in this case only_ – that the alarmed
authorities would really begin to prevent the arming of the Fascists in
order not to provide an additional source of arms for the workers. We
have known for a long time that only a revolutionary tactic engenders,
as a by-product, “reforms” or concessions from the government.

But how to disarm the Fascists? Naturally, it is impossible to do so
with newspaper articles alone. Fighting squads must be created. An
intelligence service must be established. Thousands of informers and
friendly helpers will volunteer from all sides when they realize that
the business has been seriously undertaken by us. It requires a will to
proletarian action.

But the arms of the Fascists are of course not the only source. In
France there are more than one million organized workers. Generally
speaking, this number is small. But it is entirely sufficient to make a
beginning in the organization of a workers’ militia. If the parties and
unions armed only a tenth of their members, that would already be a
force of 100,000 men. There is no doubt whatever that the number of
volunteers who would come forward on the morrow of a “united front”
appeal for a workers’ militia would far exceed that number. The
contributions of the parties and unions, collections and voluntary
subscriptions would within a month or two make it possible to assure the
arming of 100,000 to 200,000 working-class fighters. The Fascist rabble
would immediately sink its tail between its legs. The whole perspective
of development would become incomparably more favourable.

To invoke the absence of arms or other objective reasons to explain why
no attempt has been made up to now to create a militia, is to fool
oneself and others. The principal obstacle – one can say the only
obstacle – has its roots in the conservative and passive character of
the leaders of the workers’ organizations. The sceptics who are the
leaders do not believe in the strength of the proletariat. They put
their hope in all sorts of miracles from above instead of giving a
revolutionary outlet to the energies pulsing below. The Socialist
workers must compel their leaders to pass over immediately to the
creation of the workers’ militia or else give way to younger, fresher
forces.
 

The Arming of the Proletariat

A strike is inconceivable without propaganda and without agitation. It
is also inconceivable without pickets who, when they can, use
persuasion, but when obliged, use force. The strike is the most
elementary form of the class struggle which always combines, in varying
proportions, “ideological” methods with physical methods. The struggle
against Fascism is basically a political struggle which needs a militia
just as the strike needs pickets. Basically, the picket is the embryo of
the workers’ militia. He who thinks of renouncing “physical” struggle
must renounce all struggle, for the spirit does not live without flesh.

Following the splendid phrase of the great military theoretician,
Clausewitz, war is the continuation of politics by other means. This
definition also fully applies to civil war. Physical struggle is only
“another means” of the political struggle. It is impermissible to oppose
one to the other since it is impossible to check at will the political
struggle when it transforms itself, by force of inner necessity, into a
physical struggle.

The duty of a revolutionary party is to foresee in time the
inescapability of the transformation of politics into open armed
conflict, and with all its forces to prepare for that moment just as the
ruling classes are preparing.

The militia detachments for defence against Fascism are the first step
on the road to the arming of the proletariat, not the last. Our slogan
is:

_Arm the proletariat and the revolutionary peasants._

The workers’ militia must in the final analysis embrace all the toilers.
To fulfil this program _completely_ would be possible only in a workers’
state into whose hands would pass all the means of production and
consequently also all the means of destruction, i.e., all the arms and
the factories which produce them.

However, it is impossible to arrive at a workers’ state with empty
hands. Only political invalids like Renaudel can speak of a peaceful,
constitutional road to socialism. The constitutional road is cut by
trenches held by the Fascist bands. There are not a few trenches before
us. The bourgeoisie will not hesitate to resort to a dozen _coups
d’état_ aided by the police and the army, to prevent the proletariat
from coming to power.

A workers’ socialist state can be created only by a victorious
revolution.

Every revolution is prepared by the march of economic and political
development, but it is always decided by open armed conflicts between
hostile classes. A revolutionary victory can become possible only as a
result of long political agitation, a lengthy period of education and
organization of the masses.

But the armed conflict itself must likewise be prepared long in advance.

The advanced workers must know that they will have to fight and win a
death struggle. They must reach out for arms, as a guarantee of their
emancipation.

In an era as critical as the present, the party of the revolution must
unceasingly preach to the workers the need for arming themselves and
must do everything to assure the arming, at least, of the proletarian
vanguard. Without this, victory is impossible.

The most recent electoral victories of the British Labour Party do not
at all invalidate what is said above. Even if we were to allow that the
next parliamentary elections will give the Labour Party an absolute
majority, which is not assured in any case; if we were further to allow
that the party would actually take the road of socialist transformations
– which is scarcely probable – it would immediately meet with such
fierce resistance from the House of Lords, the king, the banks, the
stock market, the bureaucracy, the press, that a split in its ranks
would become inevitable, and the left, more radical wing would become a
parliamentary minority. Simultaneously the Fascist movement would
acquire an unprecedented sweep. Alarmed by the municipal elections, the
British bourgeoisie is no doubt already actively preparing for an
extra-parliamentary struggle actively while the tops of the Labour Party
lull the proletariat with the successes and are compelled,
unfortunately, to see the British events through the rosy spectacles of
Jean Longuet. In point of fact, the less the leaders of the Labour Party
prepare for it, the more cruel will be the civil war forced upon the
proletariat by the British bourgeoisie.

“But where will you get arms for the whole proletariat?” object once
more the sceptics who mistake their own inner futility for an objective
impossibility. They forgot that the same question has been posed before
every revolution in history. And despite everything, victorious
revolutions mark important stages in the development of humanity.

The proletariat produces arms, transports them, erects the buildings in
which they are kept, defends these buildings against itself, serves in
the army and creates all its equipment. It is neither locks nor walls
which separate the proletariat from arms, but the habit of submission,
the hypnosis of class domination and nationalist poison.

It is sufficient to destroy these psychological walls – and no wall of
stone will stand in the way. It is enough that the proletariat should
want arms – and it will find them. The task of the revolutionary party
is to awaken this desire and to facilitate its realization.

But here Frossard and hundreds of frightened parliamentarians,
journalists and trade-union officials, advance their last argument, the
weightiest: “Can serious men in general place their hopes in the success
of physical struggle after the recent tragic experiences in Austria and
Spain? Think of present day technique, tanks, gas, aircraft!!” This
argument only shows that a number of “serious men” not only want to
learn nothing but in their fear even forgot what little they ever
learned.

The history of the last 20 years demonstrates with particular clarity
that the fundamental problems in the relations among classes, as among
nations, are settled by physical force. The pacifists have long hoped
that the growth of military technique would make war impossible. The
philistines have repeated for decades that the growth of military
technique would make revolution impossible. However, wars and
revolutions continue. Never have there been so many revolutions,
including victorious revolutions, as there have been since the last war
which uncovered all the might of military technique.

Frossard and Co. offer old clichés as though they were the latest
discoveries, invoking instead of automatic rifles and machine guns,
tanks and bombing planes. We reply: behind each machine there are men
who are linked not only by technical but by social and political bonds.
When historic development poses before society an un-postponable
revolutionary task as a question of life or death, when there exists a
progressive class with whose victory is joined the salvation of society
– then the development itself of the political struggle opens up before
the revolutionary class the most varied possibilities – as much to
paralyse the military force of the enemy as to win it over, at least
partially. In the mind of a philistine these possibilities always appear
as “lucky accidents” which will never be repeated. In fact, in the most
unexpected but fundamentally natural combinations, possibilities of
every sort open up in every great, i.e., truly popular, revolution. But
despite everything victory does not come of itself.

To utilize the favourable possibilities it is necessary to have a
revolutionary will, an iron determination to conquer, a bold and
perspicacious leadership. L’HUMANITÉ agrees in words with the slogan of
“arming the workers” but only to renounce it in deeds. At the present
time, according to this paper, it is inadmissible to advance a slogan
which is only opportune “in a full revolutionary crisis”. It is
dangerous to load your rifle, says the “too-prudent” hunter so long as
the game remains invisible. But when the game puts in an appearance it
is a little too late to load the rifle. Do the strategists of L’HUMANITÉ
really think that in “the full revolutionary crisis” they will be able
without any preparation to mobilize and arm the proletariat? To secure a
large quantity of arms, one needs a certain quantity on hand. One needs
military cadres. One needs the invincible desire of the masses to secure
arms. One needs uninterrupted preparatory work not only in the
gymnasiums but in indissoluble connection with the daily struggle of the
masses. This means:

It is necessary immediately to build the militia and at the same time to
carry on propaganda for the general armament of the revolutionary
workers and peasants.
 

But the Defeats in Austria and Spain ...

The impotence of parliamentarianism in the conditions of the crisis of
the whole capitalist system is so obvious that the vulgar democrats in
the camp of the workers (Renaudel, Frossard and their imitators) do not
find a single argument to defend their petrified prejudices. All the
more readily do they seize upon every defeat and every failure suffered
along the revolutionary road. The development of their thought is this:
if pure parliamentarianism offers no way out, armed struggle does no
better. The defeats of the proletarian insurrections in Austria and in
Spain are now, of course, their choice argument. In fact, in their
criticism of the revolutionary method the theoretical and political
bankruptcy of the vulgar democrats appears still more clearly than in
their defence of the methods of rotting bourgeois democracy.

No one has said that the revolutionary method automatically assures
victory. What is decisive is not the method in itself but its correct
application, the Marxist orientation in events, powerful organization,
the confidence of the masses won through long experience, a
perspicacious and bold leadership. The issue of every struggle depends
upon the moment and conditions of the conflict and the relation of
forces. Marxism is quite far from the thought that armed conflict is the
only revolutionary method, or a panacea good under all conditions.
Marxism in general knows no fetishes, neither parliamentary nor
insurrectional. There is a time and place for everything. There is one
thing that one can say at the beginning:

On the parliamentary road the socialist proletariat nowhere and never
conquered power nor ever even as yet has drawn close to it.

The governments of Scheidemann, Hermann Müller, MacDonald, had nothing
in common with socialism. The bourgeoisie permitted the Social Democrats
and Labourites to come to power only on condition that they defend
capitalism against its enemies. They scrupulously fulfilled this
condition. Purely parliamentary, anti-revolutionary socialism nowhere
and never resulted in a socialist ministry. It did succeed in producing
loathsome renegades who exploited the workers’ party to carve out
cabinet careers – Millerand, Briand, Viviani, Laval, Paul-Boncour,
Marquet.

On the other hand, historical experience shows that the revolutionary
method can lead to the conquest of power by the proletariat – in Russia
in 1917, in Germany and Austria in 1918, in Spain in 1930. In Russia
there was a powerful Bolshevik Party which prepared for the revolution
over a long period of years and knew solidly how to take over power.

The reformist parties of Germany, Austria and Spain did not prepare the
revolution, did not lead it, but suffered it.

Frightened by the power which had come into their hands against their
own will, they benevolently handed it over to the bourgeoisie. In this
way they undermined the confidence of the proletariat in itself and,
further, the confidence of the petty bourgeoisie in the proletariat.
They prepared the conditions for the growth of Fascist reaction and fell
victims to it.

Civil war, we have said, following Clausewitz, is a continuation of
politics but by other means. This means that the result of the civil war
depends for one-fourth, not to say one-tenth, upon the development of
the civil war itself, its technical means, its purely military
leadership, and for three-fourths, if not for nine-tenths, on the
political preparation. Of what does this political preparation consist?
It is in the revolutionary cohesion of the masses, in their liberation
from servile hopes in the clemency, generosity and loyalty of
“democratic slave-owners”, in the education of revolutionary cadres who
know how to defy official public opinion and who know how to display
towards the bourgeoisie one-tenth the implacability which the
bourgeoisie displays towards the toilers. Without this temper, civil war
when conditions force it – _and they always end by forcing it_ – will
take place under conditions most unfavourable for the proletariat, will
depend upon many hazards and then, even in case of military victory,
power can escape the hands of the proletariat. Whoever does not foresee
that the class struggle leads inevitably to armed conflict is blind. But
he is no less blind who fails to see behind this armed conflict and its
outcome the whole previous policy of the classes in struggle.

What was defeated in Austria was not the method of insurrection but
Austro-Marxism and in Spain unprincipled parliamentary reformism.

In 1918, the Austrian Social Democracy handed over to the bourgeoisie,
behind the back of the proletariat, the power which the latter had won.
In 1927, it not only turned away in cowardly fashion from the
proletarian insurrection which had every chance of victory, but led the
workers’ _Schutzbund_ against the insurgent masses. Thus it prepared the
victory of Dollfuss. Bauer and Co. said: “We desire peaceful evolution
but if the enemy loses his head and attacks us, then”

This formula appeared very “wise” and very “realistic”. Unfortunately,
it is on this Austro-Marxist model that Marceau Pivert also constructs
his reasoning: “If – then”. In fact, this formula is a snare for the
workers. It lulls them and deceives them. “If” means that the forms of
the struggle depend upon the goodwill of the bourgeoisie and not upon
the absolute irreconcilability of class interests. “If” means that _if_
we are wise, prudent, conciliatory, the bourgeoisie will be loyal and
everything will proceed peacefully.

Running after the phantom “if”, Otto Bauer and the other leaders of the
Austrian Social Democracy passively retreated before the reaction, ceded
one position after another, demoralized the masses, retreated again,
until they found themselves in the final impasse. There on the last
redoubt they accepted battle and lost it.

In Spain events took a different course but the causes of the defeat
were basically the same. The Socialist Party, like the Russian Socialist
Revolutionaries and Mensheviks, shared power with the republican
bourgeoisie to prevent the workers and peasants from carrying the
revolution to its conclusion. For two years the Socialists in power
helped the bourgeoisie disembarrass itself of the masses by crumbs of
national, social and agrarian reforms. Against the most revolutionary
strata of the people, the Socialists used repression.

The result was twofold. Anarcho-syndicalism, which would have melted
like wax in the heat of revolution had the workers’ party pursued a
correct course, was strengthened and drew around it the militant layers
of the proletariat. At the other pole, social catholic demagogy
succeeded in skilfully exploiting the discontent of the masses with the
bourgeois-socialist government.

When the Socialist Party was sufficiently compromised, the bourgeoisie
drove it from power and took over the offensive on the whole front. The
Socialist Party had to defend itself under the most unfavourable
conditions which had been prepared for it by its own previous policy.
The bourgeoisie already had a mass support at the right. The
anarcho-syndicalist leaders, who during the course of the revolution
committed all the mistakes typical of these professional confusionists,
refused to support the insurrection led by the traitor “politicians”.
The movement did not take on a general character but remained sporadic.
The government directed its blows at the scattered sections of the
workers. The civil war forced by the reaction ended in the defeat of the
proletariat.

From the Spanish experience it is not difficult to draw conclusions
against socialist participation in a bourgeois government. The
conclusion itself is indisputable but utterly insufficient. The alleged
“radicalism” of Austro-Marxism is in no sense any better than Spanish
ministerialism. The difference between them is technical, not political.
Both waited for the bourgeoisie to give them “loyalty” for “loyalty”.
Both led the proletariat to catastrophe.

In Spain as in Austria it was not revolutionary methods which were
defeated but opportunist methods in a revolutionary situation. It is not
the same thing!

We shall not stop here on the policy of the Communist International in
Austria and in Spain. We refer the reader to the files of LA VÉRITÉ and
a series of pamphlets of recent years. In an exceptionally favourable
situation the Austrian and Spanish Communist Parties, fettered by the
theory of the “third period” and “social Fascism”, etc., found
themselves doomed to complete isolation. Compromising the methods of
revolution by the authority of “Moscow” they barred, thereby, the road
to a truly Marxist, truly Bolshevik policy. The fundamental faculty of
revolution is to submit to a rapid and pitiless examination all
doctrines and all methods. The punishment almost immediately follows the
crime.

The responsibility of the Communist International for the defeats of the
proletariat in Germany, Austria and in Spain is incommensurable. It is
not sufficient to carry out a “revolutionary” policy (in words). A
_correct_ policy is needed. No one has yet found any other secret of
victory.
 

The United Front and the Struggle for Power

We have already said that the united front of the Socialist and
Communist Parties embodies immense possibilities. If only it wants it
seriously, it will tomorrow become master in France. But the will must
be there.

The fact that Jouhaux and, in general, the bureaucracy of the CGT remain
_outside_ the united front preserving their “independence” seems to
contradict what we say. But that is only at first sight. In an epoch of
great tasks and great dangers which bring the masses to their feet, the
barriers between the political and trade-union organizations of the
proletariat disappear. The workers want to know how to save themselves
from capital, and they are scarcely concerned with the “independence” of
Jouhaux from proletarian policy (on bourgeois policy Jouhaux is, alas,
quite dependent). If the proletarian vanguard represented in the united
front correctly treads the path of struggle, all the obstacles
established by the trade-union bureaucracy will be overthrown by the
living torrent of the proletariat. The key to the situation is now in
the united front. If it does not use this key it will play the
lamentable role which would inevitably have been played by the united
front of the Mensheviks and Socialist Revolutionaries in Russia in 1917,
if the Bolsheviks had not prevented them from doing so.

We shall not speak of the Socialist and Communist Parties in particular
because both have renounced their independence in favour of the united
front. As soon as the two working-class parties, which sharply competed
in the past, renounced mutual criticism and the winning of adherents
from each other, by that alone they ceased to exist as distinct parties.
To invoke “principled differences” which remain, changes nothing. As
soon as principled differences are not manifested openly and actively,
at a moment as laden with responsibility as the present, they cease
thereby to exist politically. They are like treasure which rests on the
bottom of the ocean. We do not predict whether the common work will end
in fusion but for the present period, which is of decisive importance
for the destiny of France, the united front operates like an incomplete
party constructed on the federalist principle.

What does the united front want? Until now it has not told the masses.
The struggle against Fascism? But until now the united front has not
explained _how_ it proposes to fight against Fascism. Besides, a purely
defensive bloc against Fascism could only suffice if in everything else
the two parties preserved complete independence. But no, we have a
united front which embraces almost the entire public activity of the two
parties and excludes their reciprocal struggle to win the majority of
the proletariat. From this situation all the consequences must be drawn.
The first and the most important is the struggle for power. The aim of
the united front can be only a government of the united front, i.e., a
Socialist-Communist government, a Blum-Cachin ministry.

This must be said openly. If the united front takes itself seriously –
and it is only on this condition that the popular masses will take it
seriously – it cannot divest itself of the slogan of conquest of power.
By what means? By every means which leads to that end.

The united front does not renounce parliamentary struggle but it
utilizes parliament above all to unmask its impotence and to explain to
the people that the present government has an extra-parliamentary base
and that it can be overthrown only by a powerful mass movement.

The struggle for power means the utilization of all the possibilities
provided by the semi-parliamentary Bonapartist régime to overthrow this
régime by a revolutionary push, to replace the bourgeois state by a
workers’ state.

The last district elections showed an increase in the Socialist and
especially the Communist vote. In itself this fact settles nothing. The
German Communist Party on the eve of its collapse had an incomparably
more striking increase of votes. New, broad strata of the oppressed are
driven to the left by the whole situation, independently even of the
policy of the extreme parties. The French Communist Party gained more
votes because by tradition it remains, despite its present conservative
policy, the “extreme left”. The masses showed by this their tendency to
give the working-class parties an impulsion _to the left_, for the
masses are infinitely more to the left than their parties. Further
testimony of this is the revolutionary spirit of the socialist youth. It
must not be forgotten that the youth is the sensitive barometer of the
whole class and its vanguard!

If the united front does not emerge from passivity or, worse still, if
it enters upon an unworthy romance with the Radicals, then to the “left”
of the united front, Anarchists, Anarcho-syndicalists and other similar
groupings of political disintegration will be strengthened. At the same
time apathy, precursor of catastrophe, will make headway.

On the other hand, the united front, assuring its rear and its flanks
against the Fascist bands, opens up a _broad political offensive under
the slogan of conquest of power_. It will awaken an echo so powerful as
to exceed the most optimistic expectations.

Only hollow charlatans for whom great mass movements shall always remain
a book sealed with seven seals can fail to understand this.
 

Not a Program of Passivity but a Program of Revolution

The struggle for power must begin with the fundamental idea that if
opposition to further aggravation of the situation of the masses under
capitalism is still possible, no real improvement of their situation is
conceivable without a revolutionary invasion of the right of capitalist
property. The political campaign of the united front must base itself
upon a well-elaborated _transition program_, i.e., on a system of
measures which with a workers’ and peasants’ government can assure the
transition from capitalism to socialism.

Now a program is needed not to ease the conscience but to guide
revolutionary action. What is a program worth if it remains a dead
letter? The Belgian Workers’ Party, for example, adopted the pompous
plan of De Man with all its “nationalizations”. But what sense was there
in it when the party did not lift its little finger to realize it?
Programs of Fascism are fantastic, false, demagogic. But Fascism carries
on a fierce struggle for power. Socialism can advance the most
scientific program but its value will be equal to zero if the vanguard
of the proletariat does not unfold a bold struggle to capture the state.
The social crisis in its political expression is the crisis of power.
The old master of society is bankrupt. A new master is needed.

If the revolutionary proletariat does not take power, Fascism will
inevitably take it!

A program of transitional demands for “the middle classes” can naturally
assume great importance if this program corresponds, on the one hand, to
the real needs of the middle classes, and on the other, to the demands
of the development towards socialism. But once more the centre of
gravity does not exist now in a special program. The middle classes have
seen many programs. What they need is confidence that the program will
be realized. The moment the peasant says: “This time it seems that the
working-class parties will not retreat” – the cause of socialism is won.

But for that it is necessary to show in action that we are firmly
prepared to smash every obstacle in our path.

There is no need of inventing means of struggle. They are provided by
the whole history of the world working-class movement.

A concentrated campaign in the working-class press pounding steadily on
the same key; real socialist speeches from the tribune of parliament,
not by tame deputies but by leaders of the people; the utilization of
every electoral campaign for revolutionary purposes; repeated meetings
to which the masses come not merely to hear the speakers but to get the
slogans and directives of the hour; the creation and strengthening of
the workers’ militia; well organized demonstrations driving the
reactionary bands from the streets; protest strikes; an open campaign
for the unification and enlargement of the trade-union ranks under the
banner of resolute class struggle; stubborn, carefully calculated
activity to win the army over to the cause of the people; broader
strikes; more powerful demonstrations; the general strike of toilers of
town and country; a general offensive against the Bonapartist government
for the workers’ and peasants’ power.

There is still time to prepare for victory. Fascism has not yet become a
mass movement. The inevitable decomposition of Radicalism will mean,
however, the narrowing of the base of Bonapartism, the growth of the two
extreme camps and the approach of the showdown. It is not a question of
years but of months. The length of this period is not fixed by anyone
but depends upon the struggle of living forces and above all upon the
policy of the proletariat and its united front.

The potential forces of the revolution exceed by far the forces of
Fascism and in general of the whole united reaction. Sceptics who think
that all is lost must be pitilessly driven out of the workers’ ranks.
From the depths of the masses come vibrant echoes to every bold word,
every truly revolutionary slogan. The masses want the struggle.

It is not the spirit of combination among parliamentarians and
journalists, but the legitimate and creative hatred of the oppressed for
the oppressors which is today the single most progressive factor in
history. It is necessary to turn to the masses, toward their deepest
layers. It is necessary to appeal to their passions and to their reason.
It is necessary to reject the false “prudence” which is a synonym for
cowardice and which, at great historical turning points, amounts to
treason. The united front must take for its motto the formula of Danton:
“_De l’audace, toujours de l’audace, et encore de l’audace_.” To
understand the situation fully and to draw from it all the practical
conclusions, boldly and without fear and to the end, is to assure the
victory of socialism.


Leon Trotsky

Whither France?

------------------------------------------------------------------------



ONCE AGAIN, WHITHER FRANCE?


(March 28, 1935)

 

At the time that Flandin succeeded Doumergue we posed before the
vanguard of the proletariat the question: “Whither France?” The four and
a half months which have since elapsed have changed nothing essentially
and have weakened neither our analyses nor our prognoses.

The French people have arrived at the crossroads: one way leads to the
socialist revolution; the other to Fascist catastrophe. The choice
depends on the working class. At its head is the organized vanguard.
Again we put the question: “Where will the proletarian vanguard lead
France?”

In January, the CEC of the Socialist Party launched a program of
_struggle for power, the destruction of the mechanism of the bourgeois
state, the setting up of the workers’ and peasants’ democracy, the
expropriation of banks and heavy industry_. However, up to the present,
the party has not made the slightest attempt to bring this program
before the masses. The Communist Party, in turn, has absolutely refused
to come out for the struggle for power. The reason? “The situation is
not revolutionary.”

The workers’ militia? The arming of the workers? Workers’ control? A
plan of nationalization? Impossible. “The situation is not
revolutionary.” What, then, can we do? Launch weighty petitions with the
clergy, compete in empty eloquence with the Radical Socialists and wait?
Wait how long? Until the situation becomes revolutionary of its own
accord. The scholarly doctors of the Communist International have a
thermometer which they place under the tongue of old lady History, and
by this means they infallibly determine the revolutionary temperature.
But they don’t show anyone their thermometer.

We submit: the diagnosis of the Comintern is entirely false. The
situation is revolutionary, as revolutionary as it can be, _granted the
non-revolutionary policies of the working-class parties_. More exactly,
the situation is pre-revolutionary. In order to bring the situation to
its full maturity, there must be an immediate, vigorous, unremitting
mobilization of the masses, under the slogan of the conquest of power in
the name of socialism. This is the only way through which the
pre-revolutionary situation will be changed into a revolutionary
situation. On the other hand, if we continue to mark time, the
pre-revolutionary situation will inevitably be changed into one of
counter-revolution, and will bring on the victory of Fascism.

At the present time, all that the pious mouthings of the phrase
“non-revolutionary situation” can do is to crush the minds of the
workers, paralyse their will and hand them over to the class enemy.
Under the cover of such phrases, conservatism, indolence, stupidity and
cowardice take possession of the leadership of the proletariat, and the
ground is laid, as it was in Germany, for catastrophe.

In the pages which follow, we, the Bolshevik-Leninists, will submit the
analyses and predictions of the Communist International to detailed,
Marxist criticism. At times we will touch on the points of view of
various Socialist leaders, to the extent that this is needed for our
fundamental purpose: namely, to show the radical falsity of the policies
of the Central Committee of the French Communist Party. To the shouts
and insults of the Stalinists we oppose facts and arguments.

We shall not, of course, stop with a merely negative criticism. To the
false points of view and false slogans we shall oppose the creative
ideas and methods of Marx and Lenin.

We ask the reader to pay close attention. We are concerned here in the
most immediate and literal sense with the lives of the French workers.
No class conscious worker has the right to be passive in the face of
these problems, upon the solution of which depends the fate of his
class.
 

How a Revolutionary Situation Arises

The first and most important premise of a revolutionary situation is the
most intense sharpening of the contradictions between the productive
forces and the property relations. _The nation stops going forward_. The
arrest in the economic development and, even more, its regression
signify that the capitalist system of production is definitely worn out
and must give way to the socialist system.

The present crisis, which encompasses all countries and thrusts economy
back decades, has definitely pushed the bourgeois system to absurdity.
If, at the dawn of capitalism, ignorant and starving workers broke
machines, today it is the capitalists themselves who destroy machines
and factories. The further maintenance of the private ownership of the
means of production threatens humanity with degeneration and barbarism.

The basis of society is economic. That basis is ripe for socialism in a
double sense: modern technology has advanced to a point where it can
assure a high standard of living to the nation and to all mankind; but
the capitalist property system, which has outlived itself, dooms the
masses to ever-increasing poverty and suffering.

The fundamental premise of socialism – that is, the economic premise –
has already been present for some time. But capitalism will not
disappear from the scene _automatically_. Only the working class can
seize the forces of production from the stranglehold of the exploiters.
History places this task squarely before us. If the proletariat is, for
one reason or another, incapable of routing the bourgeoisie and of
seizing power, if it is, for example, paralysed by its own parties and
trade unions, the continued decay of economy and civilization will
follow, calamities will pile up, despair and prostration will engulf the
masses, and capitalism – decrepit, decayed, rotting – will strangle the
people with increasing strength, and will thrust them into the abyss of
a new war.

_Other than the socialist revolution, there is no way out_.

At first the presidium of the Comintern tried to explain that the crisis
which started in 1929 was the last crisis of capitalism. Two years
afterwards, Stalin declared that the present crisis, “truly understood”,
was not yet the last. We also meet the same attempt at prophecy in the
Socialist camp: “Is it the final crisis, or is it not?”

“It is imprudent to say”, wrote Blum in POPULAIRE, February 23, “that
the present crisis is the final spasm of capitalism, the last death
throe before agony and decay.” Grumbach had the same point of view when
he said at Mulhouse on February 26: “Some say this crisis is a passing
phase, others see it as the final crisis of capitalism. We do not yet
dare to take a definite position.”

In this manner of putting the question there are two cardinal errors:
first, it confuses the _cyclical crisis_ with the _historical crisis of
the whole capitalist system_; second, it assumes that independently of
the conscious activity of classes, a crisis can be _by itself_ the
“last” crisis.

Under the domination of industrial capital, in the era of free
competition, the cyclical booms exceeded by far the crises: the first
were the “rule”, the second the “exception”. Capitalism in its entirety
was advancing. Since the war, with the domination of monopoly finance
capital, the cyclical crises far exceed the upswings. We may say that
the crises have become the “rule” and the booms the “exceptions”;
economic development in its entirety has been going down and not up.

However, the cyclical oscillations are inevitable, and, with capitalism
in decline, they will continue as long as capitalism exists. And
capitalism will continue until the proletarian revolution is achieved.
This is the only correct answer to the question: “Is this the final
crisis of capitalism?”

The revolutionary worker must, before all else, understand that Marxism,
the only scientific theory of the proletarian revolution, has nothing in
common with the fatalistic hope for the “final” crisis. Marxism is, in
its very essence, a set of directives for revolutionary action. Marxism
does not overlook will and courage, but rather aids them to find the
right road.

There is no crisis which can be, by itself, fatal to capitalism. The
oscillations of the business cycle only create a situation in which it
will be easier, or more difficult, for the proletariat to overthrow
capitalism. The transition from a bourgeois society to a socialist
society presupposes the activity of living men who are the makers of
their own history. They do not make history by accident, or according to
their caprice, but under the influence of objectively determined causes.
However, their own actions – their initiative, audacity, devotion, and
likewise their stupidity and cowardice – are necessary links in the
chain of historical development.

The crises of capitalism are not numbered, nor is it indicated in
advance which one of these will be the “last”. But our entire epoch and,
above all, the present crisis imperiously command the proletariat:
“Seize power!” If, however, the party of the working class, in spite of
favourable conditions, reveals itself incapable of leading the
proletariat to the seizure of power, the life of society will continue
necessarily upon capitalist foundations – until a new crisis, a new war,
perhaps until the complete disintegration of European civilization.

The imperialist war of 1914-18 was also a “crisis” in the career of
capitalism, and, indeed, the most terrible of all possible crises. No
book carried the prediction whether the war would be the last _bloody_
folly of capitalism. The experience of Russia showed that the war
_might_ have been the end of capitalism. In Germany and Austria, the
fate of bourgeois society in 1918 depended entirely upon the Social
Democracy, but the Social Democracy revealed itself as the handmaiden of
capitalism. In Italy and France, the proletariat might have seized power
at the end of the war, but it did not have a revolutionary party at its
head. In a word, if the Second International had not, at the time of the
war, betrayed the cause of socialism to bourgeois patriotism, the whole
history of Europe and of mankind might today be entirely different.
Assuredly, the past is irrevocable. But one can, and one ought, to learn
the lessons of the past.

The development of Fascism is, in itself, irrefutable witness to the
fact that the working class has been tragically late in fulfilling the
task imposed upon it a long time ago by the decline of capitalism.

The phrase “this is not yet the ‘last’ crisis” can have only one
meaning: in spite of the lessons of the war and the convulsions of the
post-war period, the working-class parties are not yet able to prepare
either themselves or the proletariat for the seizure of power; still
worse, the leaders of these parties do not yet understand the task
confronting them – they reject it for themselves, their party and their
class, and hand it over to “the process of historical development”.
Their fatalism is a betrayal of the theory of Marxism, and a
justification for a political betrayal of the proletariat, that is, the
preparation for a new capitulation to a new “last” war.

* * *

The fatalism of the Social Democracy is a heritage of the pre-war
period, when capitalism was advancing almost without interruption, when
the number of workers was increasing, and when the number of party
members, votes at elections and parliamentary representatives was
growing. From this automatic rise was born little by little the
reformist illusion that it was enough to continue along the old road
(propaganda, elections, organization) and victory would come of itself.

The war, no doubt, interfered with this automatic development. But the
war was an “exceptional” phenomenon. With the help of Geneva there would
be no new war, everything would return to normal and the automatic
development would be re-established.

In the light of this perspective, the words “This is not yet the ‘last’
crisis” meant: “In five years, in ten years or in 20 years, we will have
more votes, more representatives, and then, let us hope, we shall take
power.” (See the articles and lectures of Paul Faure.) This optimistic
fatalism, which seemed convincing for a quarter of a century, today
resounds like a voice from the grave. It is a radically false idea that
in going towards the future crisis the proletariat will inevitably
become more powerful than at present. With the further inevitable decay
of capitalism, the proletariat will not grow and reinforce itself but
will decompose, constantly increasing the army of the unemployed and
slum proletariat. The petty bourgeoisie, meanwhile, will be declassed
and sink into despair. Loss of time holds out the perspective of
Fascism, and not of proletarian revolution.

It is worth remarking that the Comintern, bureaucratized to the marrow,
has replaced the theory of revolutionary action with a religion of
fatalism. It is impossible to fight because there is no “revolutionary
situation”. But a revolutionary situation does not fall from the sky. It
comes about in the class struggle. The party of the working class is the
most important _political_ factor in the development of a revolutionary
situation. If this party turns its back on its revolutionary task,
lulling the workers to sleep and deceiving them into playing with
petitions and fraternizing with Radical Socialists, the situation that
comes about will be not revolutionary, but counter-revolutionary.

The _decline of capitalism_, together with the extraordinary high level
of the productive forces, is the economic premise of the socialist
revolution. On this foundation the _class struggle_ takes place. A
_revolutionary situation_ develops and matures in the living struggle of
the classes.

How does the big bourgeoisie, master of modern society, size up the
present situation? And what is it doing? The 6th of February, 1934, was
unexpected only by the organizations of the working class and the petty
bourgeoisie. The leading bodies of finance capital prepared the plot
over a long period of time, intending, by violence, to substitute
Bonapartism (“personal” rule) for parliamentarianism. That is to say,
the banks, the trusts, the general staff, the capitalist press believed
the danger of revolution to be so close, so immediate, they hastened to
prepare for it by a “little” _coup d’état_.

Two important conclusions follow from this fact: 1) the capitalists, at
the beginning of 1934, believed the situation to be revolutionary; 2)
they were not content to await passively the development of events, to
resort to “legalistic” defence at the last minute, but they took the
initiative themselves by sending their gangs into the streets. The big
bourgeoisie taught the workers an inestimable lesson in the strategy of
class warfare.

L’HUMANITÉ maintains that the “United Front” drove Doumergue out of
office. But that is hollow bombast, to say the least. On the contrary,
if finance capital believed it possible and feasible to replace
Doumergue by Flandin, it is precisely because the United Front, as
experience proved to the bourgeoisie, does not yet represent an
immediate revolutionary danger. “Since the formidable leaders of the
Comintern, in spite of the situation in France, did not prepare for
struggle, but trembled with fear, that means that we can wait a while
before making use of Fascism. It is useless to force events and
compromise the Radical Socialists prematurely, since we may still have
need of them.” This is what the true masters of the situation said. They
upheld the Cabinet of the National Union and its Bonapartist decrees,
they terrorized parliament, but they allowed Doumergue to go back to
sleep. Thus the leaders of the bourgeoisie introduced a certain
correction into their first analysis, recognizing that the situation was
not so much immediately revolutionary as pre-revolutionary.

A second remarkable lesson in class strategy! It shows that even finance
capital, with the levers of the whole social machine under its control,
cannot infallibly estimate, at a single a priori glance, the full
reality of a political situation. It enters into the struggle and, in
the development of the struggle, on the basis of experience gained in
the struggle, it corrects its analysis and makes it more precise. This,
in general, is the only possible method in political questions of being
oriented correctly and at the same time actively.

And the leaders of the Communist International? In Moscow, away from the
French working class, a few badly informed, mediocre bureaucrats – the
majority of them even unable to read French – pronounced an infallible
diagnosis, with the aid of their thermometer: “The situation is not
revolutionary.” The Central Committee of the French Communist Party is
obliged to close its eyes and ears and repeat this hollow phrase. The
road of the Communist International is the shortest road to the abyss!

* * *

The Radical Socialist Party represents that political instrument of the
big bourgeoisie which is the best adapted to the traditions and
prejudices of the petty bourgeoisie. In spite of this, the most
responsible leaders of Radical Socialism, under the whip of finance
capital, bowed humbly before the _coup d’état_ of February 6, though it
was directed in the first instance against them. For they recognized
that the development of the class struggle threatened the fundamental
interests of the “nation”, that is to say, of the bourgeoisie, and they
felt obliged to sacrifice the parliamentary interests of their party.
The capitulation of the most powerful parliamentary party before the
guns and knives of the Fascists is an external expression of the
complete upset in the political equilibrium of the country. But to say
this – is to say that the situation is revolutionary, or, more exactly,
pre-revolutionary.

The development which is taking place among the masses of the petty
bourgeoisie has exceptional importance for an understanding of the
political situation. The political crisis of the country is above all a
collapse of the confidence of the petty-bourgeois masses in their
traditional parties and leaders. _The discontent, the nervousness, the
instability, the fluidity of the petty bourgeoisie_ are extremely
important characteristics of a pre-revolutionary situation. As a sick
man, burning with fever, tosses from right side to left, so the feverish
petty bourgeoisie can turn to the right or to the left. In the coming
period, the side towards which millions of French peasants, artisans,
small merchants and minor officials turn will determine whether the
present pre-revolutionary situation will develop into a revolutionary or
a counter-revolutionary situation.

The alleviation of the economic crisis might – though not for long –
retard, but not stop, the shifting of the petty bourgeoisie to the right
or the left. On the other hand, if the crisis becomes intensified, the
bankruptcy of Radical Socialism and of all the parliamentary groupings
around it will proceed with redoubled speed.

It must not be thought that Fascism has to become a strong parliamentary
party before it can take over power. This was the case in Germany, but
not in Italy. In order that Fascism should succeed, it is not necessary
that the petty bourgeoisie should break _beforehand_ with the old
“democratic” parties. It is enough if the petty bourgeoisie has lost its
confidence in these parties, and looks uneasily about it for new roads.

In the next municipal elections the petty bourgeoisie may still give a
large number of votes to the Radicals and similar groupings, in the
absence of a new political party which could succeed in gaining the
confidence of the peasants and the urban middle classes. And,
nevertheless, a Fascist military _coup_, with the aid of the big
bourgeoisie, might take place a few months after the elections; and by
its influence attract the sympathies of the most desperate layers of the
petty bourgeoisie.

That is why it would be a serious illusion to take consolation in the
thought that the Fascist banner has not yet become popular in the
provinces and the villages. The anti-parliamentary tendencies of the
petty bourgeoisie, after breaking away from the channel of the official
parliamentary politics of the old parties, may directly and immediately
support a military _coup d’état_ when that becomes necessary for the
safety of finance capital. Such a method of action is most closely
adapted to the traditions and temperament of France.

The outcome of elections has, of course, a symptomatic importance. But
to rely on this index _alone_ would be to fall victim to parliamentary
cretinism. We are dealing with much more profound processes which, one
fine day, will catch our friends, the parliamentarians, off guard. Here,
as in other matters, the question is settled not by arithmetic, but by
the dynamics of the struggle. The big bourgeoisie does not register
passively the evolution of the middle classes, but, rather, prepares
tentacles of steel with which to seize these tortured and despairing
masses at the opportune moment.

* * *

Marxist thought is _dialectical_, it considers all phenomena in their
development, in their transition from one state to another. The thought
of the conservative petty bourgeois is _metaphysical_; its conceptions
are fixed and immovable, and between phenomena it supposes that there
are unbridgeable gaps. The absolute opposition of a revolutionary
situation to a non-revolutionary situation is a classic example of
metaphysical thought, according to the axiom: whatever is, is: whatever
is not, is not: and anything else is the Devil’s doing.

In the processes of history we find stable situations which are
altogether non-revolutionary. We find likewise situations which are
obviously revolutionary. And again, there are counter-revolutionary
situations (we had better not forget them!). But the most striking
features of our epoch of capitalism in decay are _intermediate_ and
_transitional:_ situations between the non-revolutionary and the
pre-revolutionary, between the pre-revolutionary and the revolutionary
or . the counter-revolutionary. It is precisely these transitional
stages which have a decisive importance from the point of view of
political strategy.

What would we say about an artist who could distinguish only between the
two opposite colours in the spectrum? That he had no sense of colour or
was half-blind, and that he ought to give up the easel. What will we say
about a political strategist who can distinguish only between the two
states: “revolutionary” and “non-revolutionary"? That he is not a
Marxist, but a Stalinist, who might make a good functionary but never a
proletarian leader.

A revolutionary situation develops out of the reciprocal action of
objective and subjective factors. If the party of the proletariat is
incapable of analysing in time the tendencies of a pre-revolutionary
situation we shall inevitably have a counter-revolutionary situation.
_The French proletariat now faces this danger_. The short-sighted,
passive, opportunist policies of the United Front – above all of the
Stalinists, who have become its right wing – are _the chief obstacle in
the path of the proletarian revolution in France_.
 

Immediate Demands and the Struggle for Power

The Central Committee of the Communist Party rejects the struggle for
the nationalization of the means of production as a demand incompatible
with the existence of the bourgeois state. But the Central Committee
likewise rejects the struggle for power in order to create the workers’
state. To these tasks it opposes a program of “immediate demands”.

_As a matter of fact the United Front now has no program at all_. At the
same time, the experiences of the Communist Party itself in the struggle
for “immediate demands” has been of an extremely unfortunate character.
All speeches, articles and resolutions on the necessity of combating
capitalism by strikes have up to now resulted in nothing, or almost
nothing. In spite of the situation in the country, which is becoming
more and more acute, the working class is in a state of _dangerous
stagnation_.

The Central Committee of the Communist Party accuses everybody except
itself of being guilty of this stagnation. We do not want to whitewash
anybody. Our point of view is well known. But we believe that the _chief
obstacle_ on the path to the development of the revolutionary struggle
right now is the one-sided, almost maniacal program of “immediate
demands”, which contradicts the whole situation. We wish now, at
sufficient length, to throw some light on the considerations and the
arguments of the Central Committee of the Communist Party. Not that
these arguments are either serious or profound: on the contrary, they
are miserable. But we are dealing with the question upon which the fate
of the French proletariat depends.

The most authoritative document on the question of “immediate demands”
is the programmatic resolution of the Central Committee of the Communist
Party (see L’HUMANITÉ, Feb. 24, 1935). Let us examine this document.

The outline of the immediate demands is given in vague general terms:
against wage cuts, for increased social insurance, for collective
bargaining, “against inflation”, etc. Nothing is said about the
character that the struggle for these demands can and must have under
the conditions of the present social crisis. However, every worker knows
that with two millions of partially or wholly unemployed, the ordinary
trade-union struggle for collective bargaining is utopian. Under present
conditions, in order to force the capitalists to make important
concessions, we must _break their wills_; this can be done only by a
revolutionary offensive. But a revolutionary offensive, which opposes
one class to another, cannot be developed solely under slogans of
partial economic demands. We have here a vicious circle. This is the
principal reason for the stagnation of the United Front.

The general Marxist thesis, “Social reforms are only the by-products of
the revolutionary struggle,” has in the epoch of the decline of
capitalism the most immediate and burning importance. The capitalists
are able to cede _something_ to the workers only if they are threatened
with the danger of losing _everything_.

However, even the greatest “concessions” of which contemporary
capitalism – itself in a blind alley – is capable, are completely
insignificant in comparison with the misery of the masses and the depth
of the social crisis. This is why the most immediate of all demands must
be for the _expropriation of the capitalists and the nationalization
(socialization) of the means of production_. But is not this demand
unrealizable under the rule of the bourgeoisie? Quite so! That is why we
must seize power.

The resolution of the Central Committee recognizes in passing that “the
Party has not yet succeeded in organizing and extending the resistance
to the offensive of capitalism,” but the resolution does not stop at all
to consider the question why, in spite of the efforts of the Communist
Party and the CGTU, the successes in the defensive economic struggles
are completely insignificant. Millions of workers and wage earners
participated in the general strike of February 12, which did not make
any “immediate demands”. However, up to the present, only a small
fraction of this number has participated in the defence against the
offensive of capitalism. Does not this astonishingly clear fact lead the
“leaders” of the Communist Party to draw any conclusion? Why is it that
millions of workers risked participation in a general strike, in violent
demonstrations in the streets, in battles with the Fascist gangs, but
refuse to participate in strikes of a purely economic character?

“We must understand”, says the resolution, “the feelings which agitate
the workers, who want to proceed to action.” We must understand, but the
misfortune is that the authors of the resolution themselves understand
nothing. Whoever goes to workers’ meetings knows as well as we that
general talk about immediate demands usually leaves the audience in a
state of complete indifference; on the other hand, clear and precise
revolutionary slogans get a sympathetic response. This difference in the
reaction of the masses characterizes the political situation in the
country in the clearest possible manner.

“In the present period,” the resolution unexpectedly states, “the
economic struggle requires _heavy sacrifices_ on the part of the
workers.” It ought to have added further: and it is only in exceptional
cases that the sacrifices promise any positive results. However, the
struggle for immediate demands has for its task the _alleviation_ of the
condition of the workers. By putting this economic struggle at the head
of the list and by renouncing revolutionary slogans for its sake, the
Stalinists no doubt believe that it is precisely the partial economic
struggle which can best arouse large masses. The truth is just the
opposite: the masses make hardly any response to appeals for strikes on
a purely economic plane. In politics, how can anyone avoid facing the
facts?

The masses understand or feel that, under the conditions of the crisis
and of unemployment, partial economic conflicts require unheard of
sacrifices which will never be justified in any case by the results
obtained. The masses wait for and demand other and more efficacious
methods. Messrs. strategists, learn from the masses: they are guided by
a sure revolutionary instinct.

Basing themselves on badly assimilated citations from Lenin, the
Stalinists repeat: “Strike struggles are possible even in times of
crisis.” They do not understand that there are crises and crises. In the
epoch when capitalism was on the ascendant, both industrialists and
workers, even during an acute crisis, looked forward toward the next
boom period. _But the present crisis is the rule, not the exception_. On
the purely economic level, the working class is thrown into a disorderly
retreat by the terrific pressure of the economic catastrophe. On the
other hand, the decline of capitalism, with all its weight, pushes the
proletariat on the road toward the revolutionary mass struggle for
political power. However, the leadership of the Communist Party tries
with all its force to bar this road. Thus in the hands of the Stalinists
the program of “immediate demands” becomes an instrument for the
disorientation and disorganization of the proletariat. But _a political
offensive_ (a struggle for power) with an active defence army (militia)
would at once alter the relationship of class forces and would at the
same time, _even for the most backward layers of the working class_,
open up the possibility for a victorious _economic struggle_.

Capitalism in its death throes, as we know, also has its cycles, but
these cycles are declining and diseased. Only the proletarian revolution
can put an end to the crisis of the _capitalist system_. The _cyclical_
crisis will inevitably give way to a new and brief upturn, if neither
war nor revolution intervenes.

In case of an upturn in the business cycle, the strike struggles no
doubt will have more extensive possibilities. This is why it is
necessary to follow closely the movement of trade and industry,
particularly the changes in employment, without capitulating to the
meteorologists of the school of Jouhaux and all the while giving
practical help to the workers in applying pressure to the capitalists at
the necessary moment. But even in the case of extensive strike struggles
it would be criminal to have them limited to partial economic demands.
The upturn in the business cycle can be neither considerable nor of long
duration, for we now are confronted with the cycle of a capitalism which
is irremediably diseased. The new crisis, after a brief upturn, will be
found to be more devastating than the present. All the fundamental
problems will rise up anew with redoubled force and sharpness. If we
lose time, the growth of Fascism will be found irresistible.

But today the economic upturn is no more than a hypothesis. The
actuality is a deepening of the crisis, the two-year term of military
service, the rearmament of Germany, the danger of war.

This actuality must be our point of departure.

* * *

The last idea in the programmatic resolution of the Central Committee
worthily crowns the whole structure. Let us quote literally: “While
fighting every day in order to relieve the toiling masses from the
misery which the capitalist régime imposes upon them, the Communists
_emphasize_ that final emancipation can be gained only by the abolition
of the capitalist régime and the setting up of the dictatorship of the
proletariat.” This formula did not sound so bad at the dawn of Social
Democracy half a century or more ago. At that time, and not without
success, the Social Democracy guided the struggle of the workers for
immediate demands and isolated reforms, for what they called the
“minimum program”, all the time emphasizing that the _final_
emancipation of the proletariat could be realized only by the
revolution. The “final goal” of socialism was at that time seen across
the cloudy distance of the years. It is this conception, which was
completely outworn already at the beginning of the war, that the Central
Committee of the Communist Party has unexpectedly transported into our
epoch, repeating it word for word to the last comma. And these people
invoke the names of Marx and Lenin!

When they “emphasize” that “the final emancipation” can be obtained only
by the abolition of the capitalist régime they manipulate this
elementary truth in order to deceive the workers. For they give the
workers the idea that a certain alleviation, even an important
alleviation in their condition can be obtained within the framework of
the present régime. They picture rotting and declining capitalism in the
same way that their fathers and grandfathers pictured robust and
ascending capitalism. The fact is indisputable: the Stalinists have
taken over the refuse of reformism.

The Marxist political thesis must be the following: “While explaining
constantly to the masses that rotting capitalism has no place either for
the alleviation of their situation or even for the maintenance of their
customary level of misery, while putting openly before the masses the
tasks of the socialist revolution as the immediate task of our day,
while mobilizing the workers for the conquest of power, while defending
the workers’ organizations with the help of the workers’ militia – the
Communists (or the Socialists) will at the same time lose no opportunity
to snatch this or that partial concession from the enemy, or at least to
prevent the further lowering of the living standard of the workers.”

Compare this thesis carefully with the lines cited above from the
resolution of the Central Committee. The difference, we hope, is clear.
In one instance, _Stalinism_; in the other, _Leninism_. Between them
lies an abyss.

Higher wages, collective bargaining, against inflation. But what about
unemployment? The resolution of the Central Committee will come to our
help here also. Let us quote:

“They (the Communists) demand public works. To this end, they have
elaborated specific proposals adapted to each local and regional
situation, and have prescribed the means for financing them (a capital
levy, government loans, etc.).”

Isn’t this astonishing? This charlatan’s recipe is copied almost word
for word from Jouhaux: the Stalinists reject the progressive demands of
his “plan”, and adopt the most fantastic and utopian parts.

The principal productive forces of society are paralysed or
half-paralysed by the crisis. The workers are in a stupor before the
machines which they have created. Our saviour, the Central Committee,
proposes: outside of the real capitalist economy, alongside it, we shall
create another capitalist economy on the basis of “public works”.

Don’t let anyone tell us that we are dealing here with temporary
undertakings: present unemployment does not have a temporary character;
it is not merely cyclical unemployment, but structural unemployment, the
most deadly expression of the decline of capitalism. To do away with it,
the Central Committee proposes to create a system of public works
adapted to each region of the country, with the help of a special system
of financing, alongside of the disarranged finances of capitalism. In a
word, the Central Committee of the Communist Party proposes quite simply
that capitalism change its residence. And it is this “plan” that is
counterposed to the struggle for power and a program of nationalization!
_There are no worse opportunists than frightened adventurists_.

On the problem of how to get public works, a capital levy, government
loans, etc., the resolution says not a word. No doubt, with the help of
. petitions. This is the most opportune and the most efficacious method
of action. Neither crises, nor Fascism, nor militarism, can put up a
fight against petitions. Moreover, petitions will revive the paper
industry and thus relieve unemployment. Let us take note: the
organization of petitions is a fundamental part of the system of public
works according to the plan of Thorez and company.

Whom are these people making fun of? Of themselves, or of the working
class?

“It is astonishing that the proletariat endures passively such
privations and such terror after a class struggle of more than a
century.” On every occasion we hear this lofty phrase from the mouth of
a Socialist or a Communist in his study. Is there insufficient
resistance? The blame is put on the backs of the working masses. As if
the parties and the unions stood apart from the proletariat and were not
its organs of struggle! It is precisely because the proletariat, as the
result of its more than a century-old struggles, has created its
political and trade-union organizations, that it is difficult and almost
impossible for it to carry on the struggle against capitalism _without
them_ and _against them_. What was built as the main spring of action
has become a dead weight, a brake.

The whole situation imbues the workers with the idea that revolutionary
actions are necessary to change all the conditions of existence. But
precisely because it is a question of a decisive struggle, which must
include millions of men, the initiative naturally rests with the
_directing organizations_, with the working-class parties, with the
United Front. From them must come a clear program, slogans, the
mobilization for battle. In order to rouse the masses, the parties must
themselves be aroused, and must launch a strenuous revolutionary
campaign throughout the country. But the directing organizations, the
Communist Party included, haven’t the courage. The Communist Party
tosses its tasks and its responsibilities on to the masses. It wants
millions of men, left by it without revolutionary leadership, to engage
in isolated struggles for partial demands and to show sceptical
bureaucrats that they are ready to do battle. Perhaps after that the big
chiefs will consent to command an offensive. In place of _directing_ the
masses, the bureaucratic Central Committee _examines_ the masses, flunks
them, and thus justifies its own opportunism and cowardice.

During the time of relative economic and political stability in France
(1929-33), the Central Committee of the Communist Party proclaimed the
“Third Period”, and would not be satisfied with anything less than the
conquest of the streets at the barricades. Now, at the time of the
economic, social and political crisis, the same Central Committee is
satisfied with a modest program of “immediate demands”. This absurd
contradiction is the complex product of many factors: fright at former
errors, inability to understand the masses, the bureaucratic habit of
laying down a blue print for the proletariat – and, finally,
intellectual anarchy, the result of zigzags, falsifications, lies and
repressions without number.

The first author of the new program is, no doubt, the present “leader”
of the Comintern, Béla Kun, who goes day by day further on the road from
adventurism to opportunism. After reading in Lenin that the Bolsheviks
were for strikes _under certain conditions_, and the Mensheviks against
them, in the wink of an eye Béla Kun founded his “realistic” policies on
this discovery. But to his misfortune, Béla Kun had not opened Lenin .
at the right page.

During certain periods, purely economic strike struggles did in fact
play an enormous role in the revolutionary movement of the Russian
proletariat. Now, Russian capitalism was not rotting at that time, but
was growing and advancing rapidly. The Russian proletariat was a virgin
class, and the strikes were for it the first form of awakening and
activity. Finally, the extensive spread of the strikes coincided each
time with a rise in the business cycle.

None of these conditions exists in France. The proletariat has behind it
a mighty schooling of revolution, of trade-union and parliamentary
struggle, with the whole positive and negative heritage of this rich
past. From this, one would hardly expect a spontaneous strike wave in
France, even in a period of a rise in the business cycle, and still more
so while the cyclical crisis deepens the misery of declining capitalism.

The other side of the question is not less important. At the time of the
first impetuous strike wave in Russia, there was only a single fraction
of the Russian Social Democracy which tried to restrict it to partial
economic demands: this was the group called the “Economists”. In their
opinion, it was necessary to reject the slogan, “Down with Autocracy!”
until the appearance of a “revolutionary situation”. Lenin thought that
the “Economists” were miserable opportunists. He showed that _a
revolutionary situation must be actively prepared_, even during a strike
movement.

In general, it is absurd to try to carry over mechanically into France
the various stages and episodes of the Russian revolutionary movement.
But it is even more absurd to do it after the manner of Béla Kun, who
understands neither Russia, nor France, nor Marxism. In the school of
Lenin, we must learn _the method of action_, and not try to change
Leninism into citations and recipes, good for every occasion in life.

* * *

Thus, the situation in France, in the opinion of the Stalinists, is not
revolutionary; revolutionary slogans, on this analysis, are out of
place; we must concentrate all attention on economic strikes and on
partial demands. This is the program. It is an opportunist and a
lifeless program, but still, it’s a program.

Alongside it there is, however, another. L’HUMANITÉ repeats every day
the triple slogan: “Peace, Bread, Freedom”. It was under this slogan,
L’HUMANITÉ explains, that the Bolsheviks conquered in 1917. Following
the example of the Stalinists, Just repeats the same idea. Very good.
But in 1917, in Russia, there was a situation notoriously revolutionary.
How then can this slogan, which assured the success of the proletarian
revolution, be any good along with “immediate demands” in a
non-revolutionary situation? Let the seers of L’HUMANITÉ explain this
mystery to us simple mortals.

On our part, we recall that “immediate demands” reinforced the triple
slogan of the Bolsheviks.

“_For Peace_”. That meant in 1917, under the war conditions, struggle
against all the patriotic parties from the monarchists to the
Mensheviks, the demand for the publication of the secret treaties, the
revolutionary mobilization of the soldiers against the general staff,
and fraternization at the front. “For Peace!” That meant defiance of the
militarism of Austria and Germany on one side, and of the Allies on the
other. The slogan of the Bolsheviks thus meant the most daring and
revolutionary policy ever known in the history of mankind.

To “struggle” for peace in 1935, in alliance with Herriot and the
bourgeois “pacifists” (that is to say, the hypocritical imperialists),
means simply to uphold the _status quo_, which is satisfactory at the
present moment to the French bourgeoisie. It means to put the workers to
sleep and to demoralize them with illusions about “disarmament” and
“non-aggression pacts”, with the lie of the League of Nations, while
preparing a new capitulation of the working-class parties at the moment
when the French bourgeoisie or its rivals choose to upset the _status
quo_.

“_For Bread!_” That meant for the Bolsheviks in 1917 the _expropriation
of the land and of the grain reserves belonging to the landlords and
speculators, and the monopoly of the grain trade in the hands of the
workers’ and peasants’ government_. What does “For Bread!” mean to the
Stalinists in 1935? A mere verbal formula!

“_For Freedom!_” The Bolsheviks showed the masses that freedom was an
illusion while schools, press and meeting halls remained in the hands of
the bourgeoisie. “For Freedom!” meant: the seizure of power by the
soviets, the expropriation of the landlords, workers’ control of
production.

“For Freedom!” in alliance with Herriot and the old ladies of both sexes
in the League for the Rights of Man means to uphold the
semi-Bonapartist, semi-parliamentarian government, and that is all it
can mean. The bourgeoisie needs right now not only the gangs of la
Rocque, but likewise the “left” reputation of Herriot. Finance capital
is busy arming the Fascists. The Stalinists are restoring the left
reputation of Herriot with the help of the masquerading “People’s
Front”. This is what the slogans of the October revolution are used for
in 1935!

As the single example of the new style “realistic” policies, the
resolution of the Central Committee tells how the unemployed of
Villejuif are eating the Croix de Feu’s soup, and yelling: “To the stake
with la Rocque!” How many are eating soup and how many yelling, they
don’t tell us: the Stalinists are never able to endure figures. But that
is not the question . To what point has a “revolutionary” party fallen
when, in a programmatic resolution, it can find no other example of
proletarian policies than the impotent yells of harassed and starving
workers, forced to nourish themselves on the crumbs of Fascist
philanthropy? And these leaders feel neither humiliated nor ashamed!

Once, while talking about certain of his disciples, Marx quoted the
words of Heine: “I have sown dragons, and I have harvested fleas.” We
are very much afraid that the founders of the Third International will
have to repeat these same words . However, our epoch needs not fleas,
but dragons.
 

The Struggle Against Fascism and the General Strike

The program of the Communist International, written in 1928, during the
period of the theoretical decline of the CI, states, “The epoch of
imperialism is the epoch of capitalism in its death throes.” By itself,
this statement, which was formulated by Lenin a long time ago, is
absolutely incontestable, and is of decisive importance for the policies
of the proletariat in our epoch. But the authors of the program of the
Communist International failed utterly to understand the thesis on
capitalism in its _death throes or in decay_, which they had
mechanically adopted. This lack of comprehension stands revealed with
especial clarity in respect to what is to us the most burning question,
namely, Fascism.

The program of the Communist International has the following to say on
this subject: “_Side by side_ with the Social Democracy which assists
the bourgeoisie to stifle the proletariat and to lull its vigilance,
Fascism appears.” The Communist International failed to understand that
it is not the mission of Fascism to function _side by side_ with the
Social Democracy, but to destroy all the existing workers’
organizations, including the reformist. The task of Fascism, in the
words of the program, is to “annihilate the _Communist_ strata of the
proletariat, and their leading cadres.” Fascism, then, does not at all
threaten the Social Democracy and the reformist trade unions; on the
contrary, the Social Democracy itself plays a “Fascist” role to an ever
increasing degree. Fascism achieves nothing more than the consummation
of the labours of reformism, by functioning “_side by side_ with the
Social Democracy”.

We are quoting not from an article by some Thorez or Duclos who
contradicts himself at every step, but from the basic document of the
Communist International, its program. (See Chapter II, paragraph 3: _The
Crisis of Capitalism and Fascism_.) We have here before us all the basic
elements of the theory of _social fascism_. The leaders of the Communist
International failed to understand that capitalism in decay is no longer
able to come to terms with the most moderate and most servile Social
Democracy, either as a party in power, or as a party in opposition. It
is the mission of Fascism to take its place not “side by side with the
Social Democracy”, but on its bones. Precisely from this there flows the
possibility, the need and the urgency for the united front. But the
miserable leadership of the Communist International made no attempt to
apply the policy of the united front except during the period when it
could not be forced upon the Social Democracy. As soon as the position
of reformism was shaken, and when the Social Democracy began to fall
under blows, the Communist International rejected the united front.
These people have the grievous habit of wearing their overcoats in the
summer and of venturing out in the winter without so much as a fig leaf!

Despite the instructive experience of Italy, the Communist International
inscribed on its banner the genial aphorism of Stalin, “Social Democracy
and Fascism are not opposites, they are twins.” Herein lies the main
cause for the defeat of the German proletariat. True, the CI has made a
sharp turn on the question of the united front: facts proved themselves
more potent than the program. But the program of the Communist
International has been neither suppressed, nor modified. Its fundamental
mistakes have not been explained to the workers. The leaders of the
Communist International, who have lost confidence in themselves, are
preserving _against possible eventualities_ an avenue of retreat towards
the position of “social fascism”. This has invested the policy of the
united front with its unprincipled, diplomatic and unstable character.

The inability to understand the meaning of Lenin’s thesis on “capitalism
in its death throes” has invested the present policies of the French
Communist Party with its character of noisy impotence, supplemented by
reformist illusions. Although Fascism represents the organic product of
capitalist decay, the Stalinists have suddenly become convinced of the
possibility of putting an end to Fascism without touching the
foundations of bourgeois society.

On March 6, Thorez wrote for the one hundredth time in L’HUMANITÉ:

“In order to assure the _decisive_ defeat of Fascism, we again propose
to the Socialist Party joint action in defence of immediate demands”

Every class conscious worker must ponder well this “programmatic”
phrase. Fascism, as we know, is born out of the union between the
despair of the middle classes and the terrorist policy of big capital.
The “immediate demands” are those demands which do not transcend the
framework of capitalism. How, then, by remaining upon the arena of
capitalism in decay, is it possible to “assure the decisive (!) defeat”
of Fascism?

When Jouhaux says that by putting an end to the crisis (easier said than
done!) we shall by this very thing vanquish Fascism, Jouhaux, at least,
remains faithful to himself: he is again as always the watchdog of the
hopes in the regeneration and rejuvenation of capitalism. But the
Stalinists recognize, verbally, the inevitability of the progressive
degeneration of capitalism. How, then, can they promise to render the
political superstructure healthy, by assuring the decisive defeat of
Fascism, and at the same time leave intact the decaying economic base of
society?

Do they suppose that big capital is capable of turning the wheels of
history back at its whim, and once again resuming the road of
concessions and “reforms”? Do they think that the petty bourgeoisie can
be saved by means of “immediate demands” from growing ruin, from being
declassed and from despair? And how then to reconcile these trade-union
and reformist illusions with the thesis on capitalism in its death
throes?

Taken on the theoretical plane, the position of the Communist Party sums
up, as we have seen, to a most complete absurdity. Let us see how this
position appears in the light of the actual struggle.

* * *

On February 28, Thorez expressed in the following words this very same
central and radically false idea of the present policies of the
Communist Party:

“To beat down Fascism decisively, it is necessary to put a halt, in no
uncertain terms, to the economic offensive of capitalism against the
living standards of the toiling masses.”

Why then the workers’ militia? What need of a direct struggle against
Fascism? We must strive to raise the living standards of the masses, and
Fascism will disappear, as if by magic.

Alas, along these lines, the entire perspective of the struggle
immediately ahead is completely distorted, and the actual relationships
are turned topsy-turvy. The capitalists arrive at Fascism not at their
own whim, but through necessity: they cannot any longer preserve the
private ownership of the means of production save by directing an
offensive against the workers, save by strengthening the oppression, by
sowing misery and despair around them. At the same time, fearing the
inevitable resistance on the part of the workers, the capitalists,
through the medium of their agents, arouse the petty bourgeoisie against
the proletariat and, while accusing the latter of prolonging and
aggravating the crisis, they finance Fascist gangs to annihilate the
workers. Should the resistance of the workers to the offensive of
capital increase on the morrow, should the strikes become more frequent
and important, Fascism, despite what Thorez says, will not evaporate but
instead grow with redoubled force. The growth of the strike movement
will impel the mobilization of strikebreakers. All the “patriotic” thugs
will participate in the movement. Daily attacks against the workers will
be put on the order of the day. To close our eyes to this is to walk
toward certain defeat.

Do you mean to say, Thorez and his colleagues will demand, that there
must be no resistance? (And they will append the customary insults
addressed to us, which we pass by as we would a cesspool.) No. It is
necessary to resist.

We are no adherents of that school which thinks that the best means of
safety lies in silence, retreat and capitulation. “Don’t provoke the
enemy!” “Do not defend yourselves!” “Don’t arm yourselves!” “Roll over
on your backs and play dead!” Theoreticians from among this school of
strategy should be sought not among ourselves but among the editors of
L’HUMANITÉ! It is necessary for the workers to resist if they do not
wish to be annihilated. But in that case no reformist and pacifist
illusion is permissible. The struggle will be ferocious. It is necessary
to foresee beforehand the inevitable consequences of resistance and to
prepare for them.

By its present offensive the bourgeoisie invests with a _new_ and
incommensurably more acute character the relation between the economic
conditions and the social situation of capitalism in decay. Just so, the
workers must invest _their defence with a new character which
corresponds to_ the methods of the class enemy. In defending ourselves
against the economic blows of capital, we must know how to defend at the
same time our organizations against the mercenary gangs of capital. It
is impossible to do this save by means of the _workers’ militia_. No
verbal assertions, no shrieks, no insult on the part of L’HUMANITÉ can
invalidate this conclusion.

In particular we must say to the trade unions: comrades, your branches
and your publications will be pillaged, your organizations reduced to
dust, if you do not immediately proceed to the formation of _trade-union
defence squads_ (“trade-union militia”), if you do not demonstrate by
actions that you will not surrender a single inch of Fascism without a
struggle.

* * *

In the same article (Feb. 28), Thorez laments:

“The Socialist Party has not accepted our proposals for wide scale
action, including the _strike_, against the decree laws which are being
ever more enforced.”

Including the strike? What strike? Since the abolition of the decree
laws is involved here, what Thorez apparently has in view are not
partial economic strikes but a general strike, that is to say, a
political strike. He does not utter the words “general strike” in order
not to make it obvious that he is repeating our long-standing proposal.
To what humiliating subterfuges must these poor people resort in order
to mask their vacillations and contradictions!

This procedure has become, it seems, a method. In the open letter of
March 12, the Central Committee of the Communist Party proposed to the
Socialist Party to inaugurate a decisive campaign against the two-year
term of military service, “through all methods available, including the
_strike_”. Once again the same mystic formula! The Central Committee has
in mind evidently the strike as an instrument of political struggle,
that is to say, as a revolutionary weapon. But why then does it fear to
utter aloud the word general strike and simply speak of “a strike”? With
whom is the Central Committee playing hide and seek? Is it with the
proletariat, or no?

But putting aside these unbecoming manoeuvres to maintain “prestige”,
there remains the fact that the Central Committee of the Communist Party
proposes the general strike for the struggle against the Bonapartist
legislation of Doumergue-Flandin. With this we are in full accord. But
we demand that the leaders of working-class organizations themselves
understand and explain to the masses the meaning of the general strike
under the present conditions as well as how it must be prepared.

Even an ordinary economic strike requires, as a rule, a militant
organization, specifically, _pickets_. Under the present aggravated
conditions of the class struggle, faced with the Fascist provocation and
terror, a real organization of pickets is the essential prerequisite for
all important economic struggles. Let us imagine, however, that some
trade-union leader would assert, “_Pickets_ are not necessary, that
would be a provocation – _self-defence_ will suffice the strikers!”
Isn’t it obvious that the workers would amiably advise such a “leader”
to go to a hospital; if not directly to an insane asylum? The fact is
that pickets are precisely the most important organ of self-defence of
the strikers!

Let us view more closely the line of reasoning relating to the general
strike. We have in mind not an ordinary demonstration, nor a symbolic
strike of an hour’s or even 24 hours’ duration, but a war manoeuvre,
with the aim of forcing the enemy to submit. It is not difficult to
understand what a terrific aggravation of the class struggle the general
strike would imply under the present conditions! The Fascist gangs would
sprout on all sides like mushrooms after a rain and they would attempt
with all their might to bring confusion, provocation and demoralization
among the ranks of the strikers. How else can we guard the general
strike against needless sacrifices and even complete annihilation if not
by means of military and strictly disciplined workers’ detachments? _The
general strike is the generalization of the partial strike. The workers’
militia is the generalization of the picket squads_. Only windbags and
pathetic braggarts can play with the idea of the general strike under
the present conditions, and refuse at the same time to carry on the
stubborn work for the creation of the workers’ militia!

But the wretched members of the Central Committee of the Communist Party
do not stop with this.

The general strike, as every Marxist knows, is one of the most
revolutionary methods of struggle. The general strike is not possible
except at a time when the class struggle rises above particular and
craft demands, and extends over all occupational and district divisions,
and wipes away the lines and the parties, between legality and
illegality, and mobilizes the majority of the proletariat in an active
opposition to the bourgeoisie and the state. Nothing can be on a higher
plane than the general strike, except the armed insurrection. The entire
history of the working-class movement proves that every general strike,
whatever may be the slogans under which it occurs, has an internal
tendency to transform itself into an open revolutionary clash, into a
direct struggle for power. In other words: the general strike is not
possible except under the conditions of extreme political tension, and
that is why it is always the incontestable expression of the
revolutionary character of the situation. How then can the Central
Committee propose a general strike in this case? “The situation is not a
revolutionary one!”

Might not Thorez perhaps retort that he had in mind not a real general
strike, but a little strike, quite peaceful, just exactly suited to the
personal requirements of the editors of L’HUMANITÉ? Or perhaps may he
not add indiscreetly that, foreseeing the refusal of the leaders of the
SFIO, he risks nothing by proposing a general strike to them? But most
probably Thorez, in refutation, will merely accuse us of entering into a
conspiracy with Chiappe, ex-Alfonso XIII and the Pope: this is the sort
of rejoinder that suits Thorez best!

But every Communist worker who has a head on his shoulders, must ponder
over the crying contradictions of his hapless leaders: it is impossible,
you see, to build workers’ militias because the situation is not
revolutionary, it is impossible even to carry on propaganda in favour of
the arming of the proletariat, that is to say, of preparing the workers
for a revolutionary situation in the future; but it is possible, it
appears, even today to call the workers to a general strike despite the
absence of a revolutionary situation. In truth, we find transcended here
all the boundaries of giddiness and absurdity!

At all meetings we hear the Communists repeating the slogan which they
have inherited from the “Third Period” – “Soviets Everywhere!” It is
absolutely clear that this slogan, if one takes it seriously, bears a
profoundly revolutionary character: it is impossible to establish the
soviet régime otherwise than by means of an armed insurrection against
the bourgeoisie. But an _armed_ insurrection presupposes _arms_ in the
hands of the proletariat. Thus the slogan of “soviets everywhere” and
the slogan of “arming the workers” are intimately and indissolubly bound
with one another. Why then is the former slogan being incessantly
reiterated by the Stalinists while the latter is proclaimed a
“Trotskyist provocation”?

Our bewilderment is all the more legitimate since the slogan of arming
the workers most closely corresponds to the present political situation
and the state of mind of the proletariat. The slogan of “soviets” is, by
its very essence, offensive in character and presupposes a victorious
revolution. The proletariat, however, finds itself today in a defensive
situation. Fascism threatens it directly with physical annihilation. The
necessity for defence, even with arms in hand, is actually more
comprehensive and more within the grasp of the widest strata of the
masses than the idea of a revolutionary offensive. Thus the slogan of
arming could at the present stage count upon a response much greater and
much more active than the slogan of soviets. How then could a
working-class party, unless it has really betrayed the interests of the
revolution, let slip so exceptional an opportunity and so dishonestly
compromise the idea of arming instead of ardently popularizing it?

We are ready to allow that our question is prompted by our
“counter-revolutionary” nature, in particular, by our hopes of provoking
military intervention; everyone knows that as soon as the Mikado and
Hitler become convinced by our question that air currents are whistling
through the heads of Béla Kun and Thorez, they will declare war against
the USSR.

All this has been irrefutably established by Duclos and needs no proof.
But all the same, deign to reply: how can one come to soviet power
without an armed insurrection? How can one come to an insurrection
without arming the workers? How can one defend oneself against Fascism
without arms? How can we achieve armament, even partial, without
propaganda for this slogan?

* * *

But is the general strike possible in the immediate future? To a
question of this sort there is no a priori answer possible, that is to
say, none ready made. To obtain an answer it is necessary to know how to
question. Whom? The masses. How question them? By means of agitation.

Agitation is not only the means of communicating to the masses this or
that slogan, calling the masses to action, etc. For a party, agitation
is also a means of lending an ear to the masses, of sounding out its
moods and thoughts, and reaching this or another decision in accordance
with the results. Only the Stalinists have transformed agitation into a
noisy monologue. For the Marxists, the Leninists, _agitation is always a
dialogue with the masses_.

But in order that this dialogue give the necessary results, the party
must estimate correctly the general situation within the country and
outline the general course of the immediate struggle. By means of
agitation and probing the masses, the party must bring into its concepts
the necessary corrections and exactitude, particularly in everything
relating to the _rhythm of the movement and the dates for major
actions_.

The situation in the country has been described above; it bears a
pre-revolutionary character along with the non-revolutionary character
of the leadership of the proletariat. And since the policy of the
proletariat is the principal factor in the development of a
revolutionary situation, the non-revolutionary character of the
proletarian leadership checks the transformation of the
pre-revolutionary situation into an open revolutionary situation and by
this very thing contributes towards transforming it into a
counter-revolutionary situation.

In objective reality there are, of course, no sharp boundaries between
the different stages of the political process. One stage interpenetrates
with another, and as a result of this the situation reveals various
contradictions. These contradictions certainly make diagnosis and
prognosis more difficult but they do not at all make it impossible.

_The forces of the French proletariat remain not only un-exhausted, but
are indeed still intact. Fascism as a political factor among the
petty-bourgeois masses is relatively feeble as yet_ (much more powerful,
nevertheless, than it seems to the parliamentarians). These two very
important political facts allow us to say with firm conviction: nothing
has been lost as yet, the possibility for transforming the
pre-revolutionary situation into a revolutionary situation is still
entirely open.

But in a capitalist country such as this there can be no revolutionary
struggles without the general strike: if working men and women remain in
the factories during the decisive days, who then will do the fighting?
Thus, the general strike is on the order of the day.

But the question of the _moment_ for the general strike is the question
of knowing whether the masses are prepared to struggle and whether the
workers’ organizations are ready to lead them to battle.

Is it true, however, that the only thing lacking is the revolutionary
leadership? Does not there exist a great force for conservatism within
the masses themselves, within the proletariat? Such voices are raised
from different sides. And there is nothing astonishing about it! When a
revolutionary crisis approaches, many leaders, fearful of the
responsibilities, hide themselves behind the pseudo-conservatism of the
masses. History has taught us how a few weeks, even a few days prior to
the October insurrection, such distinguished Bolsheviks as Zinoviev,
Kamenev and Rykov (it is needless to mention such people as Lozovsky,
Manuilsky, etc.) asserted that the masses were worn out, and did not
want to fight. And yet as revolutionists, Zinoviev. Kamenev and Rykov
tower in stature far above the Cachins, Thorezes and Monmousseaus.

Whoever declares that the proletariat does not want to wage or is
incapable of waging a revolutionary struggle, himself spreads calumny by
ascribing his own feebleness and his own cowardice to the toiling
masses. _Up to the present moment there has been not a single case
either in Paris or the provinces where the masses remained deaf to a
call from above_.

The greatest example in point is the general strike of February 12,
1934. Despite the complete division of the leadership, the lack of any
serious preparation, the tenacious efforts of the leaders of the CGT to
reduce the movement to a minimum, since they could not evade it
altogether, the general strike achieved the greatest success possible
under the given conditions. It is clear that the masses want to
struggle. Every class-conscious worker must say to himself that the
pressure from below must have been extremely powerful if Jouhaux himself
had to bestir for a moment out of his immobility. True, involved here
was not a general strike in the proper meaning of the term, but only a
24-hour demonstration. But this restriction was _not_ put by the
_masses_; it was dictated from _above_.

The demonstration of February 10 of this year in the Place de la
République confirms the very same conclusion. The only weapon which the
leading centres utilized to prepare for it was the cold water bucket.
The only slogan which the masses heard was, “Hush! Hush!” And
nevertheless the number of demonstrators surpassed all expectations. In
the provinces things have been and remain during the past year in
exactly the same state. It is impossible to adduce a single serious fact
that would prove that the leaders wanted to struggle and the masses
refused to follow them. Always and everywhere just the reverse
relationship is to be observed. It preserves its full force even today.
The rank and file want to fight, the tops apply the brake. It is here
that the chief danger lies and it _may_ end in a real catastrophe.

The same relationship is to be found not only between the parties (or
the trade unions) and the proletariat but also within each of the
parties. Thus Frossard has not the least support among the rank and file
in the SFIO; the only ones who support him are the deputies and the
mayors who want everything to remain as in the past. On the other hand,
Marceau Pivert, thanks to his stand which is becoming more and more
clear and resolute, has become one of the most popular figures with the
rank and file. We recognize this all the more readily since we have
never renounced in the past, as we shall not refrain in the future, from
speaking out openly when we are not in agreement with Pivert.

Taken as a political symptom this fact by its importance far transcends
the question of personalities of Frossard and Pivert: it indicates the
general tendency of development. _The rank and file of the Socialist
Party, as of the Communist Party, is more to the left, more
revolutionary, more audacious than the upper crust:_ this is precisely
why it is ready to place confidence only in the left-wing leaders. Still
more: it is pushing the sincere Socialist always further to the left.
Why does the rank and file itself become radicalized! Because it finds
itself in direct contact with the masses of the population, with their
misery, their revolt and their hatred. This is an infallible symptom. We
can rely on it.

The leaders of the Communist Party can, indeed, cite the fact that the
masses failed to respond to their appeals. But this fact does not
invalidate, instead it confirms our analysis. The working masses
understand what the “leaders” do not understand, that is to say, that
under the conditions of a very great social crisis, a partial economic
struggle alone, which requires enormous efforts and enormous sacrifices,
cannot achieve any serious results. Worse yet, it can weaken and exhaust
the proletariat. The workers are ready to participate in fighting
demonstrations and even in a general strike but not in petty, exhausting
strikes, without any perspective. Despite the appeals, manifestos and
articles in L’HUMANITÉ, the Communist agitators hardly appear at all
before the masses to preach strikes in the name of “partial immediate
demands”. They sense that the bureaucratic plans of their leaders do not
correspond at all either to the objective situation or the mood of the
masses. Without great perspectives, the masses cannot and will not begin
to struggle. The policy of L’HUMANITÉ is the policy of an artificial and
false pseudo-“realism”. The failure of the CGTU in calling partial
strikes is the indirect but very actual confirmation of the profundity
of the crisis and of the moral tension in the workers’ districts.

One should not think, however, that the radicalization of the masses
will proceed by itself, automatically. The working class waits for
initiative on the part of its organizations. When it arrives at the
conclusion that its expectations have been false – and this moment is,
perhaps, not so very distant – the process of radicalization will break
off and be transformed into manifestations of discouragement, apathy and
isolated explosions of despair. At the periphery of the proletariat,
anarchist tendencies impinge upon Fascist tendencies. The wine will turn
to vinegar.

The shifts in the political mood of the masses demand the greatest
attention possible. To probe this living dialectic at every stage – that
is the task of agitation. So far, the United Front criminally continues
to lag behind the development of the social crisis and the mood of the
masses. It is still possible to make up for lost time. But we must not
lose any more time. Today history is to be reckoned not in terms of
years, but in months and weeks.

* * *

To determine to what degree the masses are ripe for the general strike
and at the same time to strengthen the militant mood of the masses, it
is necessary to place before them a program of revolutionary action.
Partial slogans such as the abolition of the Bonapartist decree laws and
of the two-year term of military service will find, of course, an
important place in such a program. But these two episodic slogans are
entirely inadequate.

Above all the tasks and partial demands of our epoch there stands the
_QUESTION OF POWER_. Since February 6, 1934, the question of power has
been openly posed as a question of armed force. The municipal and
parliamentary elections can be of importance insofar as the evaluation
of forces is concerned – but nothing more. The question will be settled
by the open conflict between the two camps. Governments of the type of
Doumergue-Flandin, etc., occupy the forefront only up to the day of the
decisive climax. On the morrow, either Fascism or the proletariat will
govern France.

It is precisely because the present intermediate state régime is
extremely unstable, that the general strike _can_ achieve very great
partial successes by forcing the government to take to the road of
concessions on the question of the Bonapartist decree laws, the two-year
term of military service, etc. But such a success, extremely valuable
and important in itself, will not re-establish the equilibrium of
“democracy”: finance capital will redouble its subsidies to Fascism, and
the question of power, perhaps after a brief interlude, will be posed
with redoubled force.

The fundamental importance of the general strike, independent of the
partial successes which it may and then again may not provide, lies in
the fact that it poses the question of power in a revolutionary manner.
By shutting down the factories, transport, generally all the means of
communication, power stations, etc., the proletariat by this very act
paralyses not only production but also the government. The state power
remains suspended in mid-air. It must either subjugate the proletariat
by famine and force and constrain it, to set the apparatus of the
bourgeois state once again in motion, or retreat before the proletariat.

Whatever may be the slogans and the motive for which the general strike
is initiated, if it includes the genuine masses, and if these masses are
quite resolved to struggle, the general strike inevitably poses before
all the classes in the nation the question: _Who will be the master of
the house?_

The leaders of the proletariat must understand this internal logic of
the general strike, unless they are not leaders but dilettantes and
adventurers. Politically this implies that from now on the leaders will
continue to pose before the proletariat the task of the revolutionary
conquest of power. If not, they must not venture to speak of the general
strike. But by renouncing the general strike, they renounce thereby all
revolutionary struggle, that is to say, they betray the proletariat to
Fascism.

_Either complete capitulation or revolutionary struggle for power_ –
such is the alternative which flows from all the conditions of the
present crisis. Whoever has not understood this alternative, has no
business in the camp of the proletariat.

* * *

The question of the general strike is complicated by the fact that the
CGT proclaims that it has a monopoly on declaring and conducting the
general strike. From this it follows that this question does not at all
concern the working-class parties. And at first sight, what is most
astonishing is that there are to be found Socialist parliamentarians who
consider this claim to be quite in order: in reality, they merely wish
to rid themselves of the responsibility.

The general strike, as the name itself already indicates, has for its
goal the inclusion, in so far as it is possible, of the entire
proletariat. The CGT includes in its ranks probably not more than 5 to 8
per cent of the proletariat. The influence of the CGT itself outside the
confines of the trade unions is absolutely insignificant to the extent
that on general questions it does not equal the influence of the
working-class parties. Is it possible, for example, to compare the
influence of LE PEUPLE to the influence of LE POPULAIRE or L’HUMANITÉ?

The leadership of the CGT, in its conceptions and methods, is
incomparably still further away from the tasks of the present epoch than
the leadership of the working-class parties. The lower one passes from
the upper crust of the apparatus to the rank and file of the trade
unions, the less confidence one finds in Jouhaux and his group. The lack
of confidence changes more and more into open distrust. The present
conservative apparatus of the CGT will be inevitably swept away by the
subsequent development of the revolutionary crisis.

The general strike is, by its very essence, a political act. It opposes
the working class, as a whole, to the bourgeois state. It assembles
together union and non-union workers, Socialists, Communists and
non-party men. It requires an apparatus with a press and agitators, such
as the CGT alone does not have at its disposal.

The general strike poses directly the question of the conquest of power
by the proletariat. The CGT has turned and is turning its back on this
task (the leaders of the CGT turn their faces towards the bourgeois
power). The leaders of the CGT themselves know that the leadership of
the general strike is beyond their forces. If they, nevertheless,
proclaim their monopoly to direct it, it is solely because they hope in
this way to stifle the general strike even before its birth.

And what about the general strike of February 12, 1934? It was only a
brief and peaceful demonstration imposed upon the CGT by the Socialist
and Communist workers. Jouhaux and his colleagues themselves took over
the nominal leadership of the resistance precisely in order to prevent
it from transforming itself into a revolutionary general strike.

In its instructions to its propagandists, the CGT said, “On the morrow
after February 6th, the labouring population and _all the democratic
elements_, at the appeal of the CGT, demonstrated their firm will to bar
the road to the _factionalists_.” On its own part, the CGT took note
neither of the Socialists nor of the Communists – only of the
“democrats”. In this single phrase, Jouhaux is summed up. That is
precisely why it would be criminal to place confidence in Jouhaux to
decide the question of knowing whether it should or should not be a
revolutionary struggle.

Of course in the preparation and conduct of the general strike the trade
unions will play a very influential role; yet not by virtue of a
monopoly, but side by side with the working-class parties. From the
revolutionary standpoint it is particularly important to collaborate
intimately with _local_ trade-union organizations without the slightest
injury, of course, to their autonomy. As regards the CGT, it will either
take its place in the common proletarian front by cutting away from the
“democrats”, or remain on the sidelines. Shall we co-operate loyally
with equal rights? Yes! Shall we decide jointly the time and the methods
of conducting the general strike? Yes! Shall we recognize Jouhaux’s
monopoly to stifle the revolutionary movement? Never!

Socialism and Armed Struggle

On February 6, 1935, the Fascist leagues prepared to demonstrate on the
Place de la Concorde. And what did the United Front and, in particular,
the Central Committee of the Communist Party do? It called the workers
of Paris to demonstrate at the Place de la Concorde at the same time as
the Fascists. Were the Fascists perhaps to be without arms? No. After a
year’s time they were armed twofold. Did the Central Committee of the
Communist Party propose adequately to arm the defence squads? Oh, no.
The Central Committee is against “putschism” and “physical struggle”.
How, then, is it possible to throw tens of thousands of workers without
arms, without preparation, without defence, against Fascist gangs
excellently drilled and armed who bear a bloody hatred towards the
revolutionary proletariat?

Let no malicious people tell us that the Central Committee of the
Communist Party did not want to place the workers under the guns of the
Fascists; that its sole desire was to give Flandin a convenient pretext
to prohibit the Fascist demonstration. For that is worse yet. The
Central Committee of the Communist Party, it then appears, gambled with
the heads of the workers, and the outcome of this gamble depended
entirely upon Flandin, more exactly upon the chiefs of police from the
school of Chiappe. And what would have been the outcome had the police
prefecture decided to profit by the excellent occasion and teach the
revolutionary workers a lesson through the medium of the Fascists,
moreover making responsibility for the butchery fall upon the leaders of
the United Front? It is not difficult to imagine the consequences! While
no bloody massacre resulted this particular time, in the event of the
continuation of the same policy, it will result inevitably and
infallibly upon the next similar occasion.

The conduct of the Central Committee was the purest form of bureaucratic
adventurism. Marxists have always taught that _opportunism and
adventurism are two sides of one and the same coin_. February 6, 1935
has shown us with remarkable clarity how easily the coin may be
reversed.

“We are against putschism, against insurrectionism!” Otto Bauer used to
repeat year after year and spared no effort to rid himself of the
_Schutzbund_ (Workers’ Militia) which was left as a heritage by the 1918
revolution. The powerful Austrian Social Democracy retreated in a
cowardly manner, it adapted itself to the bourgeoisie, it retreated
again, issued foolish “petitions”, created a false appearance of
struggle, placed its hopes upon its own Flandin (his name was Dollfuss),
surrendered position after position, and when it saw itself at the
bottom of abyss it began to shriek hysterically, “Workers, to the
rescue!” The best militants, without any contact with the masses who
were disoriented, overwhelmed and duped, threw themselves into the
struggle and suffered an inevitable defeat. After which, Otto Bauer and
Julius Deutsch declared: “We behaved like revolutionaries but the
_proletariat_ did not support us!”

The events in Spain unfolded after a similar pattern. The
Social-Democratic leaders called the workers to an insurrection after
they had surrendered to the bourgeoisie all the conquered revolutionary
positions, and after they had exhausted the popular masses by their
policy of retreat. The professional “anti-putschists” found themselves
compelled to call for armed defence under such conditions as invested it
to a large degree with the character of a “putsch”.

February 6, 1935 _was a minor repetition in France of the events in
Austria and Spain_. During the course of several months the Stalinists
lulled and demoralized the workers, they ridiculed the slogan for the
militia and “rejected” the physical struggle. Then all of a sudden,
without the slightest preparation they commanded the proletariat, “To
the Place de la Concorde. Forward, march!” This time the good Langeron
saved them. But if on the morrow, when the atmosphere will become hotter
still, the Fascist thugs should assassinate scores of workers’ leaders
or set fire to L’HUMANITÉ – who will declare that this is improbable? –
the wise Central Committee will infallibly shriek out, “Workers, to
arms!” And then, either when committed to a concentration camp, or while
promenading along the streets of London, if they get that far, the same
leaders will haughtily declare, “We called for the insurrection, but the
workers did not support us!”

The secret of success, obviously, is not in the “physical struggle”
itself but in correct policies. But we call correct that policy which
meets the conditions of the time and place. _By itself_, the workers’
militia does not solve the problem. But the workers’ militia is an
_integrally necessary part_ of the policy which meets the conditions of
the time and place. It would be absurd to shoot guns over a ballot box.
But it would be still more absurd to defend oneself against Fascist
gangs with a ballot.

The initial nuclei of the workers’ militia will inevitably be weak,
isolated and inexperienced. Pedants and sceptics shake their heads with
scorn. There will be found, cynics who will not be ashamed to poke fun
at the idea of workers’ militia in a conversation with the journalists
of the Comité des Forges. If they think thus to insure themselves
against concentration camps they are fooling themselves. Imperialism has
no use for the grovelling of this or that leader; it must annihilate the
class.

When Guesde and Lafargue, as youths, began to agitate for Marxism they
appeared in the eyes of sage philistines to be impotent, solitary, and
naïve utopians. Nevertheless it was they who excavated the channel for
that movement which carried along so many parliamentary routinists.
Within the literary, trade-union and co-operative spheres, the first
steps of the working-class movement were feeble, tottering, very
uncertain. But despite its poverty, the proletariat, thanks to its
numbers and its spirit of self-sacrifice, has created mighty
organizations.

_The armed organization of the proletariat_, which at the present moment
coincides almost entirely with the _defence against Fascism_, is a new
branch of the class struggle. The first steps here too will be
inexperienced and maladroit. We must expect mistakes. It is even
impossible to escape completely from provocation. The selection of the
cadres will be achieved little by little and this all the more surely,
all the more solidly, as the militia is closer to the factories where
the workers know one another well. But the initiative must necessarily
come from above. _The party can and must provide the initial cadres_.
The trade unions must also take to this same road – and they will
inevitably take it. The cadres will become fused and strengthened all
the more rapidly as they meet with an increasing sympathy and increasing
support within the workers’ organizations, and afterwards within the
masses of the toilers.

What are we to say about those gentlemen who, in the guise of sympathy
and support, vilify and poke fun at or, worse yet, depict to the class
enemy the detachments of working-class self-defence as detachments of
“insurrection” and of “putsch”? See in particular the COMBAT (?)
MARXISTE (!). The witty and half-witted pedants, the theoretical
lieutenants of Jouhaux, led by the Russian Mensheviks, ridicule
maliciously the first steps of the workers’ militia. It is impossible to
give these gentlemen any other name save that of direct enemies of the
proletarian revolution.

* * *

But here the conservative routinists interject their final argument: “Do
you really think that by means of squads of poorly-armed militia of the
proletariat you can conquer power, that is to say, win a victory over
the army with its modern technique (with its tanks; aeroplanes! poison
gases!!)?” It is difficult to conceive of an argument more hollow and
trite, which, moreover, has been a hundred times refuted by theory and
by history. Nevertheless it is served up each time as the last word of
“realistic” thought.

Even if we allow for a moment that the detachments of militia will
tomorrow turn out to be inept in the struggle for power, they are none
the less necessary _today_ for the defence of the workers organizations.
The leaders of the CGT reject, as every one knows, all struggle for
power. This does not at all hinder the Fascists from annihilating the
CGT. The trade unionists who do not take timely defence measures commit
a crime against the trade unions, regardless of their political
orientation.

Let us inspect more closely, however, the chief argument of the
pacifists: “The armed detachments of workers are powerless against a
contemporary army.” This “argument” is aimed, fundamentally, not against
the militia but _against the very idea of proletarian revolution_.
Should one allow for a moment that the army, equipped to its teeth, will
_under all conditions_ be found on the side of big capital, then one
must renounce not only the workers’ militia but socialism in general.
Then capitalism is eternal.

Fortunately, this is not so. The proletarian revolution presupposes the
extreme aggravation of the class struggle in city and country and
consequently also within the army. The revolution will not gain victory
until it has won over to its side, or has at least neutralized, the
basic nucleus of the army. This victory, however, cannot be improvised:
it must be systematically prepared.

At this point the pacifist doctrinaire will interrupt us in order to
express agreement (in words). “Obviously”, he will say, “it is necessary
to win over the army by means of sustained propaganda. But that is what
we are doing. The struggle against the high death rate in the barracks,
against the two-year term, against war – the success of this struggle
makes needless the arming of the workers.”

Is this true? No, it is fundamentally false. A peaceful, placid conquest
of the army is even less possible than the peaceful winning of a
parliamentary majority. Already the very moderate campaigns against the
death rate in the barracks and against the two-year term are leading
without any question to an understanding between the patriotic leagues
and the reactionary officers, to a direct conspiracy on their part and
also to a redoubled payment of the subsidies which finance capital gives
to the Fascists. _The more successful the anti-militarist agitation
becomes, the more rapid will be the growth of the Fascist danger_. Such
is the actual, and not fanciful, dialectic of the struggle. The
conclusion is that, in the very process of the propaganda and of the
preparation, we must know how to defend ourselves arms in hand, and more
and more vigorously.

During the revolution, inevitable oscillations will occur in the army,
an internal struggle will take place. Even the most advanced sections
will not go over openly and actively to the side of the proletariat
unless they see with their own eyes that _the workers want to fight and
are able to win_. The task of the Fascist detachments will be to prevent
the _rapprochement_ between the revolutionary proletariat and the army.
The Fascists will strive to annihilate the workers’ insurrection at its
outset in order to destroy among the best sections of the army any idea
of the possibility of supporting the insurgents. At the same time the
Fascists will come to the aid of reactionary detachments of the army to
disarm the most revolutionary and the least “reliable” regiments.

What will be our task in this case?

It is impossible to tell in advance the concrete course of the
revolution in any given country. But we can, on the basis of the entire
experience of history, state with certainty that the insurrection in no
case and in no country will assume the character of a mere duel between
the workers’ militia and the army. The relationship of forces will be
much more complex and immeasurably more favourable to the proletariat.
_The workers’ militia_ – not by its armaments but by its class
consciousness and heroism – _will be the vanguard of the revolution.
Fascism will be the vanguard of the counter-revolution_. The workers’
militia, with the support of the entire class, with the sympathy of all
the toilers, will have to smash, disarm and terrorize the bandit gangs
of reaction and thus open up the avenue to the workers for
_revolutionary fraternization with the army_. The alliance of workers
and soldiers will be victorious over the counter-revolutionary section.
Thus victory will be assured.

The sceptics shrug their shoulders with scorn. But the sceptics have
made the same gestures in the past on the eve of all victorious
revolutions. The proletariat would do well to invite the sceptics to run
away before things start. Time is too precious to explain music to the
deaf, colours to the blind and the socialist revolution to sceptics.
 

The Proletariat, the Peasantry, the Army, the Women, the Youth

Jouhaux has borrowed the idea of the plan from de Man. Both of them have
the very same goal in mind; to disguise the final _collapse of
reformism_ and to instil new hopes in the proletariat, in order to
sidetrack it away from revolution.

Neither de Man nor Jouhaux are the inventors of their “plans”. They
merely took fundamental demands from the _Marxist program of the
transition period_ – the nationalization of banks and key industries,
threw overboard the class struggle, and in place of the revolutionary
expropriation of the expropriators substituted the financial operation
of _purchasing_.

The power must remain, as previously, in the hands of the “people”, that
is to say, of the bourgeoisie. But the state purchases the most
important branches of industry (we are not told which ones precisely)
from their present proprietors, who become parasitic bond-holders for
two or three generations: the pure and simple private-capitalist
exploitation is replaced by an indirect exploitation through the medium
of state capitalism.

Since Jouhaux understands very well that even this emasculated program
of nationalization is absolutely unfeasible without a revolutionary
struggle, he announces in advance that he is ready to change his “Plan”
into the small change of parliamentary reforms after the manner of
planned economy now in fashion. The ideal of Jouhaux would be to scale
down the entire operation, by means of arrangements made behind the
scenes, to the seating of the trade-union bureaucrats in the different
economic and industrial boards without power and without authority but
with suitable fees.

It is not without good cause that Jouhaux’s plan – his actual plan,
which he hides behind the paper “Plan” – has received the support of the
Neo-Socialists and even the approval of Herriot! However, the sober
ideal of “independent” trade unionism cannot be materialized unless the
working masses submit to bondage. But what if the capitalist decline
continues? Then the plan, which was projected to sidetrack the workers
away from “evil thoughts”, can become the banner of a revolutionary
movement.

Obviously frightened by the Belgian example, Jouhaux made haste to
retreat. The most important point on the agenda of the National
Committee of the CGT in the middle of March – propaganda for the plan –
was unexpectedly shuffled away. If this manoeuvre proved more or less
successful, the blame for it falls entirely upon the leadership of the
united front.

The leaders of the CGT projected their “Plan” in order to obtain the
possibility for competing with the parties of the revolution. Thereby
Jouhaux has demonstrated that, following in the wake of his bourgeois
inspirers, he estimates the situation as revolutionary (in the wide
sense of the word). _But the revolutionary adversary has not appeared
upon the arena_. Jouhaux decided not to involve himself further on a
course which is full of risks. He retreated and today he is biding his
time.

In January the Central Committee of the Socialist Party proposed to the
Communist Party a joint struggle for power under the slogan of the
socialization of banks and heavy industry. Had there been revolutionists
seated in the Central Committee of the Communist Party, they would have
grabbed this proposal with both hands. By opening a large scale campaign
for power they would have accelerated the revolutionary mobilization
within the SFIO, and at the same time they would have compelled Jouhaux
to carry on an agitation of his “Plan”. By following this course the CGT
could have been forced to take its place in the United Front. The
specific weight of the French proletariat would have increased greatly.

But within the Central Committee of the Communist Party preside not
revolutionists but mandarins. “There is no revolutionary situation,”
they responded, contemplating their navels. The reformists of the SFIO
sighed with relief – the danger was over. Jouhaux made haste to
withdraw, from the agenda, the question of propaganda for the plan. The
proletariat remains in a great social crisis _without any program_. The
Communist International has played a reactionary role once again.

* * *

The crisis of agriculture provides today the principal reservoir for the
Bonapartist and Fascist tendencies. When misery seizes the peasant by
the throat he is capable of turning the most unexpected somersaults. He
views democracy with a growing distrust.

“The slogan of the defence of democratic liberties”, wrote Monmousseau
(CAHIERS DU BOLCHEVISME, September 1, 1934, page 1017), “perfectly suits
the spirit of the peasantry.” This remarkable assertion demonstrates
that Monmousseau understands as little concerning the peasant question
as he does concerning the trade-union question. The peasants are
beginning to turn their backs to the parties of the “left” precisely
because the latter are incapable of proposing anything to them except
frothy phrases about “the defence of democracy”.

No program of “immediate demands” can give any serious results to the
village. The proletariat must speak the _language of the revolution to
the peasants_: it will not find another language in common. The workers
must draw up a program of _revolutionary measures for the salvation of
agriculture jointly with the peasants_.

The peasants dread war above all. Should we, perhaps, together with
Laval and Litvinov delude them with hopes in a League of Nations and in
“disarmament"? The only way to escape war is by overthrowing one’s own
bourgeoisie and by sounding the signal for the transformation of Europe
into the _United States of Workers’ and Peasants’ Republics_. Outside of
revolution, there is no safety from war.

The toiling peasants are overwhelmed by the usurious terms of credit.
There is only one way to change these conditions: expropriate the banks,
concentrate them in the hands of the workers’ state and, at the expense
of the financial sharks, provide _credit_ to small peasants and to
peasant co-operatives in particular. _Peasant control_ must be
established over agricultural banks of credit.

The peasants are subjected to the exploitation of the fertilizer and
grain trusts. There is no way out other than the _nationalization_ of
fertilizer trusts and the big flour mills, and of subordinating them
completely to the interests of peasants and consumers.

The various strata of the peasantry (the tenant farmers and the
sharecroppers) are crushed beneath the exploitation of the great landed
proprietors. There is no method of struggle against _landed usury_ other
than the expropriation of the landed usurers by _peasants’ committees_
under the control of the workers’ and peasants’ state.

None of these measures is realizable under the rule of the bourgeoisie.
Meagre charity will not save the peasant, he has no use for palliatives.
He needs bold revolutionary measures. The peasant will understand them,
approve them and support them, if the worker makes him a serious
proposal to _struggle jointly_ for power.

We must not wait for the petty bourgeoisie to decide for itself but we
must _mould its opinions, strengthen its will_ – that is the task of the
working-class party. It is solely in this that the union of workers and
peasants can be achieved.

* * *

The mood of the majority of the army officers reflects the reactionary
mood of the ruling classes of the country, but in a much more
concentrated form. The mood of the mass of the soldiery reflects the
mood of the workers and peasants, but in a much weaker form: the
bourgeoisie knows much better how to maintain contact with the officers
than the proletariat with the soldiers.

Fascism impresses the officers very much because its slogans are
resolute and because it is prepared to settle difficult questions by
means of pistols and machine guns. We have quite a few disjointed
reports regarding the tie-up between the Fascist leagues and the army
through the medium of reserve as well as active officers, yet we obtain
knowledge only of a minute portion of what is going on in reality. Today
the rule of re-enlisted men in the army is growing. In them the reaction
will find quite a number of supplementary agents. _The Fascist nucleus
of the army, under the protection of the general staff, is marching
ahead_.

The young class-conscious workers in the barracks could put up a
successful resistance to the demoralizing Fascist influence. But the
great misfortune is that they are themselves politically disarmed: they
have no program. The unemployed youth, the son of a small peasant, of a
small trader or of a petty functionary, carry into the army the
discontent of the social strata from which they come. What will the
Communist in the barracks say to them – “the situation is not
revolutionary"? The Fascists pillage the Marxist program, successfully
transforming certain of its sections into an instrument of social
demagogy. The “Communists” (?) as a matter of fact, disown their own
program, substituting for it the rotten refuse of reformism. Can one
conceive of a more fraudulent bankruptcy?

L’HUMANITÉ concentrates upon “the immediate demands” of the soldiers:
that is necessary but that is only one one-hundredth of the program.
Today more than ever before the army lives a political life. Every
social crisis is necessarily a crisis in the army. _The French soldier
is waiting and seeking for clear answers. There is not and there cannot
be_ a better answer to the questions of the social crisis and a better
rejoinder to the demagogy of the Fascists than the _program of
Socialism_. It is necessary to spread it boldly throughout the country,
and it will penetrate through a thousand channels into the army!

* * *

The social crisis, with its train of calamities, weighs most heavily
upon the toiling women. They are doubly oppressed: by the possessing
class and by their own families.

There are to be found “socialists” who dread giving the women the right
to vote in view of the influence which the Church has upon them. As if
the fate of the people depended upon a lesser or greater number of
municipalities of the “left” in 1935, and not upon the moral, social and
political position of millions of workers and peasants during the next
period!

Every revolutionary crisis is characterized by the awakening of the best
qualities in the women of the toiling classes: their passion, their
heroism, their devotion. The influence of the Church will be swept away
not by the impotent rationalism of the “free thinkers”, not by the
insipid bigotry of the Freemasons, but by the revolutionary struggle for
the emancipation of humanity and, consequently, first of all, of the
working woman.

The program of the socialist revolution must resound in our time as the
tocsin for the women of the working class!

* * *

The most terrible condemnation of the leadership of the political and
trade-union working-class organizations is the weakness of the youth
organizations. In the sphere of _philanthropy, amusements and sports_,
the bourgeoisie and the Church are incomparably stronger than we are. We
cannot tear away the working-class youth from them except by means of
the socialist program and revolutionary action.

The young generation of the proletariat needs a political leadership but
not irksome guardians. The conservative bureaucratism stifles and repels
the youth. Had the régime of the Young Communist League existed in 1848,
we would not have had the _Gavroche_. The policies of passivity and
adaptation reflect in a particularly disastrous fashion upon the
_cadres_ of the youth. The young bureaucrats grow old before their time:
they master all sorts of behind-the-scenes manoeuvres, but they do not
know the ABC of Marxism. They embrace “convictions” upon this or another
occasion, depending upon the exigencies of the manoeuvre. Those among us
who participated in the last congress of the Seine Alliance have seen
plenty of this type.

It is necessary to pose the problem of the revolution in its full scope
before the working-class youth. In addressing ourselves to the younger
generation we must know how to appeal to its audacity and its courage
without which nothing great has ever been achieved in history. The
revolution will open the gates wide for the youth. The youth cannot fail
to be for the revolution!
 

Why the Fourth International?

In its letter to the National Council of the Socialist Party, the
Central Committee of the Communist Party proposed as the basis for
unification “the program of the Communist International, which has led
to the victory of socialism in the USSR, whereas the program of the
Second International was unable to stand up to the tragic test of the
war and resulted in the disastrous balance sheet of Germany and
Austria”. Revolutionary Marxists announced in August 1914, that the
Second International had failed. All subsequent events have only
confirmed this estimate. But in showing the incontestable bankruptcy of
the Social Democracy in Germany and Austria, the Stalinists forgot to
reply to one question: _what became of the German and Austrian sections
of the Communist International?_ The German Communist Party fell before
the test of history as ignominiously as the German Social Democracy.
Why? The German workers wanted to struggle, and believed that “Moscow”
would lead them to battle; they were moving steadily to the left. The
German Communist Party was growing rapidly; in Berlin it was larger than
the Social-Democratic Party. But before the hour of test came, it was
ravaged from within. The stifling of the interior life of the party, the
wish to give orders instead of to convince, the zigzag policies, the
appointment of leaders from the top, the system of lies and deception
for the masses – all this demoralized the party to its marrow. When
danger approached, the party was found to be a corpse. It is impossible
to erase this fact from history.

After the shameful capitulation of the Communist International in
Germany, the Bolshevik-Leninists, without hesitating a moment,
proclaimed: the Third International is dead! There is no need to recall
the insults that were thrown at us by the Stalinists in all countries.
L’HUMANITÉ, even after Hitler’s definitive victory, kept saying in issue
after issue: “There has been no defeat in Germany”; “Only renegades will
talk about defeat”; “The German Communist Party is growing by the hour”:
“The party of Thälmann is getting ready for the seizure of power”. There
is nothing surprising in the fact that this criminal bombast in the face
of the greatest of historical catastrophes has still further demoralized
the other sections of the Communist International. An organization which
has lost the capacity of learning from its own defeats is irrevocably
condemned.

Proof was not long in coming. The Saar plebiscite was, we might say, an
experiment expressly designed to show how much confidence the German
proletariat had left in the Second and Third Internationals. The results
are known: facing the necessity of choosing between the triumphant
violence of Hitler and the rotten impotence of the bankrupt
working-class parties, the masses gave Hitler 90 per cent of their votes
and (if we leave out the Jewish bourgeoisie, certain interested business
men, the pacifists, etc.) probably no more than 7 per cent to the united
front of the Second and Third Internationals. _This is the combined
balance sheet of reformism and Stalinism_. Alas for those who have not
understood this lesson!

The working masses voted for Hitler because they saw no other road. The
parties which for decades had aroused and organized them in the name of
socialism, deceived and betrayed them. That is the general conclusion
that the workers came to. If the flag of the socialist revolution had
been raised higher in France, the Saar proletariat would have turned its
eyes to the West and would have put class solidarity above national
solidarity. But, unfortunately, the crow of the French cock did not
announce a revolutionary dawn to the people of the Saar. Under cover of
the United Front in France, there reigned the same policy of feebleness,
of indecision, of marking time, of lack of confidence, that lost the
cause of the German proletariat. That is why the Saar plebiscite is not
merely a test of the results of the German catastrophe, but _a
formidable warning for the French proletariat_. Disaster awaits the
parties which slide over the surface of events, lull themselves with
words, hope in miracles and allow the mortal enemy to organize without
hindrance, to arm, to occupy the advantageous positions and to choose
the most favourable moment for launching the decisive blow!

This is the lesson of the Saar.

* * *

Many reformists and centrists (that is, those who hesitate between
reformism and a revolutionary position) in turning to the left are now
trying to move towards the Communist International: some of them,
especially the workers, sincerely hope to find the reflection of the
October revolution in Moscow’s program: others, especially bureaucrats,
are merely trying to establish friendly ties with the powerful Soviet
bureaucracy. Let us leave the careerists to their own fate. But we say
to those socialists who sincerely hope to find a revolutionary force in
the Communist International: you are cruelly deceived. You do not
understand the history of the Communist International, which for the
past ten years has been a history of errors, catastrophes,
capitulations, and bureaucratic degeneration.

The present program of the Communist International was adopted at the
Sixth Congress, in 1928, after the crushing of the Leninist wing. There
is an abyss between the present program and that with which Bolshevism
achieved victory in 1917. The program of Bolshevism started with the
point of view that the fate of the October revolution is inseparable
from the fate of the international revolution. The program of 1928, in
spite of all its “internationalist” phrases, starts with the perspective
of the _independent building of socialism in the USSR_. The program of
Lenin declares: “Without revolution in the West and in the Orient, we
are lost.” This program, _by its very essence_, precludes the
possibility of sacrificing the interests of the world workers’ movement
for the interests of the USSR. The program of the Communist
International means in practice: the interests of the proletarian
revolution in France can and ought to be sacrificed to the interests of
the USSR (more strictly, to the interests of the diplomatic deals of the
Soviet bureaucracy). The program of Lenin warns: Soviet bureaucratism is
the worst enemy of socialism: bureaucratism, which reflects the pressure
of bourgeois forces and tendencies, can lead to a revival of the
bourgeoisie; the success of the struggle against the scourge of
bureaucratism can be assured only by the victory of the European and the
world proletariat. Contrary to this, the present program of the
Communist International states: socialism can be built independently of
the successes or defeats of the world proletarian movement, under the
guidance of the infallible and all-powerful Soviet bureaucracy; anything
directed against the infallibility of the bureaucracy is
counter-revolutionary and should be exterminated.

In the present program of the Communist International there are, of
course, plenty of expressions, formulas, phrases, etc., borrowed from
the program of Lenin (the reactionary bureaucracy of Thermidor and the
Consulate in France used Jacobin terminology in the same way) but at
bottom the two programs are mutually exclusive. In practice, indeed, the
Stalinist bureaucracy long ago replaced the program of the international
proletarian revolution with a program of soviet national reforms.
Disorienting and enfeebling the world proletariat by its policies, which
are a mixture of opportunism and adventurism, the Communist
International thereby likewise undermines the fundamental interests of
the USSR. We are _for_ the USSR but _against_ the usurping bureaucracy
and its blind instrument, the Communist International.

Manuilsky, yesterday head of the Communist International, was submerged
without leaving a trace in the “third period” (in which, alas, he had
only an insignificant position). Manuilsky was replaced, for no
ostensible reason, by Béla Kun. It is necessary to say a few words about
this new ruler of the Communist International. As Hungarian prisoner of
war in Russia, Béla Kun, like many other prisoners, became a Communist,
and on his return to Hungary, head of a small party. The prostration of
the government of Count Karolyi before the Entente, ended in the
peaceful transfer of power by consent to the workers’ parties without
any revolution. The Communists of the party of Béla Kun hurried to unite
with the Social Democrats. Inspirer of soviet Hungary, Béla Kun gave
evidence of a complete bankruptcy, especially on the peasant question,
which led rapidly to the collapse of the soviets. After his return as an
émigré in the USSR, Béla Kun always had positions of minor importance,
because he did not at all enjoy the political confidence of Lenin. One
is aware of the very violent speech of Lenin at the Plenum of the
Executive Committee of the Communist International, on the eve of the
3rd Congress: almost every sentence recalled the “follies of Béla Kun”.
In my booklet on the leadership of the Communist International I have
related how Lenin explained his violent attack on Béla Kun to me: “It is
necessary to teach people not to have confidence in him”. Since this
time, not only did Béla Kun learn nothing, but he even forgot what
little he had assimilated in the school of Lenin. One can see to what
extent this man was cut out for the role of the head of the Communist
International, and in particular of the French proletariat.

We grant that the Communist Party even now is growing. This is not
thanks to its policies, but in spite of them. Events push the workers to
the left. The Communist Party, in spite of its present opportunist turn,
represents in their eyes the “extreme left”. The numerical growth of the
Communist Party carries with it no guarantee whatever for the future:
the German Communist Party, as we said before, grew up to the moment of
its capitulation, and even more rapidly.

In any case, the fact of the existence of two working-class parties,
which makes a policy of united front in the face of common danger
absolutely necessary, likewise suffices to explain the aspirations of
the workers for organic unity. If there were a genuine revolutionary
party in France we should be firm opponents of fusion with an
opportunist party. Under the conditions of the sharpened social crisis,
the revolutionary party, in a struggle against reformism, would
unquestionably rally under its banner the overwhelming majority of the
workers. The historical problem is not to unite mechanically all the
organizations, which continue to exist as representatives of different
stages of the class struggle, but to rally the proletariat in struggle
and for struggle. There are two absolutely different and even
contradictory problems.

But it is a fact that in France there is no revolutionary party. The
ease with which the Communist Party – without the least internal
discussion – went over from the theory and practice of “social fascism”
to a bloc with the Radical Socialists and the repudiation of
revolutionary tasks for the sake of “immediate demands”, demonstrates
that the apparatus of the party is completely shot through with
cynicism, and its membership disoriented and unaccustomed to thinking.
It is _a diseased party_.

We have criticized the position of the SFIO openly enough not to need a
repetition of what we have already said more than once. But it is
nevertheless unquestionable that the revolutionary left wing of the SFIO
little by little is becoming the laboratory in which the slogans and
methods of proletarian struggle are forming. If this wing fortifies
itself and becomes hardened, it can become the decisive factor in
arousing the Communist workers. It is along this road alone that
salvation is possible. On the other hand, the situation will be
irrevocably lost if the revolutionary wing of the Socialist Party falls
into the meshes of the apparatus of the Communist International, which
smashes backbones and characters, destroys the power of thinking and
teaches blind obedience; this system is frankly disastrous as a means of
making revolutionists.

Some comrades will ask us, not without indignation, “Would you be
against organic unity?”

No, we are not against unity. But we are against fetishism, superstition
and blindness. Unity in itself solves nothing. The Austrian Social
Democracy rallied almost the entire proletariat, but only to lead it to
ruin. The Belgian Labour Party has the right to call itself the sole
party of the proletariat, but that does not prevent it from going from
capitulation to capitulation. Only people hopelessly naïve can hope that
the Labour Party, which completely dominates the British proletariat, is
capable of achieving victory. What decides the issue is not unity in
itself but its actual political content.

If the SFIO should unite this very day with the Communist Party, that
would not guarantee victory any more than the United Front guarantees
it: only correct revolutionary policies can bring victory. But we are
ready to grant that unification, under present conditions, would
facilitate the regrouping and reorganization of the genuinely
revolutionary elements now scattered throughout the two parties. It is
in this sense, and in this sense only, that unification would be a step
forward.

But unification – let us be clear about this point – would be a step
backward, even a step towards the abyss, if in the new party the
struggle against opportunism were directed in the channels of the
Communist International. The Stalinist apparatus is capable of
exploiting a victorious revolution, but it is organically incapable of
assuring the victory of a new revolution. It is conservative to its
marrow. _Let us repeat once again: the Soviet bureaucracy has as much in
common with the old Bolshevik Party as the bureaucracy of the Directory
and of the Consulate had with Jacobinism_.

The unification of the two parties would not lead us forward unless
there is a break with illusions, blindness and outright deception. The
left Socialists must have a heavy inoculation of Leninism in order not
to fall victim of the disease of the Communist International. This,
among other reasons, is precisely why we are following the evolution of
the left groupings so attentively and so critically. Some feel offended
by our attitude. But we believe that in revolutionary matters the rules
of responsibility are incomparably more important than the rules of
etiquette. Likewise, we accept criticism directed against us, from a
revolutionary and not from a sentimental point of view.

* * *

In a series of articles, Zyromsky has tried to indicate the fundamental
principles of the future unified party. This is a much more serious
matter than repeating general phrases about unity in the manner of
Lebas. Unfortunately, Zyromsky, in his articles, has a
reformist-centrist tendency whose direction is not towards Leninism but
towards bureaucratic centrism (Stalinism). This comes out clearly, as we
shall show, in the question of the dictatorship of the proletariat.

For some reason or other, Zyromsky, in a whole series of articles,
repeats with especial insistence the idea (moreover pointing to Stalin
as original source) that “the dictatorship of the proletariat can never
be considered as an end in itself.” As if there were somewhere in the
world insane theoreticians who thought that the dictatorship of the
proletariat was an “end in itself”! But in these odd repetitions there
lurks an idea: Zyromsky is making his excuses to the workers in advance
for wanting a dictatorship. Unfortunately, it is difficult to establish
the dictatorship if we begin by apologizing for it.

Much worse, however, is the following idea: “This dictatorship of the
proletariat . must be relaxed and progressively transformed into
workers’ democracy in proportion to the extent of the development of
socialist construction.” In these few lines there are two profound
errors in principle. The dictatorship of the proletariat _is set up
against_ workers’ democracy. However, the dictatorship of the
proletariat by its very essence can and should be the supreme expression
of workers’ democracy. In order to bring about a great social
revolution, there must be for the proletariat a supreme manifestation of
all its forces and all its capacities: the proletariat is organized
democratically, precisely in order to put an end to its enemies. The
dictatorship, according to Lenin, should “teach every cook to direct the
state”. The heavy hand of dictatorship is directed against the class
enemies: _the foundation of the dictatorship is workers’ democracy_.

According to Zyromsky, workers’ democracy will replace the dictatorship
“in proportion to the extent of the development of socialist
construction”. This is an absolutely false perspective. In proportion to
the extent that bourgeois society is transformed into socialist society,
the workers’ democracy will wither away together with the dictatorship,
for the state itself will wither away. In a socialist society, there
will be no place for “workers’ democracy”, first of all, because there
will be no working class, and secondly because there will be no need for
state repression. This is why the development of socialist society must
mean not the transformation of the dictatorship into a democracy, but
their common dissolution into the economic and cultural organization of
the socialist society.

We should not have spent time on this error if it had a purely theoretic
character. As a matter of fact there hides behind it a whole political
scheme. Zyromsky tries to adapt the theory of the dictatorship of the
proletariat (which, according to his own admission, he has borrowed from
Dan) to the present régime of the Soviet bureaucracy. Moreover, he
deliberately shuts his eyes to the following question: why is it that,
in spite of the enormous economic successes of the USSR, the proletarian
dictatorship has developed not towards democracy but towards a monstrous
bureaucratism which definitely is taking on the character of a personal
régime? Why is it that, “in proportion to the extent of the development
of socialist construction”, the party, the soviets and the unions are
strangled? It is impossible to answer this question without a decisive
criticism of Stalinism. But this is exactly what Zyromsky wishes to
avoid at all costs.

However, the fact that an independent and uncontrolled bureaucracy has
usurped the defence of the socialist conquests of the proletarian
revolution testifies that we are confronted with a diseased and
degenerating dictatorship which, if left to itself, will end not in
“workers’ democracy”, but in the complete collapse of the soviet régime.

Only revolution in the West can save the October revolution from defeat.
The theory of “socialism in one country” is false in every root and
branch. The whole program of the Communist International is just as
false. To adopt this program would be to throw the train of the
revolution off the tracks. The first condition for the success of the
French proletariat is the complete independence of its vanguard from the
nationalist and conservative Soviet bureaucracy. Naturally, the
Communist Party has a right to propose the program of the Communist
International as the basis for unification: it could hardly offer any
other. But revolutionary Marxists, who understand their responsibilities
for the fate of the proletariat, must submit the program of
Bukharin-Stalin to pitiless criticism. Unity is a magnificent thing, but
not on a rotted foundation. The progressive task is to rally the
Socialist and Communist workers on the foundation of the international
program of Marx and Lenin. The interests of the world proletariat as
well as the interests of the USSR (they are not different) demands the
same struggle against Stalinism as against reformism.

* * *

The two Internationals, not merely the Second but also the Third, are
tainted to the marrow. The proofs of history do not deceive. Great
events (China, England, Germany, Austria, Spain) have given their
verdict. From this verdict confirmed in the Saar, no further appeal is
possible. The preparation for a new international, resting on the tragic
lessons of the last ten years, is on the order of the day. This mighty
task is closely bound up with the whole progress of the proletarian
class struggle, above all with the struggle against Fascism in France.
To conquer the enemy, the vanguard of the proletariat must assimilate
the methods of revolutionary Marxism, methods incompatible both with
opportunism and with Stalinism. Will we succeed in fulfilling this task?
Engels once wrote: “The French always take on new life at the approach
of battle.” Let us hope that this time we shall fully justify the
estimate of our great teacher. But the victory of the French proletariat
is conceivable only if, from the fire of struggle, there emerges a truly
revolutionary party which will become the keystone of the new
international. This road will be the shortest, the most advantageous and
the most favourable for the international revolution.

It would be stupid to say that success is assured. If victory is
possible, defeat too, unfortunately, is not excluded. _The present
policies of the United Front, like those of the two trade-union
organizations, do not facilitate but jeopardize victory_. It is
completely clear that in the event of the crushing of the French
proletariat its two parties will definitely disappear from the scene,
The necessity for a new international, on new foundations, would then
become evident to every worker. But it is likewise completely clear in
advance that, in the event of the triumph of Fascism in France, the
building of the Fourth International would encounter a thousand
obstacles and would proceed with extreme slowness; and that the centre
of the entire revolutionary movement, from every indication, would be
transferred to America.

Thus the two historical alternatives – victory or defeat for the French
proletariat – lead equally, though with different rhythms, toward the
road to the Fourth International. It is precisely this historical
tendency that the Bolshevik-Leninists express. We are strangers to
adventurism in any form. We are not talking about “proclaiming” in an
artificial manner the existence of the Fourth International, but of
preparing for it systematically. By the test of events, we must show and
demonstrate to the advanced workers that the programs and methods of the
two existing internationals are in insurmountable contradiction to the
requirements of the proletarian revolution, and that the contradictions
will not grow less but will, on the contrary, continually increase. From
this analysis flows the only possible general line: we must,
theoretically and practically, prepare for the Fourth International.

* * *

In February there took place an international conference of several
organizations belonging neither to the Second nor to the Third
Internationals (two Dutch parties, the German SAP, the British ILP,
etc.). Except for the Dutch, who have a revolutionary Marxist position,
all the other participants represent different varieties – on the whole,
conservative varieties – of centrism. J. Doriot, who attended the
conference, wrote in his account of it: “At the time when the crisis of
capitalism offers startling verification of the Marxist theses. The
parties created in the name of Marxism, whether by the Second or by the
Third Internationals, _have all failed in their mission_.” We will not
linger over the fact that Doriot himself, in the course of a ten year
struggle against the Left Opposition, helped to disintegrate the
Communist International. In particular, we will not stop to recall the
sad role played by Doriot in the matter of the Chinese revolution. Let
us concern ourselves merely with the fact that in February 1935, Doriot
understood and recognized the failure of the Second and Third
Internationals. Does he conclude from this failure the necessity for
preparing the new international? To suppose so would be failing entirely
to understand centrism. Doriot writes on the question of the new
international: “This Trotskyist idea was formally condemned by the
conference.” Doriot lets himself be carried away when he talks about
“formal condemnation”, but it is true that, against the two Dutch
delegates, the conference _rejected_ the idea of the Fourth
International. In this case, what then is the real program of the
conference? It is to have no program. In its daily work the participants
in the conference put aside the international tasks of the proletarian
revolution and think about them very little. But every year or so they
hold a congress to soothe their hearts and to say: “The Second and Third
Internationals have failed.” After having nodded their heads sadly, they
break up. We had better call this “organization” a “Bureau for the
annual celebration of a funeral service for the Second and Third
Internationals”.

These venerable people believe themselves to be “realists”,
“tacticians”, even “Marxists”. They do no more than to scatter around
aphorisms: “We must not anticipate events “: “The masses do not yet
understand “; etc. But why then do you anticipate events yourselves by
declaring the bankruptcy of the two internationals: the “masses” have
not yet understood it? And the masses who have understood it – without
your help – they vote for Hitler in the Saar. You subordinate the
preparation of the Fourth International to a “historical process”. But
are you not yourselves part of this process? Marxists must always be at
the head of the historical process. Just what part of the process do you
represent?

“The masses do not yet understand”. But the masses are not homogeneous.
New ideas are first assimilated by the advanced elements, and, through
them, penetrate the masses. If you yourselves, lofty, wise men that you
are, understand the inescapable necessity for the Fourth International,
what right would you have to hide this conclusion from the masses? Worse
still: after having recognized the failure of the existing
internationals, Doriot “condemns” (!!!) the idea of the new
international. What concrete perspective, then, does he give to the
revolutionary vanguard? None! But this means to sow confusion, trouble
and demoralization.

Such is the nature of centrism. We must understand its nature to its
roots. Under the pressure of circumstances, centrism can go far in
analysis, evaluation, criticism: in this realm, the leaders of the SAP,
who led the conference about which we have been speaking, repeated,
scrupulously, much of what the Bolshevik-Leninists said two, three or
ten years ago. But the centrist stops short fearfully when faced with
revolutionary conclusions. A family celebration of a funeral service for
the Communist International? Why not? But preparation for the New
International? No, indeed . Much better to “condemn” Trotskyism.

Doriot has no position. And he doesn’t want to have any. After his break
with the bureaucracy of the Communist International, he might have
played a progressive and weighty role. But up to now he has not even
approached it. He casts off revolutionary tasks. He has chosen, for his
teacher, the leaders of the SAP. Does he want to be enrolled permanently
in the corporation of centrists? Let him understand that a centrist is a
knife without a blade!
 

Conclusion

“Wait”, “Endure”, “Gain Time” – these are the slogans of the reformists,
the pacifists, the trade unionists and the Stalinists. This policy
thrives upon the idea that _time works in our favour_. Is this true?
This is fundamentally false. If in a pre-revolutionary situation, we do
not conduct a revolutionary policy, then time works _against us_.

Despite the hollow hymns sung in honour of the United Front, the
relationship of forces has changed during the last year to the detriment
of the proletariat. Why? Marceau Pivert has given a correct answer to
this question in his article “All Things Wait”, (_Populaire_, March 18,
1935.) Directed behind the scenes by finance capital, all the forces and
all the detachments of reaction are carrying out an unceasing policy of
offence, capturing new positions, strengthening them, and marching
forward (industry, agriculture, the schools, the press, the courts, the
army). On the part of the proletariat there are only phrases heard about
taking the offensive; as a matter of fact, there is not even a defence
put up. The positions are not being strengthened, but being surrendered
without a battle, or are being prepared for surrender.

The political relationship of forces is determined not solely by the
objective factors (the role in the productive process, numerical
strength, etc.) but by subjective factors: the _consciousness of
strength_ is the most important element of _actual strength_. While,
from one day to the next, Fascism raises the self-confidence of the
declassed petty bourgeoisie, the leading groups of the United Front
weaken the will of the proletariat. Pacifists, disciples of Buddha and
of Gandhi, but not of Marx and Lenin, exercise themselves in preaching
against violence, against arming, against physical struggle. The
Stalinists preach basically the very same thing, invoking solely the
“non-revolutionary situation”. Between the Fascists and the pacifists of
all shades, a division of labour has become established: the former
strengthen the camp of reaction, the latter debilitate the camp of
revolution. Such is the naked truth!

_Does this mean that the situation is hopeless? . Not at all!_

Two important factors militate against the reformists and the
Stalinists. First: the fresh lessons of Germany, Austria and Spain are
before the eyes of everybody; the working-class masses are alarmed, the
reformists and the Stalinists are embarrassed. Secondly: the Marxists
have succeeded in posing in time the problems of the revolution before
the proletarian vanguard.

We, Bolshevik-Leninists, are far removed from the desire to exaggerate
our numbers. But the power of our slogans flows from the fact that they
reflect the logic of the development of the present pre-revolutionary
situation. At each stage events confirm our analysis and our criticism.
The left wing of the Socialist Party is growing. In the Communist Party,
criticism is stifled, as hitherto. But the growth of the revolutionary
wing in the SFIO will inevitably open a breach in the deadly,
bureaucratic discipline of the Stalinists: the revolutionists of the two
parties will extend their hands to one another in joint activities.

Our rule remains what it always was: _to say what is_. That is the
greatest service that one can now perform for the revolutionary cause.
The forces of the proletariat have not been expended. The petty
bourgeoisie has not made its choice as yet. We have lost a good deal of
time, but the last extensions of time have not yet been exhausted.

_Victory is possible!_ Even more: _Victory is certain_ – in so far as
victory can be made certain in advance – provided only that: _we have
the will to victory. We must aspire to victory, we must surmount the
obstacles, we must overwhelm the enemy, knock him down and put our knee
on his chest._

Comrades, friends, brothers and sisters! The Bolshevik-Leninists summon
you to struggle and to victory!


Leon Trotsky

Whither France?

------------------------------------------------------------------------



COMMITTEES OF ACTION – NOT PEOPLE’S FRONT


(November 26, 1935)

 

“The People’s Front” represents the coalition of the proletariat with
the imperialist bourgeoisie, in the shape of the Radical Party and
smaller tripe of the same sort. The coalition extends both to the
parliamentary and the extra-parliamentary spheres. In both spheres the
Radical Party, preserving for itself complete freedom of action,
coarsely imposes restrictions upon the freedom of action of the
proletariat.

The Radical Party itself is undergoing decay. Each new election gives
added proof of the passage of supporters away from it to the right and
to the left. On the other hand, the Socialist and Communist Parties,
because of the absence of a genuinely revolutionary party – are growing
stronger. The general trend of the toiling masses, including the petty
bourgeoisie, is quite clearly to the left. The orientation of the
leaders of the workers’ parties is no less self evident: _to the right_.
At the time when the masses by their votes and their struggle seek to
cast off the party of the Radicals, the leaders of the United Front, on
the contrary, seek to save it. After obtaining the confidence of the
masses of workers on the basis of a “socialist” program, the leaders of
the workers’ parties then proceeded to concede voluntarily a lion’s
share of this confidence to the Radicals, in whom the masses of workers
have absolutely no confidence.

“The People’s Front” in its present guise, shamelessly tramples not only
upon workers’ democracy but also upon formal, i.e. bourgeois democracy.
The majority of the Radical voters do not participate in the struggle of
the toilers and consequently in the People’s Front. Yet the Radical
Party occupies in this front not only an equal but a privileged
position; the workers parties are compelled to restrict their activity
to the program of the Radical Party. This idea is most outspokenly
advanced by the cynics of L’HUMANITÉ. The latest elections in the Senate
have illuminated with special clarity the _privileged_ position of the
Radicals in the People’s Front. The leaders of the Communist Party
boasted openly of the fact that they renounced in favour of
non-proletarian parties several mandates which justly belonged to the
workers. This merely means that the united front re-established in part
the property qualification in favour of the bourgeoisie.

The “Front”, as it is conceived, is an organization for a direct and
immediate struggle. When struggle is in question, every worker is worth
ten bourgeois, even those adhering to the united front. From the
standpoint of the revolutionary fighting strength of the Front, the
electoral privileges should have been given not to radical bourgeois but
to workers. But in essence, privileges are uncalled for here. Is the
People’s Front intended for defence of “democracy"? Then let it begin by
applying it to its own ranks. This means: _the leadership of the
People’s Front must be the direct and immediate reflection of the will
of the struggling masses._

How? Very simply: through elections. The proletariat does not deny
anyone the right to struggle side by side with it against Fascism, the
Bonapartist régime of Laval, the war plot of the imperialists, and all
other forms of oppression and violence. The sole demand that
class-conscious workers put to their actual or potential allies is that
they struggle _in action_. Every group of the population really
participating in the struggle at a given stage, and ready to submit to
common discipline, must have the equal right to exert influence on the
leadership of the People’s Front.

Each two hundred, five hundred or thousand citizens adhering in a given
city, district, factory, barrack and village to the People’s Front, in
time of fighting actions, elect their representative to the local
committee of action. All the participants in the struggle are bound by
its discipline.

The last Congress of the Communist International in its resolution on
the Dimitrov report expressed itself in favour of elected Committees of
Action as the mass support for the People’s Front. This is perhaps the
only progressive idea in the entire resolution. But precisely for this
reason the Stalinists do nothing to realize it. They dare not do so for
fear of breaking off collaboration with the bourgeoisie.

To be sure, in the election of Committees not only workers will be able
to participate but also civil service employees, functionaries, war
veterans, artisans, small merchants, and small peasants. Thus the
Committees of Action are in closest harmony with the tasks of the
struggle of the proletariat for influence over the petty bourgeoisie.
But they complicate to the extreme the collaboration between the
workers’ bureaucracy and the bourgeoisie. In the meantime the People’s
Front in its present form is nothing else than the organization of class
collaboration between the political exploiters of the proletariat (the
reformists and the Stalinists) and the political exploiters of the petty
bourgeoisie (the Radicals). Real mass elections of the Committees of
Action would automatically eject the bourgeois middlemen (the Radicals)
from the ranks of the People’s Front and thus blow to smithereens the
criminal policy dictated by Moscow.

However it would be a mistake to think that it is possible at a set day
and hour to call the proletarian and petty-bourgeois masses to elect
Committees of Action on the basis of a given statute. Such an approach
would be purely bureaucratic and consequently barren. The workers will
be able to elect a Committee of Action only in those cases when they
themselves participate in some sort of action and feel the need for
revolutionary leadership. In question here is not the _formal
democratic_ representation of _all_ and _any_ masses but the
revolutionary representation of the _struggling_ masses. The Committee
of Action is an apparatus of struggle. There is no sense in guessing
beforehand precisely what strata of the toilers will be attracted to the
creation of Committees of Action: the lines of demarcation in the
struggling masses will be established during the struggle itself.

The greatest danger in France lies in the fact that the revolutionary
energy of the masses will be dissipated in spurts, in isolated
explosions like Toulon, Brest and Limoges, and give way to apathy. Only
conscious traitors or hopeless muddle-heads are capable of thinking that
in the present situation it is possible to hold the masses immobilized
up to the moment when they will be blessed from above by the government
of the People’s Front. Strikes, protests, street clashes, direct
uprisings are absolutely inevitable in the present situation. The task
of the proletarian party consists not in checking and paralysing these
movements but in unifying them and investing them with the greatest
possible force.

The reformists and Stalinists fear, above all, to frighten the Radicals.
The apparatus of the united front quite consciously plays the role of
disorganizer in relation to sporadic movements of the masses. And the
“lefts” of the Marceau Pivert type serve to shield this apparatus from
the indignation of the masses. The situation can be saved only by aiding
the struggling masses to create a new apparatus, in the process of the
struggle itself, which meets the requirements of the moment. The
Committees of Action are intended for this very purpose. During the
struggle in Toulon and Brest, the workers would have created without any
hesitation a local fighting organization had they been called upon to do
so. On the very next day after the bloody assault in Limoges, the
workers and a considerable section of the petty bourgeoisie would have
indubitably revealed their readiness to create an elected committee to
investigate the bloody events and to prevent them in the future. During
the movement in the barracks, in the summer of this year, against Rabiot
(the extension of the term of military service), the soldiers, without
much ado, would have elected battalion, regimental and garrison
committees of action had such a road been suggested to them. Similar
situations arise and will continue to arise at every step. In most cases
on a local but, often, also on a national scale. The task is not to miss
a single situation of this kind. The first condition for this is a clear
understanding of the import of the Committee of Action _as the only
means of breaking the anti-revolutionary opposition of party and
trade-union apparatus_.

Does this mean to say that the Committees of Action are substitutes for
party and trade-union organizations? It would be stupid to pose the
question in this manner. The masses enter into the struggle with all
their ideas, traditions, groupings and organizations. The parties
continue to exist and to struggle. During elections to the Committees of
Action each party will naturally seek to elect its own adherents. The
Committees of Action will arrive at decisions through a majority (given
complete freedom of party and factional groupings). In relation to
parties, the Committees of Action may be called the _revolutionary
parliament_: the parties are not excluded but on the contrary they are
necessarily presupposed; at the same time they are tested in action and
the masses learn to free themselves from the influence of rotten
parties.

Does this mean, then, that the Committees of Action are simply –
_soviets_? Under certain conditions the Committees of Action can
transform themselves into soviets. However, it would be incorrect to
call the Committees of Action by this name. Today, in 1935, the popular
masses have become accustomed to associate with the word soviets the
conception of power already conquered; but France today is still
considerably removed from this. The Russian soviets during their initial
stages were not at all what they subsequently became and in those days
they were often called by the modest name of workers’ or strike
committees. Committees of Action at their present stage have as their
task to unite in a defensive struggle the toiling masses of France and
thus imbue these masses with the consciousness of their own power for
the coming offensive. Whether matters will reach genuine soviets depends
on whether the present critical situation in France will unfold to the
ultimate revolutionary conclusions. This of course depends not only upon
the will of the revolutionary vanguard but also upon a number of
objective conditions; in any case the mass movement, that has today run
up against the barrier of the People’s Front, will be unable to move
forward without the Committees of Action.

Such tasks as the creation of _workers’ militia, the arming of the
workers_, the preparation of a _general strike_, will remain on paper if
the struggling masses themselves, through their authoritative organs, do
not occupy themselves with these tasks. Only Committees of Action born
in the struggle can assure a real militia numbering fighters not by the
thousand but the tens of thousands. Only Committees of Action embracing
the most important centres of the country will be able to choose the
moment for transition to more decisive methods of struggle, the
leadership of which will be rightly theirs.

* * *

From the propositions sketched above there flows a number of conclusions
for the political activity of the proletarian revolutionists in France.
The cardinal conclusion touches upon the so-called “revolutionary (?)
left”. This grouping is characterized by a complete lack of
understanding of the laws that govern the movement of the revolutionary
masses. No matter how much the centrists babble about the “masses” they
always orient themselves upon the reformist apparatus. Repeating this or
that revolutionary slogan, Marceau Pivert subordinates it to the
abstract principle of “organizational unity” which in action turns out
to be unity with the patriots against the revolutionists. At the time
when it is a life and death question for the masses to _smash_ the
opposition of the united social-patriotic apparatuses as an absolute
“good” which stands above the interests of revolutionary struggle.

Committees of Action will be built only by those who understand, to the
end, the necessity of _freeing the masses from the treacherous
leadership of the social-patriots_. Yet Pivert clutches at Zyromsky, who
clutches at Blum, who in turn, together with Thorez, clutches at
Herriot, who clutches at Laval. Pivert enters into the system of the
People’s Front (not for nothing did he vote for the shameful resolution
of Blum at the last National Council meeting!) and the People’s Front
enters as a wing into the Bonapartist régime of Laval. The downfall of
the Bonapartist régime is inevitable. Should the leadership of the
People’s Front (Herriot-Blum-Cachin-Thorez-Zyromsky-Pivert) succeed in
remaining on its feet in the course of the entire approaching and
decisive period, then the Bonapartist régime will inevitably give way to
Fascism. The condition for the victory of the proletariat is the
_liquidation of the present leadership_. The slogan of “unity” becomes
under these conditions not only a stupidity but a crime. _No unity with
the agents of French imperialism and of the League of nations_. To their
perfidious leadership it is necessary to counterpose revolutionary
Committees of Action. It is possible to build these committees only by
mercilessly exposing the anti-revolutionary policies of the so-called
“revolutionary left” with Marceau Pivert at the head. There is of course
no room in our ranks for illusions and doubts on this score.


Leon Trotsky

Whither France?

------------------------------------------------------------------------



FRANCE AT THE TURNING POINT


(March 26, 1936)

 

This book is devoted to elucidating the methods of the revolutionary
policies of the proletariat in our epoch. The presentation is polemical
in nature, like the revolutionary policy itself. Once the masses have
been won, the polemic against the ruling class turns, at a certain
stage, into revolution.

Revolutionary policy has its theoretical basis in a clear understanding
of the class nature of modern society, of its state, its laws and its
ideology. The bourgeoisie operates with abstractions (“nation”,
“fatherland”, “democracy”) in order to cover up thereby the exploiting
character of its rule. LE TEMPS, one of the most venal newspapers on the
terrestrial globe, gives daily lectures to the popular masses of France
on patriotism and altruism. Meanwhile, it is a secret to nobody that the
altruism of LE TEMPS itself is on the market at fixed international
rates.

The first step of revolutionary politics is the exposure of bourgeois
fictions which poison the consciousness of the masses. These fictions
acquire a particularly malignant character when amalgamated with the
ideas of “socialism” and “revolution”. Today, more than ever before, the
tone in the workers’ organizations of France is being set by the
manufacturers of such amalgams.

The first edition of this book played a certain role in the formative
stages of the French Communist Party. At that time considerable evidence
of this came to the author’s notice, and, incidentally, it is not
difficult to find traces of it in L’HUMANITÉ up to the year 1924. During
the twelve years that have since elapsed, a radical recasting of values
took place in the Communist International – after a number of feverish
zigzags. Suffice to mention that this work is listed today among the
proscribed books. In their ideas and methods, the present leaders of the
French Communist Party (we are compelled to retain this name which is in
complete variance with reality) do not differ in any principle from
Kautsky, against whom our work was originally directed. They are only
infinitely more ignorant and cynical. The relapse into reformism and
patriotism that Cachin and Co. are now living through might itself have
served as a sufficient justification for a new edition of this book.
However, more serious motives exist: they are rooted in the profound
pre-revolutionary crisis which is convulsing the régime of the Third
Republic.

* * *

After a lapse of eighteen years, the author of this book has had the
occasion to spend two years in France (1933-35); to be sure, only as an
observer in the provinces, who, moreover, found himself under constant
police surveillance. During this time, in the Isère Department, where
the writer had to live, a minor and quite banal routine episode
occurred, which, however, provides the key to French politics as a
whole. In a hospital, owned by the Comité des Forges, a young worker,
about to undergo a serious operation, took the liberty to read the
revolutionary press (or, to be more precise, the press which he
innocently accepted as revolutionary, namely: L’HUMANITÉ). The hospital
delivered an ultimatum to the careless patient and, later, to four
others who shared his sympathies: either they must renounce receiving
the undesirable publications or they would be immediately thrown out
into the street. Of course it availed the patients nothing to argue that
clerical-reactionary propaganda was being carried on quite openly in,
the hospital. Inasmuch as only ordinary workers were concerned, who had
neither mandates as deputies nor ministerial portfolios to risk, but
only their health and lives, the ultimatum proved ineffectual. Five sick
men, one of whom was scheduled for an operation, were ejected from the
hospital. Grenoble at that time was a Socialist municipality, headed by
Doctor Martin, one of those conservative bourgeois who generally set the
tone in the Socialist Party, and whose consummate representative is Léon
Blum. The ejected workers sought a champion in the mayor. In vain.
Despite all entreaties, letters and intercessions they failed even to
obtain an interview. They then turned to the local left newspaper
DÉPÊCHE, in which Radicals and Socialists composed an indivisible
cartel. Upon learning that the matter involved the hospital of the
Comité des Forges, the director of the newspaper refused point blank to
intervene: anything your heart desires, except that! For a previous
indiscretion in connection with this all-powerful organization, DÉPÊCHE
had already been deprived of an advertisement, and suffered a loss of
20,000 francs. In contrast to the proletarians, the director of the
“left” newspaper, like the mayor, stood to lose something. They
therefore refused to engage in an unequal struggle, leaving the workers
with their diseased intestines and kidneys to their fate.

Once every week or every fortnight, the Socialist mayor disturbs the dim
recollections of his youth by delivering a speech on the superiorities
of socialism over capitalism. During elections, DÉPÊCHE supports the
mayor and his party. Everything is in order. The Comité des Forges
maintains an attitude of liberal tolerance towards socialism of this
sort, which does not do the least harm to the material interests of
capitalism. By means of an advertisement of 20,000 francs per year (so
cheaply are these gentlemen priced!), the feudalists of the heavy
industry and banks keep a large cartel newspaper in actual subjection.
And not the newspaper alone. The Comité des Forges apparently has
arguments, both direct and indirect, weighty enough for Messrs. Mayors,
Senators, Deputies, including the Socialists. Entire official France is
under the dictatorship of finance capital. In the Larousse dictionary
this system is called a “democratic republic”.

It seemed to the Messrs. left deputies and journalists, not only in the
Isère but in all the departments of France, that there would be no end
to their peaceful cohabitation with capitalist reaction. They were
mistaken. Long corroded by dry rot, democracy suddenly felt the barrel
of a gun at its temple. Just as the rearmament of Hitler – a coarse
material fact – brought about a real upheaval in the relations between
states, laying bare the vain and illusory nature of the so-called
“international law”, just so did the arming of the gangs of Colonel de
la Rocque result in convulsing the internal relations of France,
compelling all parties without exception to reform their ranks, to
assume a different colouration and to effect regroupments.

* * *

Friedrich Engels once wrote that the state, including the democratic
republic, consists of detachments of armed men in defence of property;
everything else serves only to embellish or camouflage this fact.
Eloquent champions of “Law”, like Herriot or Blum, always became
incensed at such cynicism. But both Hitler and de la Rocque, each in his
own domain, have once again demonstrated that Engels is correct.

Early in 1934, Daladier was the presiding minister by will of universal,
equal, direct and secret suffrage. He walked around with national
sovereignty in his pocket alongside of his handkerchief. But the moment
that the detachments of de la Rocque, Maurras and Co. showed that they
dared to shoot and to slash the tendons of the police horses, sovereign
Daladier surrendered his post to a political invalid designated by the
leaders of the armed detachments. This fact is of considerably greater
importance than all the electoral statistics, and it cannot be erased
from the pages of the most recent history of France, for it forecasts
the future.

Assuredly, the course of the political life of a country cannot be
altered by _every_ group armed with revolvers, at any time. Only those
armed detachments which are the organs of specific classes can play a
decisive role under _certain_ conditions. Colonel de la Rocque and his
henchmen seek to insure “law and order” against convulsions. And
inasmuch as law and order in France signify the rule of finance capital
over the middle and petty bourgeoisie, and the rule of the bourgeoisie
as a whole over the proletariat and the social strata closest to it, the
detachments of de la Rocque are simply the armed pickets of finance
capital.

This idea is not new. One can often run across it even in the pages of
LE POPULAIRE and L’HUMANITÉ, although, of course, they were not the
original formulators of it. These publications, however, speak only half
of the truth. The other and equally important half consists of the fact
that Herriot and Daladier with their followers are also an agency of
finance capital; otherwise the Radicals could not have been the ruling
party in France for a period of decades. If we are not to play the game
of hide and seek, we must say that de la Rocque and Daladier both serve
one and the same master. This does not mean to say that either they
themselves or their methods are identical. Quite the contrary. They
fiercely war against each other, like two specialized agencies each of
whom has its own special secret of salvation. Daladier promises to
maintain order through the exercise of the self-same tricolour
democracy. De la Rocque holds that outlived parliamentarianism must be
swept away and replaced by an open military-police dictatorship. The
political methods are antagonistic but the social aims they serve are
the same. The historical basis of the antagonism between de la Rocque
and Daladier – we use these names merely for the sake of simplicity in
our presentation – is the decline of the capitalist system, its
incurable crisis, its decay. Despite the constant triumphs of technology
and the explosive successes achieved by individual branches of industry,
capitalism as a whole acts as a brake upon the development of the
productive forces, engendering an extreme instability in social and
international relations. Parliamentary democracy is indissolubly bound
up with the epoch of free competition and free international trade. The
bourgeoisie was able to tolerate the freedom of strikes, of assembly and
of the press only so long as the productive forces were mounting
upwards, so long as the sales markets were being extended, the welfare
of the popular masses, even if only partially, was rising and the
capitalist nations were able to live and let live. It is otherwise now.
If we exclude the Soviet Union, the imperialist epoch is characterized
by the stagnation or decline of the national income, a chronic agrarian
crisis and organic unemployment. These phenomena pertain internally to
the present phase of capitalism just as gout and arteriosclerosis
pertain to certain ages of man. To explain world economic chaos by the
consequences of the last war is to lay bare a hopeless superficiality in
the spirit of Caillaux, Count Sforza and the like. The war itself was
nothing else than an attempt on the part of capitalist countries to
unload the already impending crash upon the enemy’s back. The attempt
failed. The war only deepened the manifestations of collapse, which, in
its subsequent development, prepares a new war.

Bad as French economic statistics are, and although they deliberately
evade the problems of class contradictions, even these statistics are
unable to cover up the manifestations of a direct social disintegration.
Amid the general decline of the national income, amid the truly
horrifying fall in the income of the peasants, amid the ruin of the
little men in the cities and the growth of unemployment, the gigantic
enterprises with a turnover above 100 to 200 millions a year are doing a
brilliant business. Finance capital is sucking the lifeblood from the
veins of the French people, in the full sense of the term. Such is the
social basis for the ideology and politics of “national unity”.

Mitigations and flickers of better times are possible in the process of
decline; they are even inevitable. They remain, however, purely episodic
in character. The general tendency of our epoch imperiously drives
France, in the wake of a number of other countries, to the alternative:
either the proletariat must overthrow the utterly decayed bourgeois
order, or capitalism, in the interests of self-preservation, must
replace democracy with Fascism. How long can Fascism last? The answer to
this question will be provided by the fate of Mussolini and Hitler.

The Fascists fired their guns on February 6, 1934 at the direct orders
of the Bourse, the banks and the trusts. From the self-same ruling
summits, Daladier received the instruction to hand over power to
Doumergue. And if the Radical premier capitulated – with the
pusillanimity that is generally characteristic of the Radicals – it was
precisely because he recognized his own master in the gangs of de la
Rocque. In other words: sovereign Daladier surrendered power to
Doumergue for the self-same reason that the director of DÉPÊCHE and the
mayor of Grenoble refused to expose the abominable cruelty of the agents
of the Comité des Forges.

However, the transition from democracy to Fascism carries with it the
danger of social upheavals. Thence arise the tactical vacillations and
differences among the summits of the bourgeoisie. All the magnates of
capital are in favour of further strengthening the armed detachments,
which can serve as safety reserves in the hour of danger. But what place
should be allotted to these detachments even today? Should they be
permitted immediately to assume the offensive or should they still be
held in reserve as a threat? – These questions remain unsolved as yet.

Finance capital no longer believes in the ability of the Radicals to
lead the petty-bourgeois masses behind them, and by means of the
pressure exercised by these masses to restrain the proletariat within
the framework of “democratic” discipline. But finance capital is
likewise uncertain of the ability of the Fascist organizations, which
still lack a real mass base, to seize power and establish firm order.

The behind-the-scenes leaders have been instilled with the need for
caution not by parliamentary eloquence but by the rage of the workers,
by the attempt of the general strike, which, to be sure, was stifled at
its very inception by the bureaucracy of Jouhaux and, later, by the
local uprisings (Toulon, Brest). A slight curb was placed on the
Fascists, and the Radicals breathed just a bit easier. LE TEMPS, which
had already rushed to offer its hand and heart in a number of articles
to the “young generation”, discovered anew the superior merits of a
liberal régime as the one most in harmony with French genius. Thus, the
unstable, transitional, bastard régime was established, which harmonizes
not with the genius of France but with the decline of the Third
Republic. What stands out most sharply in this régime are its
_Bonapartist_ traits: the independence of power from parties and
programs, the liquidation of the parliamentary legislation by means of
emergency powers, the rising of the government in the guise of an
“arbiter” above the struggling camps, i.e., factually above the nation.
The ministries of Doumergue, Flandin, Laval, all three with the
invariable participation of the compromised and abject Radicals,
represented minor variations of one and the same theme. Upon the
inauguration of the Sarraut ministry, Léon Blum, whose perspicacity
possesses two dimensions instead of three, proclaimed that: “The final
effects of February 6 have been destroyed on the parliamentary plane.”
(LE POPULAIRE, Feb. 2, 1936). This is commonly known as cleaning the
shadow of a carriage with the shadow of a brush. As if it is possible,
in general, to abolish “on the parliamentary plane” the pressure of the
armed detachments of finance capital! As if Sarraut can escape feeling
this pressure and not quake before it! In point of fact the
Sarraut-Flandin government represents another variation of the self-same
semi-parliamentary “Bonapartism”, only somewhat inclined to the “left”.
Sarraut, himself, in replying to the charge of his having resorted to
arbitrary measures gave the Chamber the best answer possible. Said
Sarraut: “If my measures are arbitrary, it is because I aim to be an
arbiter”. This aphorism would not have sounded badly even on the lips of
Napoléon III. Sarraut feels himself to be not the plenipotentiary of a
certain party or a bloc of parties in power, as is in accordance with
the rules of parliamentarianism, but an arbiter over classes and
parties, as in accordance with the laws of Bonapartism.

* * *

The sharpening of the class struggle, and especially the open emergence
of the armed gangs of reaction, caused a similar upheaval among the
workers’ organizations. The Socialist Party which had been peacefully
performing the role of the spare wheel in the chariot of the Third
Republic, found itself compelled to half-renounce its cartel tradition,
and even to break with its own right wing (the Neos). Concurrently, the
Communists completed their evolution in just the opposite direction but
on a scale infinitely more extensive. Over a period of several years
these gentlemen had raved deliriously about barricades, conquering the
streets, and so on (their delirium, to be sure, remained primarily
literary in nature). Now after February 6, 1934, realizing that the
situation had taken a serious turn, the specialists in barricades
scurried to the right. The normal reflex action of the scared
phrase-mongers coincided most propitiously with the new international
orientation of Soviet diplomacy.

Oppressed by the danger threatening from Hitler Germany, the policy of
the Kremlin turned towards France. _Status quo_ – in international
relations! _Status quo_ – in the internal relations of the French
régime! Hopes for the social revolution? Chimeras! The leading circles
in the Kremlin refer as a rule only with contempt to French Communism.
One must hang on to what exists, lest things get worse. Parliamentary
democracy in France is inconceivable without the Radicals: they must be
supported by the Socialists. It is necessary to order the Communists not
to hinder the bloc between Blum and Herriot and, if possible, the
Communists – themselves must join the bloc. No convulsions, no threats!
Such is the course pursued by the Kremlin.

When Stalin renounces the world revolution, the bourgeois parties of
France refuse to believe him. Needless caution! In politics, blind
credulity is, of course, not a great virtue. But blind distrust is no
better. One must know how to compare words with deeds and be able to
recognize a general tendency of development over a period of years. The
policy of Stalin, determined by the interests of the privileged Soviet
bureaucracy, has become conservative through and through. The French
bourgeoisie has ample reasons to place faith in Stalin. All the less
reason for trust on the part of the French proletariat.

During the Trade-Union Unity Congress at Toulouse, the “Communist”
Racamond gave a truly immortal formula of the policy of the People’s
Front: “How to overcome the timidity of the Radical Party?” How to
overcome the bourgeoisie’s fear of the proletariat? Very simply: the
terrible revolutionists must fling away the knife clenched between their
teeth, they must put pomade on their hair, and filch the smile of the
most fascinating courtesan. The result will be Vaillant-Couturier –
latest model. Under the onset of the pomaded “Communists”, who with all
their strength pushed the leftward-moving Socialists to the right, Blum
had to change his course once again, fortunately, in the accustomed
direction. Thus arose the People’s Front – the society for insuring
Radical bankrupts at the expense of the capital of the working-class
organizations.

Radicalism is inseparable from Freemasonry. When we say this, we have
said everything. During the debate in the Chamber of Deputies on the
Fascist leagues, Mr. Xavier Vallat recalled that Trotsky had once
“prohibited” French Communists from participating in masonic lodges. Mr.
Jammy Schmidt, a high authority in this field, we believe, immediately
explained this edict by the incompatibility between despotic Bolshevism
and the “free spirit”. We shall not enter into a dispute over this point
with the Radical deputy. But we still consider that a labour
representative who seeks inspiration or solace in the vapid masonic cult
of class collaboration is undeserving of the slightest trust. It was not
accidental that the cartel was supplemented by the extensive
participation of the Socialists in the mummery of the lodges. Now the
time has come for the repentant Communists also to don the aprons!
Incidentally, the newly converted pupils will be able to serve the old
masters of the cartel more comfortably in aprons.

But, we are told, not without indignation, the People’s Front is not a
cartel at all, but a mass movement. There is, of course, no lack of
pompous definitions, but they do not change the nature of things. The
job of the cartel always consisted in _putting a brake_ upon the mass
movement, directing it into the channels of class collaboration. This is
precisely the job of the People’s Front as well. The difference between
them – and not an unimportant one – is that the traditional cartel was
applied during the comparatively peaceful and stable epochs of the
parliamentary régime. Now, however, when the masses are impatient and
explosive, a more imposing brake is needed, with the participation of
the “Communists”. Joint meetings, parade processions, oaths, mixing the
banners of the Commune and of Versailles, noise, bedlam, demagogy – all
these serve a single aim: to curb and demoralize the mass movement.

While justifying himself in the Chamber before the rights, Sarraut
declared that his innocent concessions to the People’s Front were
nothing else than the _safety valve_ of the régime. Such frankness may
have seemed imprudent. But it was rewarded by violent applause from the
benches of the extreme left. There was no reason, therefore, for Sarraut
to be bashful. In any case, he succeeded, perhaps not quite consciously,
in providing a classic definition of the People’s Front: a safety valve
for the mass movement. M. Sarraut is in every way fortunate with his
aphorisms!

* * *

Foreign policy is the continuation of home policy. Having entirely
renounced the viewpoint of the proletariat, Blum, Cachin and Co. adopt,
under the screen of “collective security” and “international law”, the
viewpoint of national imperialism. They are preparing precisely the same
policy of bootlicking which they had conducted in the years 1914 to
1918, adding only the phrase “For the Defence of the USSR”. Yet during
the years 1918-23, when Soviet diplomacy was also obliged to veer
considerably and to conclude a good many agreements, not a single one of
the sections of the Communist International so much as even dared to
think of a bloc with its own bourgeoisie! Is not this alone ample proof
of the sincerity of Stalin’s renunciation of the world revolution?

The self-same motives which impelled the present leaders of the
Comintern to suckle at the paps of “democracy” in its period of agony
led them to discover the glorious image of the League of Nations, when
the death rattle was already emanating from it. Thus was created a
common platform of foreign policy between the Radicals and the Soviet
Union. The home program of the People’s Front is concocted of
generalities which allow of as liberal an interpretation as does the
Geneva covenant. The general meaning of the program is to leave
everything as of old. Meanwhile, the masses refuse to accept the old any
longer: therein lies the gist of the political crisis.

Disarming the proletariat politically, the Blums, Paul Faures, Cachins
and Thorezes are most concerned lest the workers arm themselves
physically. The agitation of these gentlemen does not differ in any way
from the preacher’s sermons on the superiorities of moral principles.
Engels, who taught that the problem of state power is the problem of
armed detachments, and Marx who looked upon insurrection as an art,
appear as medieval barbarians in the eyes of the present deputies,
senators and mayors of the People’s Front. For the one hundred and first
time, POPULAIRE prints a cartoon picturing a naked worker with the
caption: “You will learn that our bare fists are more solid than all
your blackjacks.” What a splendid contempt for military technique! Even
the Abyssinian Negus holds more progressive views on this subject. The
overturns in Italy, Germany and Austria apparently do not exist for
these people. Will they cease singing paeans to “bare fists” when de la
Rocque claps handcuffs upon them? Sometimes one feels sorry that such an
experience cannot be afforded privately to the Messrs. Leaders, without
involving the masses!

From the standpoint of the bourgeois régime as a whole, the People’s
Front represents an episode in the competition between Radicalism and
Fascism for the attention and good graces of big capital. By their
theatrical fraternization with Socialists and Communists, the Radicals
want to prove to the master that the situation of the régime is not as
bad as the rights assert; that the threat of the revolution is not at
all so great; that even Vaillant-Couturier has swapped his knife for a
dog collar; that through the medium of the domesticated “revolutionists”
it is possible to discipline the working masses, and, consequently, to
save the parliamentary system from shipwreck.

Not all the Radicals believe in this manoeuvre; the most solid and
influential among them, headed by Herriot, prefer to take a watchful
position. But in the last analysis they have nothing else to propose
themselves. The crisis of parliamentarianism is first of all the crisis
of the confidence of the voters in Radicalism. Until some method for
rejuvenating capitalism is discovered, there is not and cannot be any
recipe for the salvation of the Radical Party. The latter has only the
choice between two variants of political doom. Even the relative success
it may score during the coming elections can neither avert nor even long
postpone its shipwreck.

The leaders of the Socialist Party, the most carefree politicians in
France, do not burden themselves with the study of the sociology of the
People’s Front. No one can learn anything from the endless monologues of
Léon Blum. As for the Communists, the latter, extremely proud of their
initiative in the cause of collaboration with the bourgeoisie, picture
the People’s Front as _an alliance between the proletariat and the
middle classes_. What a parody on Marxism! The Radical Party is not at
all the party of the petty bourgeoisie. Nor is it a “bloc between the
middle and the petty bourgeoisie” in accordance with the idiotic
definition of the Moscow PRAVDA. The middle bourgeoisie exploits the
petty bourgeoisie not only economically but also politically, and it
itself is the agency of finance capital. To give the hierarchic
political relations, based upon exploitation, the neutral name of “bloc”
is to make a mock of reality. A horseman is not a bloc between a man and
a horse. If the party of Herriot-Daladier extends its roots deeply into
the petty bourgeoisie, and in part even into the working masses, it does
so only in order to lull and dupe them in the interests of the
capitalist order. The Radicals are the democratic party of French
imperialism – any other definition is a lie.

The crisis of the capitalist system disarms the Radicals, depriving them
of their traditional implements for lulling the petty bourgeoisie. “The
middle classes” are beginning to sense, if not to understand, that it is
impossible to save the situation through paltry reforms, that it is
necessary to scrap audaciously the existing system. But Radicalism and
audacity are as incompatible as fire and water. Fascism is fed above all
by the growing lack of confidence of the petty bourgeoisie in
Radicalism. One can say without fear of exaggeration that the political
fate of France in the period immediately ahead will take shape depending
largely upon the manner in which Radicalism is liquidated, and who will
fall heir to its legacy, i.e., its influence over the petty bourgeoisie:
Fascism or the party of the proletariat.

* * *

The elementary axiom of Marxist strategy reads that the alliance between
the proletariat and the little men of the city and country can be
realized only in the irreconcilable struggle against the traditional
parliamentary representation of the petty bourgeoisie. In order to
attract the peasant to the side of the worker, it is necessary to tear
the peasant away from the Radical politician, who subjects the peasant
to finance capital. In contradistinction to this, the People’s Front,
the conspiracy between the labour bureaucracy and the worst political
exploiters of the middle classes is capable only of killing the faith of
the masses in the revolutionary road and of driving them into the arms
of the Fascist counter-revolution.

Unbelievable as it may seem, some cynics attempt to justify the policy
of the People’s Front by quoting Lenin, who if you please, proved that
there is no getting along without “compromises” and, in particular,
without making agreements with other parties. It has become an
established rule among the leaders of the present Comintern to make mock
of Lenin: they trample underfoot all the teachings of the builder of the
Bolshevik Party, and then they take a trip to Moscow to kneel before his
mausoleum.

Lenin began his activities in tsarist Russia, where not only the
proletariat, the peasantry and the intelligentsia but also wide circles
of the bourgeoisie stood in opposition to the old régime. If the policy
of the People’s Front has any justification at all, one should imagine
that it could be justified first of all in a country that has yet to
achieve its bourgeois revolution. The Messrs. Falsifiers, however, would
not do badly at all if they were to point out at what stage and under
what conditions the Bolshevik Party ever built even a semblance of the
People’s Front in Russia? Let them strain their imagination and rummage
among the historical documents!

The Bolsheviks did conclude practical agreements with the revolutionary
petty-bourgeois organizations, for example, for joint illegal transport
of revolutionary literature; sometimes to repulse the Black-Hundred
gangs. During elections to the state Duma they did, under certain
conditions, enter into electoral blocs with the Mensheviks or the
Socialist Revolutionaries, on the second ballot. That is all. No common
“programs”, no common and permanent institutions, no renunciation of the
criticism of temporary allies. Such episodic agreements and compromises,
confined strictly to practical aims – and Lenin never spoke of any other
kind – have absolutely nothing in common with the People’s Front which
represents a conglomeration of heterogeneous organizations, a long term
alliance between different classes, that are bound for an entire period
– and what a period! – by a common program and a common policy of
parades, declamations and of throwing up smokescreens. The People’s
Front will fall to pieces at the first serious test, and deep fissures
will open up in all of its component sections. The policy of the
People’s Front is the policy of betrayal.

The rule of Bolshevism on the question of blocs reads: _march
separately, strike together!_ The rule of the leaders of the present
Comintern is: _march together in order to be smashed separately._ Let
these gentlemen hold on to Stalin and Dimitrov, but leave Lenin in
peace!

It is impossible to read without indignation the declarations of the
bragging leaders who allege that the People’s Front has “saved” France
from Fascism. In point of fact, they mean only to say that the mutual
encouragement “saved” the scared heroes from their own exaggerated
fears. For how long? Between Hitler’s first uprising and his coming to
power, a decade elapsed, which was marked by frequent ebbs and flows. At
that time, the German Blums and Cachins also used to proclaim more than
once their “victory” over national socialism. We refused to believe
them, and we were not mistaken. This experience, however, has taught the
French cousins of Wels and Thälmann nothing. In Germany, to be sure, the
Communists did not participate in the People’s Front, which united the
Social Democracy with the bourgeois left and the Catholic centre (“the
alliance between the proletariat and the middle classes”!). During that
period the Comintern rejected even fighting agreements between
working-class organizations against Fascism. The results are quite well
known. The warmest sympathy to Thälmann as the captive of executioners
cannot deter us from saying that his policy, i.e., the policy of Stalin,
did more for Hitler’s victory than the policy of Hitler himself. Having
turned itself inside out, the Comintern now applies in France the quite
familiar policy of the German Social Democracy. Is it really so
difficult to foresee its results?

The coming parliamentary elections, no matter what their outcome, will
not _in themselves_ bring any serious changes into the situation: the
voters, in the final analysis, are confronted with the choice between an
arbiter of the type of Laval and an arbiter of the type,
Herriot-Daladier. But inasmuch as Herriot has peacefully collaborated
with Laval, and Daladier has supported them both, the difference between
them is entirely insignificant, if measured by the scale of the tasks
set by history.

To pretend that Herriot-Daladier are capable of proclaiming war against
the “200 families” who rule France is to dupe the people shamelessly.
The 200 families do not hang suspended in mid-air but are the crown of
the system of finance capital. To cope with the 200 families it is
necessary to overthrow the economic and political régime, in the
maintenance of which Herriot and Daladier are just as much interested as
Flandin and de la Rocque. The issue here is not a struggle of the
“nation” against a handful of magnates as L’HUMANITÉ pictures it, but
the struggle of the proletariat against the bourgeoisie. It is a
question of the class struggle which can be resolved only by revolution.
The strike-breaking conspiracy of the People’s Front has become the
chief obstacle on this road.

It is impossible to say in advance how much longer the
semi-parliamentary, semi-Bonapartist ministries will continue to succeed
one another in France and in general through what concrete stages the
country will pass in the next period. This depends on the world and
national economic cycle, upon the degree of stability of Italian and
German Fascism, upon the course of events in Spain and last – but not
least in importance – upon the awareness and the activity of the
advanced elements of the French proletariat. The _dénouement_ can be
brought closer by the convulsions of the franc. A closer collaboration
between France and England can postpone it. In any case the death throes
of “democracy” may drag out much longer than the pre-Fascist period of
Brüning-Papen-Schleicher endured in Germany; but this does not stop it
from being the death throes just the same. Democracy will be swept away.
The only question is: by whom?

* * *

The struggle against the “200 families”, against Fascism and war, for
peace, bread and freedom, and other magnificent things is either a lie,
or it is the struggle for the overthrow of capitalism. The toilers of
France are faced with the problem of the revolutionary conquest of power
not as a distant goal but as the task of the coming period. Meanwhile,
the Socialist and Communist leaders not only renounce the revolutionary
mobilization of the proletariat, but resist it with all their strength.
Fraternizing with the bourgeoisie, they hound and expel the Bolsheviks.
So greatly do they hate the revolution and dread it! Under these
conditions, the worst role is played by those pseudo-revolutionists of
the type of Marceau Pivert who promise to overthrow the bourgeoisie, but
only with the permission of Léon Blum! The entire course of the French
labour movement for the last twelve years has placed the task of
creating a _new revolutionary party_ on the order of the day.

To speculate whether events will allow “sufficient” time for its
formation is to engage in the most fruitless of all occupations. History
has absolutely inexhaustible resources in the domain of different
variants, historical forms, stages, accelerations and retardations.
Under the influence of economic difficulties Fascism may venture
prematurely and suffer a defeat. This would imply a long respite.
Contrariwise, it may occupy a temporizing position too long and thereby
increase the chances in favour of the revolutionary organizations. The
People’s Front may break up out of its own contradictions before Fascism
is able to engage in a general battle: this would signify a period of
regroupments and splits in the parties of the working class, and a rapid
fusion of the revolutionary vanguard. Spontaneous mass movements as in
Toulon and Brest may attain a wide sweep and create a reliable fulcrum
for the revolutionary lever. Finally, even the victory of Fascism in
France, which is theoretically not excluded, does not mean that it will
reign for 1,000 years as Hitler prophesies, or that it is even assured
to endure as long as Mussolini has been able to maintain himself. The
twilight of Fascism, beginning with Italy or Germany, would quickly
spread over France as well. To build a revolutionary party in this, the
least favourable variant, is to bring nearer the hour of vengeance. The
wiseacres who shy away from the un-postponable task with the words, “the
conditions are not yet mature”, merely reveal that they themselves have
not matured for the conditions.

The Marxists of France, as well as those of the entire world, must, in a
certain sense, begin at the beginning, but on an infinitely higher
historical level than their predecessors. Progress is at first rendered
extremely difficult by the fall of the Communist International, more
infamous than the fall of the Social Democracy in 1914. The new cadres
are being recruited slowly, in a cruel struggle against the united front
of the reactionary and patriotic bureaucracy in the working class. On
the other hand, these very difficulties, which did not descend upon the
proletariat accidentally, constitute an important condition for the
correct selection and the firm tempering of the first detachments of the
new party and the new international.

Only a very tiny section of the cadres of the Comintern began its
revolutionary education from the outset of the war, prior to the October
revolution. All these elements, almost without a single exception, are
now outside the Communist International. The next oldest stratum joined
the already victorious October revolution. This was much easier. But
only an insignificant portion has remained even of this second draft.
The overwhelming majority of the present cadres of the Comintern adhered
not to the Bolshevik program, not to the revolutionary banner, but to
the Soviet bureaucracy. These are not fighters but docile functionaries,
adjutants, errand boys. It is by reason of this that the Third
International is putrefying so infamously amid the historical situation
so rich in great revolutionary possibilities.

The Fourth International rises on the shoulders of its three
predecessors. It is subjected to blows from the front, the sides and the
rear. Careerists, cowards, philistines have nothing to seek in our
ranks. The percentage of sectarians and adventurists, inevitable at the
beginning, is winnowed away as the movement grows. Let pedants and
sceptics shrug their shoulders about “small” organizations that issue
“small” papers and fling a challenge to the entire world. Serious
revolutionists will pass contemptuously by the pedants and sceptics. The
October Revolution also once began with its swaddling clothes.

The mighty Russian parties of Socialist Revolutionaries and Mensheviks
who made up the “People’s Front” with the Kadets, crumbled into dust in
the course of a few months under the blows of a “handful of fanatics” of
Bolshevism. Subsequently the German Social Democracy, the German
Communist Party and the Austrian Social Democracy died an ignoble death
under the blows of Fascism. The epoch which is drawing close for the
European peoples will sweep out of the working class, without leaving a
trace, all that is equivocal and rotten. All the Jouhauxs, Citrines,
Blums, Cachins, Vanderveldes and Caballeros are only phantoms. The
sections of the Second and Third Internationals will ingloriously leave
the stage one after another. A new regroupment in the workers’ ranks is
inevitable. Young revolutionary cadres will gain flesh and blood.
Victory is conceivable only on the basis of the methods of Bolshevism,
to the defence of which this volume is dedicated.


Leon Trotsky

Whither France?

------------------------------------------------------------------------



THE DECISIVE STAGE


(June 5, 1936)

 

The rhythm of events in France has become sharply accelerated. Hitherto
the _pre-revolutionary_ character of the situation had to be evaluated
on the basis of a theoretical analysis and isolated political symptoms.
Now facts speak for themselves. We may say without fear of exaggeration
that in the whole of France there are only two parties whose leaders are
unable to see and understand, or who refuse to see the full depth of the
revolutionary crisis. They are the “Socialists” and “Communists”. We
ought, of course, to add the “independent” trade-union leaders. The
working masses are now creating a revolutionary situation by resorting
to direct action. The bourgeoisie is in mortal fear of the development
of events and, behind the scenes, under the nose of the new government,
it takes all the steps necessary to defend and save itself, to dupe, to
crush and to exact a bloody vengeance. The “Socialist” and “Communist”
leaders alone continue to babble about the People’s Front, as if their
contemptible house of cards had not already been toppled by the class
struggle.

Blum says: “The country has given its mandate to the People’s Front and
we cannot go beyond the limits of this mandate.” Blum is duping his own
party and he aims to dupe the proletariat. The Stalinists (they still
continue to call themselves “Communists”) assist him in this. As a
matter of fact, the Socialists and Communists have utilized the dodges,
snares and meshes of the electoral machinery to do violence to the
toiling masses in the interests of an alliance with bourgeois
radicalism. The political essence of the crisis lies in the fact that
_the people are nauseated by the Radicals and their Third Republic._ The
Fascists seek to profit from this. But what have the Socialists and
Communists done? They have become the guarantors of the Radicals before
the people. They have portrayed the Radicals as slandered innocents.
They have assured the workers and peasants that complete salvation lies
in the ministry of Daladier. This was the leitmotif of the entire
electoral campaign. How did the masses reply? By giving an enormous
increase in votes and seats to the Communists, as the extreme left. The
masses have not yet understood the turns and zigzags of the hirelings of
Soviet diplomacy because the masses have not yet tested them in their
own experience. _The masses learn only in action, they have no time for
theoretical studies_. When one and a half million voters cast their
ballots for the Communists, the majority of them mean to say thereby:
“We want you to do the same thing in France that the Russian Bolsheviks
did in their country in October, 1917.” Such is the real will of the
most active section of the population, that section which is capable of
fighting for, and assuring, the future of France. This is the first
lesson of the elections.

Despite the split of the rather large section of the Neos, the
Socialists have retained approximately their old number of votes. On
this question, too, the masses gave their “leaders” a magnificent
lesson. The Neos wanted a cartel at any price, i.e., the collaboration
with the republican bourgeoisie in the name of the salvation and the
flowering of the “republic”. Their split from the Socialists occurred
precisely on this point, and they came out as competitors during the
election. The voters turned their backs on them. The Neos have been
crushed. Two years ago we predicted that the subsequent political
development would, in the first instance, destroy all small groups
gravitating towards the Radicals. In the conflict between the Socialists
and the Neos, the masses have condemned and discarded the group that was
the most systematic and resolute, the loudest and the most outspoken in
advocating an alliance with the bourgeoisie. Such is the second lesson
of the elections.

The Socialist Party is not a working-class party either with regard to
its policies or its social composition. It is the party of the new
middle estate (the functionaries, civil servants, etc.) and, in part, of
the petty bourgeoisie and the labour aristocracy. A serious analysis of
the electoral statistics would undoubtedly show that the Socialists lost
to the Communists a considerable section of workers and poor peasants,
while gaining from the Radicals, in turn, considerable groups of the
middle classes. This means that the petty bourgeoisie is moving to the
left away from the Radicals, towards the Socialists and Communists,
while groups of the middle and the big bourgeoisie are moving away from
the Radicals to the right. The regroupment is taking place along the
class axes and not along the artificial line of the “People’s Front”.
The revolutionary nature of the crisis is characterized by the rapid
polarization of political relations. Such is the third, fundamental
lesson.

The voter, therefore, has expressed his will – so far as he generally
can in the straitjacket of parliamentarianism – not in favour of the
People’s Front policy but against it. To be sure, on the second ballot
the Socialists and the Communists further distorted the political will
of the toilers by removing their candidates in favour of the bourgeois
Radicals. Despite this, the Radicals emerged from the test with their
ribs crushed, losing one-third of their seats. Says the TEMPS: “This is
due to their entering into a bloc with revolutionists.” Daladier
retorts: “Without the People’s Front we would have lost more.” Daladier
is absolutely right. Had the Socialists and the Communists conducted a
class policy, i.e., fought for the alliance between the workers and the
semi-proletarian elements in the city and country against the entire
bourgeoisie, including its rotten Radical wing, they would have received
many more votes, while the Radicals would have returned to the Chamber
an insignificant group.

All the political facts prove that there is no basis for the People’s
Front either in the social relations of France or in the political moods
of the masses. This policy is imposed from above: by the Radical
bourgeoisie, by the Socialist business men and careerists, by the Soviet
diplomats and their “Communist” lackeys. All together they have done
everything possible by means of the most dishonest of all electoral
systems, in order to dupe and rob politically the popular masses and to
distort their real will. Nevertheless, even under these conditions the
masses were able to give expression to their desire: not a coalition
with the Radicals but the consolidation of the toilers against the whole
bourgeoisie.

Had revolutionary working-class candidates been run on the second ballot
in all the electoral districts in which the Socialists and the
Communists withdrew in favour of the Radicals, they would, no doubt,
have obtained a very considerable number of votes. It is unfortunate
that not a single organization was to be found capable of such
initiative. This shows that the revolutionary groups both in the centre
and locally are lagging behind the dynamics of the events, and prefer to
temporize and evade whenever it is necessary to act. This is a sad
situation. But the general orientation of the masses is quite clear.

The Socialists and the Communists worked with all their might to prepare
the ministry of Herriot – at worst, the ministry of Daladier. What did
the masses do? They _imposed_ upon the Socialists and the Communists the
ministry of Blum. Is not this a direct vote against the policy of the
People’s Front?

Or, are more proofs necessary? The demonstration in memory of the
Communards has obviously surpassed all the popular demonstrations
witnessed in Paris this year. Yet the Radicals were not and could not
have been connected in any way with this demonstration. The toiling
masses of Paris, with an inimitable political instinct, have expressed
their readiness to appear in redoubled force whenever they are not
compelled to tolerate the repulsive fraternization between their leaders
and the bourgeois exploiters. The mighty demonstration of May 24 is the
most convincing and the most unalterable disavowal of the People’s Front
policy by working-class Paris.

“But a parliament, without the People’s Front and one in which the
Socialists and the Communists would not have the majority anyway, would
be a lifeless thing”, and the Radicals – oh horror of horrors! – would
be pushed into the “arms of reaction”. Such reasoning is quite worthy of
the cowardly philistines who are at the head of the Socialist and
Communist Parties. The _lifelessness of the parliament is the inevitable
consequences of the revolutionary nature of the crisis_. It was possible
to disguise this lifelessness somewhat by a series of political frauds,
but it will be exposed on the morrow just the same. In order not to push
the Radicals, who are reactionary to the marrow of their bones, into the
“arms of reaction”, it is necessary to unite with the Radicals in
defence of capitalism. This and this alone is the mission of the
People’s Front. But the workers hinder it.

* * *

The parliament is a lifeless thing because the present crisis opens no
way out on the parliamentary road. Once again, the French toiling
masses, with the fine revolutionary instinct that distinguishes them,
have unfailingly seized upon this chief trait in the situation. In
Toulon and Brest they sent up their first alarm signals. The protest of
the soldiers against the _rabiot_ (the increase in the service term)
signified the most dangerous form of direct mass action against
bourgeois order. Finally, during the days when the Socialist Party
congress unanimously (together with that hollow phrase-monger, Marceau
Pivert) accepted the mandate of the “People’s Front” and entrusted this
mandate to Léon Blum; in the days when Blum surveyed himself in the
mirror from all sides, made pre-governmental gestures, issued
pre-governmental exclamations, and commented upon them in articles which
always have a great deal to say about Blum but never anything about the
proletariat – precisely in those days the magnificent wave, a veritable
Spring flood of strikes, rolled over France. Not finding leadership and
managing to get along without it, the workers, boldly and with
assurance, suspended work and occupied the factories.

Salengro, the new cop of capitalism, who has hardly had the time to
assume power, hastened to proclaim (just as Herriot, Laval, Tardieu or
de la Rocque would have done) that he would protect “order against
anarchy”. Order is the name that this person gives to capitalist
anarchy. He gives the name anarchy to the struggle for a socialist
order. The still-peaceful occupation of mills and factories by the
toilers are saying: “We wish to be masters in the buildings where until
now we have been only slaves.”

Mortally frightened, Léon Blum wants to scare the workers. He says: “I
am no Kerensky; and even so, not Lenin would come to replace Kerensky in
France but somebody else”. One might imagine that the Russian Kerensky
had understood the policy of Lenin or had foreseen his coming. In point
of fact, Kerensky, to a hair like Blum, used to assure the workers that
in the event of his downfall not Bolshevism would come to power, but
“somebody else”. Precisely there where Blum seeks to distinguish himself
from Kerensky, he apes him most slavishly. However, it is impossible not
to recognize that in so far as matters depend on Blum, he is really
clearing the road to Fascism and not to the proletariat.

Most criminal and infamous in this situation is the conduct of the
Communists: they have promised to give unswerving support to the Blum
government, without entering it. “We are much too terrible
revolutionists" – say the Cachins and Thorezes – “we might frighten our
Radical colleagues to death. It is best for us to remain in the
ante-chamber”. Behind-the-scenes ministerialism is ten times more
pernicious than the open and obvious variety. In point of fact, the
Communists wish to preserve an outward semblance of independence in
order better to subject the working masses to the People’s Front, i.e.,
to the discipline of capitalism. But here too the class struggle proves
a hindrance. The simple and honest mass strike has mercilessly destroyed
the mysticism and the mystification of the People’s Front. The latter
has already received its death blow; henceforth it can only die a
lingering death.

There is no way out on the parliamentary road. Blum will not invent any
gunpowder, because he is scared of gunpowder. The further machinations
of the People’s Front can only prolong the death agony of
parliamentarianism and give de la Rocque time to prepare a new and more
serious blow if . the revolutionists do not forestall him.

Following February 6, 1934, certain impatient comrades were of the
opinion that the _dénouement_ would take place “tomorrow”, and that on
this account it was necessary immediately to perform some sort of
miracle. Such a “policy” could produce nothing but adventures and
zigzags that have retarded in the extreme the growth of the
revolutionary party. There is no regaining the time that has been lost.
But no more time must be lost in the future, for very little time
remains. Even today we shall not undertake to set dates. But after the
great strike wave, events can unfold only either towards revolution or
towards Fascism. That organization is unworthy of the name of
revolutionary which will fail to find a base for itself in the present
strike movement, which will prove unable to fuse itself firmly with the
struggling workers. Its members had better seek room for themselves in
the poor house or in the Freemason lodges (under the protection of
Marceau Pivert)!

In France there are quite a few ladies of both sexes, ex-Communists,
ex-Socialists, ex-syndicalists, who carry on a group or clique
existence, exchanging impressions of events inside four walls, and who
think that the time is not yet ripe for their enlightened participation.
“It is still too soon”. When de la Rocque will have come, they will say:
“Now it is too late”. There is a considerable number of such thinkers,
especially among the left wing of the Guild of the Enlightened. It would
be a great crime to waste even a spare moment upon these gentry. Let the
dead bury their dead!

The fate of France is now being decided not in parliament, not in the
editorial rooms of the conciliationist newspapers, both reformist and
Stalinist, and not in the circles of sceptics, snivellers, and
phrase-mongers. The fate of France is being settled in the factories
where the way out of capitalist anarchy has been shown in action. The
place of revolutionists is in the factories!

The last congress of the Comintern in its eclectic concoctions put the
coalition with the Radicals side by side with the creation of mass
Committees of Action, i.e., embryonic soviets. Dimitrov, as well as his
inspirers, seriously imagines that it is possible to combine class
collaboration with the class struggle, a bloc with the bourgeoisie with
the proletariat’s struggle for power, friendship with Daladier with
building of soviets. The French Stalinists have renamed the Committees
of Action People’s Front Committees, imagining that by so doing they
would reconcile revolutionary struggle with the protection of bourgeois
democracy. The present strikes destroy this miserable illusion to its
roots. The Radicals dread the strikes. The Socialists dread the fear of
the Radicals. The Communists dread the fear of both. The slogan of the
Committees can be realized only by a genuinely revolutionary
organization, unwaveringly devoted to the masses, to their cause and
their struggle. The French workers have once more shown that they are
worthy of their historical reputation. We must have faith in them. The
soviets have always been born out of strikes. The mass strike is the
natural element of the proletarian revolution. The Committees of Action
cannot be at present anything but the committees of those strikers who
are seizing the enterprises. From one industry to another, from one
factory to the next, from one working-class district to another, from
city to city, the Committees of Action must establish a close bond with
each other. They must meet in each city, in each productive group in
their regions in order to end with a Congress of all the Committees of
Action in France. This will be the new order which must take the place
of the reigning anarchy.


Leon Trotsky

Whither France?

------------------------------------------------------------------------



THE FRENCH REVOLUTION HAS BEGUN!


(June 9, 1936)

 

Never has the radio seemed so precious as during these days. From a
distant village in Norway one can follow the pulse beats of the French
revolution. Or rather, to put it more exactly, the reflection of these
pulsations in the minds and voices of the Messrs. ministers, trade-union
secretaries and other mortally terrified leaders.

To say “French revolution” may seem exaggerated. Oh, no! This is no
exaggeration. That is precisely how a revolution springs into being.
Generally speaking, a revolution cannot come into being any other way.
The French revolution has begun.

To be sure, Léon Jouhaux, tailing Léon Blum, keeps assuring the
bourgeoisie that this is a purely economic movement within the rigid
framework of the law. The strikers, indeed, are seizing factories for
the duration of the strike, establishing control over the bosses and
their staffs. But one may shut one’s eyes to this deplorable “detail”.
On the whole, these are “craft strikes, not political strikes”, the
Messrs. Leaders keep repeating. Yet, under the influence of these
“non-political” strikes the entire political situation in the country is
being radically transformed. The government decides to act with haste it
never thought of the night before. Indeed, according to Blum, true
strength lay in patience! The capitalists are unexpectedly compliant.
The entire counter-revolution bides its time behind the backs of Blum
and Jouhaux. And this miracle is brought about entirely by “craft”
strikes. What then would have happened had the strikes been political?

Oh, no, the leaders are not telling the truth. The craft union embraces
the workers of a single, isolated trade, separating them from other
trades. Trade unionism and reactionary syndicalism bend all efforts to
keep the working-class movement within the framework of crafts. Upon
this, in fact, rests the dictatorship of the trade-union bureaucracy
over the working class (the worst of all dictatorships!) while the
Jouhaux-Racamond clique in turn slavishly depends upon the bourgeois
state. The essence of the present movement consists precisely in that it
is breaking through trade union, craft and local bounds, raising beyond
them the demands, hopes and will of the whole proletariat. The movement
takes on the character of an epidemic. The contagion spreads from
factory to factory, from craft to craft, from district to district. All
the layers of the working class seem to be giving echoing answers to a
roll call. The metal workers begin – they are the vanguard. But the
strength of the movement lies in the fact that just behind the vanguard
follow the heavy reserves of the class, including the most backward
trades, the rearguard, completely forgotten on weekdays by Messrs.
parliamentarians and trade-union leaders. Not for nothing did LE PEUPLE
openly confess that the emergence of certain particularly low-paid
categories of the Paris population came to it as a complete “surprise”.
Yet precisely in the depths of these most oppressed strata,
inexhaustible springs of enthusiasm, selflessness and courage lie
hidden. The very fact of their awakening is the infallible mark of the
tidal wave. It is necessary to reach these layers at all costs!

Tearing loose from the craft and local bounds, the strike movement has
become terrible not only for bourgeois society, but also for the
workers’ own parliamentary and trade-union representatives who are
primarily concerned with closing their eyes to reality. Historical
legend has it that Louis XVI, upon asking: “What is this, mutiny?” was
answered by one of his courtiers: “No, sire, this is revolution.” Now to
the question of the bourgeoisie: “Is this mutiny?” its courtiers are
replying: “No, these are only craft strikes.” In giving comfort to the
capitalists, Blum and Jouhaux are comforting themselves. But words will
not help. To be sure, when these lines appear in the press, the first
wave may have subsided. Outwardly life may seem to be returning to its
old channels. But this changes nothing. These are not craft strikes that
have taken place. These are not just strikes. This is a _strike._ This
is the open rallying of the oppressed against the oppressors. This is
the classic beginning of revolution.

The entire past experience of the working class, the history of its
exploitation, miseries, struggles and defeats, comes to life under the
impact of events and rises up in the consciousness of every proletarian,
even the most backward, and drives him into the common ranks. The entire
class has been set in motion. This colossal mass cannot be stopped by
words. The struggle must be consummated either in the greatest of
victories or the most ghastly of defeats.

* * *

LE TEMPS has called the strike the “practice manoeuvres of the
revolution”. This is infinitely more serious than what is being said by
Blum and Jouhaux. But even the definition given by LE TEMPS is
incorrect, for it is in a certain sense exaggerated. Manoeuvres
presuppose the existence of a command, a general staff, a plan. This
does not exist in the strike. The leading centres of the working-class
organizations, including those of the Communist Party, have been caught
unawares. They are afraid, above all, lest the strike spoil all their
blueprints. The radio relays a remarkable statement by Marcel Cachin:
“We are all of us – we and the others – confronted by the fact of the
strike.” In other words, the strike is our common misfortune. With such
words the terrible senator persuades the capitalists to make concessions
in order not to aggravate the situation. The parliamentarians and the
trade-union secretaries, who are adapting themselves to the strike from
the sidelines the sooner to extinguish it, stand in reality outside the
strike, dangling in the air. They themselves do not know whether they
will land feet or head first. The awakened mass is still without a
revolutionary staff.

The ruling class has a real staff. This staff is not at all identical
with the Blum government, although it uses the latter very skilfully.
Capitalist reaction is now playing a big and risky game, but playing
ably. At the present moment it is playing the game of “losers win”. “Let
us today concede all the unpleasant demands which have met with
unanimous approval of Blum, Jouhaux and Daladier. It is a far cry from
recognition in principle to realization in action. There is the
parliament, there is the senate, there is the chancery – all these are
instruments of obstruction. The masses will show impatience and will
attempt to exert greater pressure. Daladier will divorce Blum. Thorez
will try to shy to the left. Blum and Jouhaux will part company with the
masses. Then we shall make up for all the present concessions, and with
interest.” This is the reasoning of the real staff of the
counter-revolution, the famous “200 families” and their hired
strategists. They are acting in accordance with a plan. It would be
light-minded to say that their plan is groundless. No, with the
assistance of Blum, Jouhaux and Cachin, the counter-revolution _can_
attain its goal.

The profound organic and genuinely revolutionary character of the strike
wave is best of all characterized by the fact that the mass movement,
though improvised, has acquired such vast scope and has exercised so
great a political influence. This is the guarantee of the endurance of
the movement, its stubbornness and the inevitability of a series of
ever-rising waves. Without this, victory would be impossible. But all
this is not enough for victory. As against the staff and the plan of the
“200 families” there must be a staff and a plan of proletarian
revolution. None as yet exists. But they can be created. All the
prerequisites and all the elements for a new crystallization of the
masses are at hand.

* * *

The sweep of the strike springs, we are told, from the “hopes” in the
People’s Front government. This is only one-quarter of the truth and
even less than that. If matters were really limited to hopes alone, the
workers would not have run the risk of struggle. The strike expresses
above all the _distrust_ or the _half-trust_ of the workers, if not in
the good intentions of the government, then in its ability to overcome
obstacles and to come to grips with its problems. The proletarians want
to “assist” the government, but in their own way, in the proletarian
way. They still of course lack complete consciousness of their own
strength. But it would be a gross distortion to portray matters as if
the masses were guided only by pious “hopes” in Blum. It is not easy for
them to muster their thoughts while yoked to the old leaders who try to
drive them as soon as possible back into the old rut of slavery and
routine. Nevertheless, the French proletariat is not at the beginning of
its history. The strike has everywhere and in every place pushed the
most thoughtful and fearless workers to the fore. To them belongs the
initiative. They are still acting cautiously, feeling the ground under
their feet. The vanguard detachments are trying not to rush ahead so as
not to isolate themselves. The echoing and re-echoing answers of the
hindmost ranks to their call gives them new courage. The roll call of
the class has become a trial self-mobilization. The proletariat was
itself in greatest need of this demonstration of its strength. The
practical successes won, however precarious they may be, cannot fail to
raise the self-confidence of the masses to an extraordinary degree,
particularly among the most backward and oppressed strata.

That leaders have come forward in the industries and in the factories is
the foremost conquest of the first wave. The elements of local and
regional staffs have been created. The masses know them. They know one
another. Real revolutionists will seek contact with them. Thus the first
self-mobilization of the masses has outlined and in part brought forward
the first elements of revolutionary leadership. The strike has stirred,
revitalized and regenerated the whole colossal class organism. The old
organizational shell has by no means dropped away. On the contrary, it
still retains its hold quite stubbornly. But under it the new skin is
already visible.

We do not speak now of the rhythm of events, which will undoubtedly be
accelerated. In this sphere only suppositions and guesses are possible
as yet. The second wave, its duration, its sweep and its intensity will
doubtless permit a much more concrete prognosis than can be made now.
But one thing is clear in advance: the second wave will not have by far
the peaceful, almost good-natured, Spring-like character that the first
has had. It will be more mature, more stubborn and harsh, for it will
arise from the disillusionment of the masses in the practical results of
the policies of the People’s Front and their own initial venture. In the
government a process of stratification will take place as well as in the
parliamentary majority. The counter-revolution will immediately become
more self-assured and brazen. Further easy successes cannot be expected
by the masses. Faced with the danger of losing what seemed to have been
won, faced with the growing resistance of the enemy and the confusion
and indecision of the official leadership, the masses will feel the
burning need of a program, an organization, a plan and a staff. For this
we must prepare ourselves and the advanced workers. In the atmosphere of
revolution the masses are swiftly re-educated, the cadres swiftly
selected and tempered.

The revolutionary general staff cannot emerge from combinations at the
top. The combat organization would not be identical with the party even
if there were a mass revolutionary party in France, for the movement is
incomparably broader than the party. The organization also cannot
coincide with the trade unions for the unions embrace only an
insignificant section of the class and are headed by an arch-reactionary
bureaucracy. The new organization must correspond to the nature of the
movement itself. It must reflect the struggling masses. It must express
their growing will. This is a question of the direct representation of
the revolutionary class. Here it is not necessary to invent new forms.
Historical precedents exist. The industries and factories will elect
their deputies who will meet to elaborate, jointly, plans of struggle,
and to provide the leadership. Nor is it necessary to invent the name
for such an organization; it is the _soviets of workers’ deputies_.

The main section of the revolutionary workers is now following the
Communist Party. In the past they have more than once cried: “Soviets
Everywhere!” The majority of them undoubtedly accepted this slogan
honestly and seriously. There was a time when we regarded this slogan as
untimely. But now the situation has radically changed. The mighty
collision of classes is heading towards a climax. Whoever vacillates,
whoever loses time is a traitor. The choice lies between the greatest of
all historical victories and the most ghastly of defeats. We must
prepare for victory. “Soviets Everywhere"? Agreed. But it is time to
pass from words to action.


Leon Trotsky

Whither France?

------------------------------------------------------------------------



REVOLUTIONARY INTERLUDE IN FRANCE


(July 9, 1936)

 

We must repeat once again that the serious capitalist press like the
Paris TEMPS or the London TIMES has made a much more correct and
penetrating evaluation of the meaning of the June events in France and
Belgium than has the press of the People’s Front. While the Socialist
and Communist official organs, tagging behind Blum, talk about the
beginning of the “peaceful transformation of the social régime in
France”, the conservative press insists that in France a revolution has
begun and that it will inevitably assume violent forms during the next
stages. It would be a mistake to view this prognosis as solely or
chiefly intended to frighten the property owners. The representatives of
big capital are capable of following the social struggle very
realistically. Contrariwise, petty-bourgeois politicians readily incline
to accept their own desires for reality. Standing between the principal
classes, finance capital and the proletariat, the Messrs. “Reformers”
propose that both of the opponents accept the middle course which they
have greatly laboured to elaborate in the general staff of the People’s
Front, and which they themselves interpret differently. However, they
will shortly have occasion to convince themselves that it is much easier
to reconcile class contradictions in leading articles than in
governmental activity, especially in the very heat of a social crisis.

In parliament an ironical charge has been hurled against Blum that he
carried on negotiations concerning the demands of the strikers with
representatives of the “200 families”. “And who else was there for me to
negotiate with?” wittily replied the premier. In point of fact, if any
negotiations are to be carried on with the bourgeoisie, then it is
necessary to choose the real masters, those capable of deciding for
themselves and of issuing orders to others. But in that case, it was
pointless to have so noisily declared war against them! Within the
framework of the bourgeois régime, its laws and mechanics, each one of
the “200 families” is incomparably more powerful than the Blum
government. The financial magnates represent the crown of the bourgeois
system of France, while the Blum government, despite all its electoral
successes, “crowns” only a brief interlude between the two contending
camps.

At the present moment, in the first half of July, it might superficially
seem as if everything had more or less returned to normal. As a matter
of fact, within the depths of the proletariat, as well as among the
summits of the ruling classes, a well-nigh automatic preparation for a
new conflict is now going on. The very essence of the matter lies in the
fact that the reforms, very meagre as they are in substance, upon which
the capitalists and the leaders of the labour organizations agreed in
June, are not viable, because they are already beyond the powers of
declining capitalism, taken as a whole. The financial oligarchy, which
did a swimming business in the very heat of the crisis, could, of
course, abide both with the forty-hour week, paid vacations, and so on,
but the hundreds of thousands of middle and petty entrepreneurs, upon
whom finance capital leans and upon whose shoulders it now is loading
the costs of its agreement with Blum, must either submit docilely to
ruin or seek, in their turn, to load the costs of social reforms upon
the workers and peasants, as consumers.

Blum, to be sure, had more than once expatiated in the Chamber and in
the press upon the enticing prospect of a general economic revival and
of a rapidly expanding turnover which will make it possible to lower
considerably the general productive costs and therefore allow of
increased expenditures for labour power without a rise in commodity
prices. In point of fact such combined economic processes were
frequently to be observed in the past. They mark the entire history of
rising capitalism. The only trouble is that Blum is trying to project
into the future what has irrevocably receded into the past. Politicians,
subject to such an aberration, may call themselves socialists and even
Communists but they fix their eyes not ahead but behind them, and they
are therefore a brake upon progress.

French capitalism, with its celebrated “equilibrium” between agriculture
and industry, entered into the stage of decline later than Italy and
Germany but no less irresistibly. This is not a phrase from a
revolutionary proclamation, but a statement of incontrovertible fact.
The productive forces of France have outgrown the bounds of private
property and the boundaries of the stage. Governmental intervention on
the foundations of a capitalist régime can be of assistance only in
shifting the unprofitable expenditures of the decline from one class to
another. Which class would that be? When the Socialist premier has to
carry on negotiations about a “more just” distribution of the national
income, he is unable, as we have already learned, to find any worthy
partners other than the representatives of the “200 families”. Holding
in their hands all the basic levers of industry, credit and commerce,
the financial magnates shift the costs of the agreement upon the “middle
classes”, compelling them by reason of this very thing to enter into a
struggle with the workers. In this now lies the crux of the situation.

The manufacturers and the merchants present their ledgers to the
ministers and say, “We cannot do it.” The government, calling to mind
old textbooks of political economy, replies: “It is necessary to cut
down the costs of production.” But this is easier said than done.
Moreover, in the given conditions, technological improvements would mean
increased unemployment, and ultimately a deepening of the crisis. The
workers, on their part, are protesting against the fact that the
incipient increases in prices threaten to devour their conquests. The
government issues orders to the prefects that they launch a campaign
against the high cost of living. But the prefects know from long
experience that it is much easier to lower the tone of an oppositionist
paper than to lower the price of meat. The wave of mounting prices still
lies ahead.

The small manufacturers, tradesmen and, in their way, the peasants will
become more and more disillusioned with the People’s Front, from which
they expected immediate salvation far more directly and innocently than
the workers. The fundamental political contradiction of the People’s
Front lies in the fact that the politicians of the Golden Mean at its
head, in their fear of “scaring” the middle classes, do not transgress
the bounds of the old social régime, that is, the historic blind alley.
Meanwhile, the so-called middle classes – not their summits, of course,
but the lower ranks – sense the impasse at every step and are not at all
afraid of bold decisions, but on the contrary demand them as a riddance
from the noose. “Do not expect miracles from us!” the pedants in power
keep repeating. But the gist of the matter lies precisely in the fact
that without “miracles”, without heroic decisions, without a complete
overturn in property relations – without the concentration of the
banking system, of the basic branches of industry and of foreign trade
in the hands of the state – there is no salvation for the petty
bourgeoisie of the city and country. If the “middle classes” in whose
name the People’s Front was expressly created are unable to find
revolutionary audacity from the left, they will seek it on the right.
The petty bourgeoisie is gripped by fever and must inevitably toss from
side to side. Meanwhile, the big capitalists are confidently watching
for such a turn as will make a beginning for Fascism. Not only as a
semi-military organization of bourgeois papa’s sons with automobiles and
aeroplanes but as a real mass movement in France.

The workers in June exerted colossal pressure upon the ruling classes,
but they did not carry it to its conclusion. They evinced their
revolutionary might but also their weakness: the lack of a program and
of a leadership. All the props of capitalist society and all of its
incurable ulcers remain intact. Now the period is unfolding of the
preparations for a counter-pressure: repressions against the left
agitators, the increasingly envenomed agitation on the part of the right
agitators, experimentation with rising prices, mobilizations of
manufacturers for mass lockouts. The trade unions of France which on the
eve of the strike hardly numbered one million members are now
approaching the five million mark. This unprecedented mass influx is
indicative of the feelings that inspire the labour masses. There cannot
even be talk that they will permit the costs of their own conquests to
be loaded upon themselves without a struggle. The ministers and their
official leaders are indefatigable in urging the workers to remain
seated peacefully and not to hinder the government while it is working
over the solution of problems. But inasmuch as the government, in the
nature of things, is incapable of solving any problem whatever; inasmuch
as the June concessions were gained thanks to the strike and not patient
waiting; inasmuch as every new day will expose the bankruptcy of the
government in the face of the developing counter-offensive of capital,
these monotonous exhortations will soon lose their potency. The logic of
the situation which flows from the June victory, or, rather, to put it
more correctly, from the semi-fictitious character of this victory, will
compel the workers to accept the challenge, to embark once again upon a
struggle. Taking fright at this prospect, the government shifts to the
right. Under the direct pressure of the Radical allies, but, in the last
analysis, upon the demand of the “200 families”, the Socialist Minister
of Internal Affairs announced in the Senate that no further occupations
of factories, stores, and farms by the strikers would be tolerated. A
warning of this sort cannot, of course, put a halt to the struggle, but
it is capable of making it infinitely more decisive and acute.

An absolutely objective analysis, which proceeds from facts and not
desires, thus leads us to the conclusion that a new social conflict is
being prepared from two sides, and that it must break out with an almost
mechanical inevitability. It is not difficult, even at the present time,
to define in general the nature of this conflict. During all
revolutionary periods in history, two successive stages may be
established which are closely linked together: first, the “elemental”
movement of the masses which catches the opponent off-guard and which
extorts serious concessions, or, at any rate, promises; and then the
ruling classes, sensing that the foundations of their rule are being
threatened, prepare for their revenge. The semi-victorious masses evince
impatience. The traditional left leaders, who, like the opponents, were
caught unawares by the movement, hope to save the situation by means of
conciliatory eloquence, and end by losing their influence. The masses
are drawn into a new struggle almost leaderless, without a clear program
and without understanding the difficulties ahead. Such a conflict
ineluctably arising from the first semi-victory of the masses has often
led to their defeat – or semi-defeat. An exception to this rule will
hardly be found in the history of revolutions. However, the difference
(it is no slight one) lies in the fact that sometimes the defeat assumes
the character of a rout: such for example were the June days in 1848 in
France, which put an end to the revolution; in other cases, however, the
semi-defeat proves only a _stage toward victory_: such a role, for
example, was played by the defeat of the Petrograd workers and soldiers
in July 1917. It was precisely the July defeat that accelerated the rise
of the Bolsheviks, who were not only able to estimate correctly the
situation without any illusions or any embellishments but also did not
break away from the masses during the most difficult days of failure,
sacrifice and persecution.

Yes, the conservative press is making a sober analysis of the situation.
Finance capital with its auxiliary political and military organs
cold-bloodedly prepares for revenge. Among the summits of the People’s
Front there is nothing except confusion and internal strife. The left
newspapers are smothered in moral preachments. The leaders choke with
phrases. The ministers vie to show the Bourse that they are mature
statesmen. Together, all this implies that the proletariat will be drawn
into the impending conflict not only _without_ the leadership of its
traditional organizations, as was the case in June, but also _against_
them. But there is no generally recognized new leadership in existence
as yet. Under such conditions one could hardly count upon immediate
victory. An attempt to probe into the future would rather lead one to
the following alternative: either June days, 1848 or July Days, 1917. In
other words: either a rout for many years to come, with the inevitable
triumph of Fascist reaction, or only a severe lesson on strategy as a
result of which the working class will mature, renew its leadership and
prepare the conditions for future victory. The French proletariat is no
novice. It has behind it a great number of epoch-making struggles. True,
the new generations have to learn each time from their own experience –
but they do not begin from the beginning, nor do they learn everything
all over again, but through an abbreviated course, as it were. The great
tradition permeates the very marrow of the workers and facilitates the
selection of the road. Already in June the anonymous leaders of the
awakened class had found methods and forms of struggle with magnificent
revolutionary tact. The molecular process of mass consciousness is not
being suspended now for a single hour. All this enables us to conclude
that the new layer of the leaders not only will remain true to the
masses in the days of the inevitable and, probably, not far-distant
conflict, but will also be able to lead the inadequately prepared army
from the battle without a rout.

It is not true that the revolutionists in France are allegedly
interested in precipitating the conflict, or “artificially” provoking
it. Only the dullest police minds are capable of thinking so. Marxist
revolutionists see their duty in looking clearly into the face of
reality and calling things by their names. To make a timely deduction
from the objective situation concerning the perspectives of the second
stage is to help the advanced workers not to be caught unawares, and to
introduce as much clarity as possible into the consciousness of the
struggling masses. In this consists at present the task of the serious
political leadership.
